 Soaring medical malpractice claims have contributed to an image of physicians as a tightly knit club with little self-policing.  But a recent study says doctors are effectively culling many of the bad apples from their midst.  The culling is being done by physician-owned insurance companies, which insure more than 40% of U.S. doctors for malpractice.  Physicians who review insurance matters for such companies have strong financial incentives to prevent negligence-prone colleagues from spawning patient lawsuits.  They take far more disciplinary actions against negligent doctors than state medical boards, according to the study, which appears in today's issue of the Journal of the American Medical Association.  Physician-owned insurance companies have proliferated since the mid-1970s as traditional malpractice insurers -- faced with skyrocketing, unpredictable awards -- abandoned the business.  Doctor-owned companies insure about 179,000 U.S. doctors, or more than 60% of those who aren't covered by institutions they work for, such as state mental hospitals, said a spokesman for the Physician Insurers Association of America, a trade group.  In 1985, such companies took disciplinary actions against 3.2% of their insured physicians, including termination of coverage for 0.66% of them, according to the medical journal's study.  Moreover, the sanctions often were imposed with remarkable speed after a doctor showed signs of negligence, said William Schwartz, co-author of the study and a medical economist at Tufts University in Boston.  Sometimes a single patient claim against a doctor triggered an investigation.  In contrast, traditional insurers identify negligence-prone doctors only after data on multiple claims against them have accumulated, a process that can take five years or more, Dr. Schwartz said.  Also, the doctors on hospital performance review boards often are reluctant to discipline colleagues they work with.  And state medical boards generally don't have enough resources to effectively weed out bad doctors, Dr. Schwartz said.  Still, the state boards are doing a better job, partly because of a four-year-old data bank on problem doctors maintained by the Federation of State Medical Boards, based in Fort Worth, Texas.  In 1987, the boards reported taking sanctions against 2,663 doctors nationwide, up 72% from 1984, said Bryant Galusha, the group's executive vice president.  In a related study in the same issue on doctors who lost their malpractice insurance, the Tufts researchers found there were 24% more physicians in the 45-to-54 age group who lost coverage than expected based on the proportion of doctors they represent.  Many underwriters speculate that such doctors face "financial responsibilities that drive them to take on grossly excessive work loads, particularly surgical procedures, for which they are not adequately trained," the study said.  The finding could also stem from the gradual accrual of evidence on negligent doctors that reaches a critical mass only after they have practiced a decade or more, Dr. Schwartz said.  The researchers also found that foreign-trained doctors aren't overrepresented among those who lost coverage and that neurosurgeons, plastic surgeons and some other specialists tend to lose coverage more often than expected, even when the high rate of claims in their fields is taken into account.  Chrysler Corp. said it amended its poison pill share purchase rights plan.  A Chrysler spokeswoman said the move is designed to "bring ourselves up to the state of the art" in poison pills, which are designed to make hostile takeovers prohibitively expensive.  She said the amendments are "absolutely not" a response to any specific takeover threat.  The No. 3 auto maker's directors made two major changes in the plan.  The first reduces the level of ownership in Chrysler stock by any person or group required to trigger certain anti-takeover provisions.  The second allows the provisions to take effect if Chrysler's board "declares any {entity} who has become the beneficial owner of at least 10% of the shares of Chrysler common stock then outstanding to be an 'adverse person.' "  Chrysler stockholders receive one full right in the poison pill plan for each share of common stock.  Each right entitles the holder to buy one-hundredth of a share of Chrysler junior participating cumulative preferred stock for $120.  "Certain events" will cause the rights either to "flip in" and entitle holders to buy Chrysler common stock at half of its market value, or to "flip over" and entitle holders to buy common stock in an acquiring entity at half of its market value, Chrysler said.  Under the newly amended plan, a "flipin" will occur if a shareholder acquires 20% or more of Chrysler common stock outstanding.  Previously, the threshold was 30%.  Chrysler's directors added the "adverse person" provision, which also will trigger a "flip-in."  The company said a stockholder could be declared an "adverse person" if Chrysler concludes that the shareholder's stock ownership is intended to pressure Chrysler to repurchase its common stock or to "take action intended to provide that person with short-term financial gain under circumstances where the best long-term interests of Chrysler and its stockholders would not be served."  A stockholder also could be declared an "adverse person" if its ownership "is causing or reasonably likely to cause a material adverse impact on the business or prospects of Chrysler."  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Chrysler shares fell 50 cents to $26.50.  L.R. Wilson, chairman of Redpath Industries Ltd., was named vice chairman effective Oct. 1.  A bank spokesman said Mr. Wilson, 49 years old, would occupy "a senior position with the bank," but declined to say if he would be leaving his position with Redpath, a Toronto-based sugar refiner.  Bank of Nova Scotia, one of Canada's five major banks, said its current vice chairman, Peter Godsoe, will continue in his current role.  Charles R. Pottenger, 50 years old, was appointed to the new position of vice president, manufacturing, for the Northwest Paper division of this forest-products concern.  Mr. Pottenger joined Potlatch in 1968 and has held several positions in its pulp, paperboard and packaging group.  Michael E. Cuncannan, 49 years old, was named Midwest regional managing partner of this accounting and consulting firm.  Currently managing partner of the Grand Rapids, Mich., office, Mr. Cuncannan succeeds Gary Wetstein, who recently was named chairman.  These changes are taking effect next July 1.  In addition, Thomas G. Spence, 55, was named Northeast regional managing partner.  He has been managing partner of the Boston office.  He succeeds Harvey D. Moskowitz, 57, who will become national director of professional services.  Jack R. Suzar, 49, was named West regional partner.  He remains Los Angeles managing partner and in the new post succeeds Al A. Finci, who was named a senior partner handling special projects for the chairman.  Jack Porter, 38, was named national director of tax.  He has been a tax partner; he succeeds Mario P. Borini, who held the post on an interim basis.  Stuart J. Yarbrough, 38, was named managing partner for Washington, D.C.  He has been managing partner of the Richmond, Va., office.  He succeeds Harry Linowes, who remains a partner in the Washington office.  William E. Mahoney, executive vice president of this concern's chemical group, was elected a director of the parent, expanding the board to 17 members.  Witco also has interests in petroleum products and engineered materials.  Abbey J. Butler and Melvyn J. Estrin were elected directors of this fur and leather retailer.  Each is a principal in Centaur Partners II, a general partnership that together with other affiliated entities controls about 26% of Fur Vault.  Mr. Butler is also president of C.B. Equities Corp., while Mr. Estrin is chairman of Human Service Group Inc., both investment firms here.  Benjamin Schore, president of a Hanover, N.H., real estate company bearing his name, also was elected a director.  He is professor of real estate at Columbia University's graduate school of business.  Fur Vault now has 10 directors.  Two outside directors won't stand for re-election at the annual meeting Oct. 11, Fur Vault said.  Hearst Magazines created a new unit to expand its publishing business overseas and reshuffled its top magazine executives in the U.S.  Hearst, a unit of closely held media giant Hearst Corp., named Executive Vice President and Group Publishing Director George Green as president of the new unit, Hearst Magazines International.  Hearst said the new unit will seek to start and acquire magazines in Europe, Latin America and Asia, and to expand Hearst's large magazine licensing business in Europe.  Succeeding the 51-year-old Mr. Green as a group publishing director is K. Robert Brink, 56, an executive vice president at the magazine unit.  Another group publishing director, Claeys Bahrenburg, 42, will assume control of some of the magazine titles in Mr. Green's group, such as Colonial Homes and House Beautiful.  Company insiders say the moves appear to intensify the competition between Messrs.  Green and Bahrenburg, who have been considered the top contenders to succeed Gilbert C. Maurer, 61, as president of Hearst Magazines.  Mr. Maurer is eventually expected to take on more responsibilities at the parent company, which also has newspaper and television interests.  The parent, once a big-city newspaper empire stretching from coast to coast, is now heavily focused on upscale and mass-market magazine properties such as Town & Country, Esquire and Good Housekeeping.  Magazine operations already contribute close to 50% of estimated annual revenue of more than $2 billion, and Hearst is launching yet another consumer magazine this fall, American Home, while it is selling one of its long-held newspaper properties, the Los Angeles Herald Examiner.  Hearst currently licenses its Cosmopolitan, Harper's Bazaar, Esquire, Good Housekeeping and Popular Mechanics magazines to foreign publishers, who pay royalty fees for use of the name and editorial matter in 65 editions in more than 80 countries.  Its overseas licensing operation will become part of the new unit.  Hearst's overseas magazine business also includes National Magazine Co., which publishes nine magazines in the U.K. "National Magazine Co. is a model of what we would like to establish in other countries," said Mr. Green.  "In the 1990s, our direction will change from being solely a licenser to a mix of licensing and wholly owned properties.  You put your reputation on the line with a license but not your capital.  Now we want to put both on the line."  Mr. Green, a former president of the New Yorker magazine prior to its purchase by Advance Publications Inc., will continue to have responsibility for Esquire and Harper's Bazaar.  "It makes sense because both Esquire and Harper's Bazaar are active in international publishing," he said.  "I also don't want to lose touch with the American publishing industry."  Mr. Bahrenburg will retain control over Good Housekeeping, Cosmopolitan, Country Living and Victoria.  While the executives declined to comment on the succession reports, industry and company sources said Mr. Bahrenburg may have inched ahead of Mr. Green because of the recent strong performances of his magazines, such as Good Housekeeping and Country Living.  Mr. Brink, who had been relieved of the post of group publishing director in late 1987 and succeeded by Mr. Bahrenburg, has for the past year worked on "special projects," reporting to Mr. Maurer.  In the new alignment, Mr. Brink will have control of Town & Country, Connoisseur, Motor Boating & Sailing, Redbook, Popular Mechanics and Sports Afield.  For families yearning to reduce estate taxes when passing small businesses on to the next generation, the Internal Revenue Service has just delivered some good news -- and a hefty dose of bad news.  The welcome news for owners is that the federal government hasn't closed as many doors to limiting estate taxes as was expected two years ago.  At that time, Congress eliminated widely used measures to freeze valuation of a company for estate-tax purposes.  But the IRS has retained a 1987 ban on using preferred stock to freeze the value of company holdings in figuring estate taxes -- once a crucial part of many families' strategy to keep their wealth from Uncle Sam.  There are still ways to get around the unfavorable IRS rules -- but families will have to act fast, tax advisers say.  If they don't complete their plans by Dec. 31, they may lose the opportunity permanently.  Since Congress acted on estate taxes two years ago, small-business owners have fretted over the problem.  Some fear their heirs will have to sell the businesses to pay the estate taxes.  Before 1987, owners could slash estate taxes by recapitalizing, holding preferred stock themselves and selling or giving their children common stock.  As preferred stock remains valued at par regardless of how much the business grows, the recapitalization froze the value of the company holding that was retained by the parents.  This saved estate tax on any company growth after the recapitalization.  When Congress killed this loophole two years ago with Internal Revenue Code Section 2036(c), many families feared the best hope of easing their tax bite was dead.  But now, the IRS's Notice 89-99 answers many thorny questions and shows that parents still have numerous options.  "Now at last we have some relief," says Jere D. McGaffey, a partner in the Milwaukee law firm of Foley & Lardner who chairs the American Bar Association tax section's task force on 2036(c).  "IRS Notice 89-99 tells us it's still OK for a parent to give nonvoting common stock in the company to the children without triggering a big estate tax.  It also still permits the children or the company to fund trusts that buy life insurance to pay the estate taxes.  And it's still proper to discount the value of a parent's minority interest in a company for estate-tax purposes."  By giving the children nonvoting common stock, the parent is able to pass along ownership of company assets without triggering estate taxes when the parent dies.  Tax specialists had worried that under 2036(c), the IRS would still consider the nonvoting common stock as belonging to the parent and it would remain in the parent's estate.  The specialists also thought that 2036(c) stopped the use of the life-insurance trust to pay estate taxes.  And they worried that 2036(c) wouldn't permit the minority interest discount.  Under the discount, if a parent owns, say, only 10% of a company when he dies, the estate tax may be on far less than 10% because the parent doesn't control the business.  Under Notice 89-99, the discount in the assets because of lack of control continues, Mr. McGaffey says.  But retaining the 1987 ban on the estate-tax valuation freeze using preferred stock will hurt many families, Mr. McGaffey believes.  "Without this freeze, it continues to be difficult for a family to keep ownership of a small business within the family," he contends.  "It's not abusive tax-planning for a family to pass on its business from one generation to another.  And we're going to continue to work to overturn 2036(c)," he adds.  Congress had passed 2036(c) because it felt that too many companies were placing too low a valuation on the securities remaining with the parents under the valuation freeze.  There still are a number of other ways for small businesses to ease estate taxes -- although none as effective as the complete freeze.  But tax specialists warn that under the current tax laws, a business has only until the end of the year to make sure these methods are structured correctly under the law.  If they don't, after that the tax law as it's currently framed will likely bounce assets believed to be given to the children with low or no estate taxes back into the parents' estate.  William Diss, a senior tax partner with Ernst & Young, notes that there are some partial valuation freezes that still work if properly done.  Mr. Diss is chairman of the federal estate and gift subcommittee of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants's tax division.  "For example, a father owning a business can sell the common stock to the son and take back qualified debt with a 15-year term," says Mr. Diss.  This will freeze the value of the company's assets as of that date.  But the debt must have fixed interest payment dates, it must pay a specified market interest rate, can't be subordinated to any other debt and can't have voting rights or be convertible into common stock.  If the father and son form a new business, the father may finance the business with a cash loan and freeze the value of his interest, but the father can't participate in the business in any way.  "The father cannot even refer customers or business opportunities to the business to retain the freeze," notes Mr. Diss.  IRS Notice 89-99 "opens up a lot of new sea lanes to easing estate taxes, but it creates a lot of icebergs, too, in relation to complex trusts," says David Rhine, a tax partner with BDO Seidman.  "Because the picture is getting so complex, a small businessman had better consult his tax adviser before the end of this year."  Joan Vines, a senior tax manager with Peat Marwick's national tax practice in Washington, D.C., says she expects the IRS to open up some added breaks in estate taxes for small businesses.  "But the game still remains complex, even though Notice 89-99 has cleared the air somewhat," she says.  While mergers and takeovers, imports and exports grab headlines, business alliances rarely do.  Nor do they generally show up in statistics.  Yet for small and medium-sized businesses they are increasingly becoming the way to go international, and for big business, they are the way to become multi-technological.  Alliances of all kinds are becoming increasingly common, especially in international business: joint ventures; minority holdings (particularly cross-holdings, in which each partner owns the same percentage of the other); research and marketing compacts; cross-licensing and exchange-of-knowledge agreements; syndicates, and so on.  The trend is likely to accelerate.  Marketing, technology and people needs all push it.  In Japan as early as the '60s and '70s a foreign business could gain access to the domestic market only with a joint venture with a local company.  Increasingly, such joint ventures are needed in Europe and the U.S. as well.  Only a few months ago AT&T entered an alliance with the Italian telephone monopoly to reach a European market dominated by government monopolies.  Even more often an alliance is the only way to obtain new, distinct and foreign technology.  Large computer makers buy into small software houses; large electronics manufacturers buy into small designers of specialty chips; large pharmaceutical companies buy into genetics start-ups; large commercial banks buy into bond traders or underwriters.  More and more, such alliances are also the way to get access to people with the know-how.  The many research pacts between American universities and large European, Japanese (and American) businesses are good examples.  And then there are the international alliances within industries.  Two years ago, two medium-sized manufacturers of specialty machinery -- one Japanese, one American -- sealed their agreement to exchange research results and to sell and service each other's products in their respective home markets by swapping 16% of each other's stock.  All three big U.S. auto makers have substantial minority holdings in independent Japanese and Korean car makers and sell on the U.S. market, under their own name plates, cars made by these Asian "friends."  These are all dangerous liaisons.  While their failure rate in the early years is no higher than that of new ventures or acquisitions, they tend to get into serious -- sometimes fatal -- trouble when they succeed.  Often when an alliance does well, it becomes apparent that the goals and objectives of the partners are not compatible.  Each partner may want the "child" to behave differently now that it is "growing up."  Each partner may have a different idea of what kind of people should run the successful enterprise, where they should come from and to whom they owe allegiances.  What makes it worse is that there usually is no mechanism to resolve these disagreements.  By that time it is usually too late to restore the joint enterprise to health.  But the problems can be anticipated and largely prevented:  -- Before the alliance is completed, all parties must think through their objectives and the objectives of the "child."  Do they want the joint enterprise eventually to grow into a separate, autonomous venture?  Do they agree from the start that it will be allowed, perhaps even encouraged, to compete with one or all parents?  If so, in what products, services, markets?  Failure to think this through was the main reason, for instance, that one highly successful investment company, formed to find and develop promising industries in Southeast Asia, ultimately was liquidated by its parents.  It had grown to the point where it had to do some commercial banking for its industrial clients.  But while the three of its four parents that were European banks were not active in Asia, they still felt that their child going into commercial banking made it an ungrateful brat -- and they killed it off in short order.  A similar failure to anticipate that success would -- and should -- make a joint venture a potential competitor explains the failure of a highly promising Spanish partnership between a German and an American chemical company.  When the venture became competitive in a product line that, while minor in Northern Europe, was likely to be quite big in Spain and Portugal, the European parent withdrew its support and slowly throttled the child to death. (The objectives must be revised every three to five years for each parent and for the joint enterprise, and more often if the joint enterprise does really well.)  -- Equally important is advance agreement on how the joint enterprise should be run.  Should profits, for instance, be plowed back?  Or should they be remitted to the parents as fast as possible?  Should the joint enterprise develop its own research?  Or should it contract for its research exclusively with one or both parents?  In whose name will research results be patented -- in that of the university that furnishes research scientists and lab, or that of the company that pays the bill?  Does the American company that markets the specialty products of its Japanese minority partner in the U.S. have the right to specify product designs and prices that fit the U.S. market?  Or does it act solely as distributor for whatever the Japanese produce?  This was the issue over which the partnership between the specialty-machinery makers broke up only a few months ago -- after the Americans had gained a 26% share of the U.S. market for their Japanese partner's products.  -- Next, there has to be careful thinking about who will manage the alliance.  Regardless of what specific form it takes, the joint enterprise has to be managed separately.  And the people in charge have to have the incentives to make it successful.  Nummi, the joint venture of Toyota and GM, makes the same car for each parent in the same plant (in Fremont, Calif.) with the same workers.  The car is a success under the Toyota name in the U.S. but a near-failure as a Chevrolet.  For the Toyota people, this car is their main U.S. product; their careers at Toyota depend on its success.  But no one at Chevrolet is going to make a great career selling the Nummi car.  For a good many people at Chevrolet the car, despite its Chevrolet name plate, is probably a competitor to "our cars."  For the same reason, the other cars made for American manufacturers by their Asian partners are also doing poorly in the U.S. market.  They are orphans.  The alliance, whatever its legal form, has to be managed by one of the partners.  It cannot be managed by committee.  And it has to be clear from the beginning that the people who manage the joint enterprise are measured solely by its performance.  Their individual responsibility has to be to the joint enterprise, not to one of the parents.  The one thing that must never be said about an executive working for a joint enterprise is: "John doesn't do too well in the assignment; but he sure looks after our interests in any disagreement with our partners."  -- Each partner needs to make provisions in its own structure for the relationship to the joint enterprise and the other partners.  Even if the joint enterprise is quite subordinate for one of the partners -- a small underwriting venture in Luxembourg, for instance, in which a major commercial bank holds a one-sixth interest -- its management people must have access to someone in the parent organization who can say "yes" or "no" without having to go through channels.  The best way, especially in a large organization, is to entrust all such "dangerous liaisons" to one senior executive.  -- Finally, there has to be prior agreement on how to resolve disagreements.  Orders from the top do not work in an alliance.  The best way is to agree, in advance of any disputes, on an arbitrator whom all sides know and respect and whose verdict will be accepted as final by all of them.  He should be empowered to go beyond the specific issue in dispute.  He should be able to decide, for instance, that each party is entitled to buy out the other according to a pre-arranged formula.  He should also be able to recommend that the joint enterprise be liquidated or that it become a separate business independent of its parents.  These are radical measures.  But for this reason arbitration will be seen as a last resort.  Such provisions make each party realize how much it has to gain by subordinating its individual interest, opinion and pride to the perpetuation of the successful alliance. ---  Mr. Drucker is a professor of social sciences at the Claremont Graduate School in California.  Starting computer companies has been lucrative for L.J. Sevin and Ben Rosen.  In 1982, their venture-capital fund bankrolled Compaq Computer Corp. with $2.5 million.  Two years later, when Compaq went public, their stock was valued at $38 million; today it would be worth $310 million -- 124 times the original investment.  But don't ask them to finance computer companies today.  The business is saturated.  Says Mr. Rosen: "In terms of mainline, hard-core computer companies, it's very hard to define an area where you can get to a critical mass of $50 million to $100 million" in sales.  Short of that size, the chances of taking a hardware company public and realizing big returns are slim.  Many other computer-industry veterans also are sadly concluding that the heyday of the start-up is over.  "It may not be possible to start a new computer-manufacturing company," says Richard Shaffer, publisher of Technologic Computer Letter.  Soaring capital costs favor established companies.  Low stock valuations hamper initial public offerings.  And the move to standard operating systems and microprocessors limits the technological lead that any hardware company can seize from competitors.  "Computers are a mature industry now," says Stephen Piper of Venture Economics, a Needham, Mass., company that tracks the venture-capital industry.  "Venture capitalists look for an industry that is growing rapidly and isn't dominated by existing players."  Venture Economics calculates that the percentage of venture capital devoted to computer hardware has slid steadily from 33% in 1983 to 13% last year even though venture-capital investment has remained at about $3 billion a year.  Some entrepreneurs and investors aren't about to give up on hardware, however.  Steve Jobs, the dismissed founder of Apple Computer Inc., is one.  His well-financed Next Inc. will finally start selling computers with complete operating systems this month.  In any event, the computer revolution is far from over; big advances in hardware are coming from established American and Japanese companies.  And some investors predict explosive growth for new firms making pocket computers, servers for personal-computer networks and image-management systems.  But even the optimists are cautious.  Michelle Preston, a veteran personal-computer analyst at Salomon Bros., says, "It's a lot harder to start up today -- by orders of magnitude."  This shift apparently closes a dramatic chapter in the history of capitalism.  In the 32 years since a $70,000 venture-capital investment launched Digital Equipment Corp., hundreds of electronics pioneers have started computer-hardware companies.  More than a dozen of the startups have turned into Fortune 500 companies.  Names such as Apple Computer, Sun Microsystems Inc. and Intel Corp. have become famous.  Their innovations include the minicomputer, the personal computer, the workstation and the microprocessor.  They have created hundreds of thousands of jobs.  For a brief period, they turned techie nerds into folk heroes and, sometimes, multimillionaires.  Their sagas are frequently cited to justify a reduction in the capital-gains tax.  But over the past five years, venture capitalists have been chastened by large losses on an estimated $500 million invested in a dozen now-unsuccessful makers of minisupercomputers -- cheaper versions of the most powerful scientific computers.  Investors who once eagerly sought computer-related initial public offerings of stock have watched in horror as soaring companies suddenly spiraled downward.  For example, Symbolics Inc., a Cambridge, Mass., maker of artificial-intelligence computers, was a hot stock after going public in 1984 at $6 a share.  The issue hit a high of $15.25 in 1986, when revenue surged 70% to $114.6 million.  But after three years of restructuring and huge losses, a scaled-down Symbolics recently returned to profitability on $67 million of annual sales.  Its stock has languished below $2.50 for two years.  In the wake of such disappointments, investors are rejecting stocks in hardware start-ups, and that bodes ill for innovative entrepreneurs.  With venture capitalists withdrawing, big Japanese electronics companies often move in, providing cheap capital and ending up owning a start-up's technology.  Instead of making big bets on a few hardware companies, venture capitalists are making smaller investments in computer-software companies, communications and networking concerns, medical technology, biotechnology and even consumer goods.  "We're all dancing around the periphery looking for niche opportunities," Mr. Rosen says.  Other venture capitalists are putting money into corporate restructurings and leveraged buy-outs.  Many venture capitalists were shaken last week when two of the best-financed and most promising start-ups in history -- archrivals Ardent Computer Corp. and Stellar Computer Inc. -- decided to merge in a shotgun wedding orchestrated by one of Stellar's investors.  The two companies seemed to have everything going for them.  Founded within weeks of each other by entrepreneurs who had each built big companies in the past, they make graphics workstations designed to be far better at showing animated computer simulations for scientists and engineers than anything available.  Stellar raised $60 million over three years.  Ardent, backed by its 44% owner, Kubota Ltd. of Japan, raised $108 million.  But each fell a year behind schedule in introducing its first computer.  Because of the big design team and the cost of sophisticated computerized-design equipment, Stellar burned through as much as $2 million a month, without any offsetting revenue.  When the two companies' products finally hit the market early last year, established companies had started to bring out similar products.  And the two companies' own competition sparked costly price wars.  But combined, they may still prosper, analysts say.  Even so, making the planned new company, called Stardent Inc., a profitable investment remains a long shot.  Combined, the companies will still be fighting a market war with rivals, losing money and facing a difficult period of melding their operations.  A stock offering is years away.  Investment bankers say Stardent would have to be profitable with sales well in excess of $600 million to give investors a profit.  This year, combined sales will reach $40 million, the companies' executives say.  For some of the venture capitalists involved, the merger was a painful lesson.  "One of the saddest days of my venture career was voting to merge Stellar and Ardent," says Russell Planitzer, a partner in J.H. Whitney & Co., a venture-capital firm, and a director of Stellar.  Mr. Planitzer concludes that starting new hardware companies has become too expensive for venture capitalists: "The thing about venture capital is, when you start out {investing} a large amount of money, it's hard to make a large amount."  Echoes Stephen Gaal, a partner with TA Associates, a big Boston firm: "It's a $50 million bill to find out if anybody cares.  You have to build an awfully big company to get a reasonable return."  Such investments are risked more easily by large companies, such as International Business Machines Corp. and Apple, that can subsidize research and development out of profits from older lines.  Moreover, improvements in computer technology seem sufficiently predictable that big companies are jumping on trends almost as fast as small ones are.  Once, computer generations lasted four or five years, giving a company that leapfrogged competitors time to solidify its lead.  Today, companies such as Digital Equipment are replacing product lines every 18 months.  The computer industry's move to standard parts in the early 1980s helped new companies, such as Compaq and Sun, that took customers away from established companies with proprietary systems.  But today, those standards limit the amount of innovation that small companies can provide.  "Given that you'll have one of five {microprocessor} chips, and one of three operating systems, it's hard to see that there will be any niche that goes unserved by existing hardware companies," says John Bayless, managing partner of SRB Partners Fund in Dallas.  "Customers are buying on 'warm fuzzies,' like sales and service."  Other factors also aid existing companies.  Although the computer market is much larger than it was 10 years ago, most customers now have settled on computer lines to use in obvious applications.  "There's no more low-hanging fruit," says Aaron Goldberg, an analyst at International Data Corp., a Framingham, Mass., market researcher.  And customers are replacing installed machines slowly.  Mr. Goldberg says one client with 2,500 personal computers told him that even if cost weren't a problem, it would take 1 1/2 years to upgrade to more advanced IBM models.  In the PC world, the crowding on retailers' shelves is already making life tough for new entrants.  The last PC company to achieve the size and profits to go public was a mail-order marketer, Dell Computer Co., last year.  The computer industry will still spawn a few more additions to the Fortune 500, analysts predict.  Among public companies, Stratus Computer Inc., a nine-year-old Marlboro, Mass., maker of computers that keep running even if some parts fail, had $265 million in sales last year and is growing 40% annually.  Among closely held firms, five-year-old Mips Computer Systems Inc., of Sunnyvale, Calif., expects revenue to rise to $100 million this year from $39 million last year.  Mips, which relies on 20%-owner Kubota for much of its manufacturing, has avoided big capital investments.  Moreover, partners such as Digital Equipment buy and resell its designs and workstations.  "I don't think the world is looking for another 1,000-person sales force or another semiconductor manufacturer," says Charles Boesenberg, the vice president for marketing.  Many investment bankers are eagerly awaiting Mips's initial public offering.  If new hardware firms do have a chance anywhere, it is making specialized servers for computer networks.  Such servers can be used to store files, distribute information, handle images and communicate with other computers.  One that is highly touted is NetFrame Systems, of Sunnyvale, Calif., which has raised some $17 million and has been promised shelf space by Businessland Inc.  The biggest gamble in the hardware area now is Mr. Jobs's Next Inc.  It is heavily bankrolled by such investors as H. Ross Perot and Japan's Canon Inc., which bought 16% of Next for a whopping $100 million last spring.  Businessland, the company's sole distributor, expects to sell $100 million worth of Next computers in the first year.  But the Next computers are just coming to market, and other companies are racing to incorporate their best features.  Last spring, a survey of high-tech investors and entrepreneurs at a Technologic Partners conference found a majority predicting Next would never achieve $500 million in annual revenue.  With investors continuing to provide money to the big venture-capital funds, venture capitalists are expanding their purview.  Mr. Gaal says TA Associates has recently started a "program of management buy-outs of growth companies on a slightly leveraged basis."  J.H. Whitney, the nation's oldest venture-capital company, has gone further.  Mr. Planitzer estimates that most of its investment dollars and about half the partners' time now go into leveraged buy-outs.  Whitney recently completed the $1.3 billion buy-out of Prime Computer Inc., which was founded as a venture-capital-backed minicomputer maker in 1972.  Mr. Planitzer is serving as Prime's new chairman.  the Senate's footdragging on executive-branch nominations, or the executive branch's failure to send up nominees for confirmation?  Senate Majority Leader George Mitchell says it's the President's fault that nearly half of the full-time jobs needing confirmation are unfilled.  Of course, to nominate someone, Mr. Bush needs to find people willing to move to Washington and endure the confirmation Inquisition.  Perhaps talented folks are concluding that life on the farm is preferable to life in one of the Senate's frying pans.  CBS Inc., losing the ratings battle for late night talk show audiences, is returning "The Pat Sajak Show" to the drawing board for an overhaul.  Although the 90-minute show will not go off the air, an executive from CBS Entertainment said it needs to be repositioned to compete for a young urban audience, one attracted to "The Arsenio Hall Show," syndicated by Paramount Television, a unit of Paramount Communications Inc.  The late night program market -- shows that begin at 11:30 p.m. EDT -- has become increasingly competitive and lucrative for the three networks, which last year earned a combined $429 million in advertising revenues from such programs.  NBC, a unit of General Electric Co., led the pack with its "Tonight Show With Johnny Carson" and "Late Night With David Letterman," with $264 million in revenues.  CBS followed with $104 million.  ABC, a unit of Capital Cities/ABC Inc., only produces the 30-minute "Nightline" and had about $61 million.  The Sajak show, which has been criticized as a clone of NBC's "Tonight Show", was hit hardest by the success of "The Arsenio Hall Show", which is sold directly to TV stations, primarily independents.  That show has attracted the 18-to-49-year-old audience, which, according to figures by A.C. Nielsen Co., is 47% larger for Arsenio Hall than it is for Sajak.  "Arsenio changed the late night landscape," said Rod Perth, who was named vice president of late night programming for CBS Entertainment in August.  Mr. Perth said in an interview the show will begin to feature a spate of unknown comedians.  "This is going to be the show where up-and-coming comedians will establish themselves," Mr. Perth said.  Another option under consideration is reducing Mr. Sajak's show to an hour.  Mr. Perth declined to comment specifically about the show's length.  Last week, Mr. Perth delivered a closed-circuit address to CBS affiliates about Mr. Sajak's show, and the ratings performance is expected to be a major topic when the CBS affiliate board meets Sept. 18 in Washington, D.C. CBS said it remains committed to the show, which premiered last January and is the network's first serious attempt to be competitive late at night in years.  Mr. Sajak has a two-year contract with CBS.  Since January, the show received a 3.1 rating/13 share, compared with a 3.7 rating/14 share for the same period in 1988 when the network aired movies and series at 11:30 p.m.  For the key demographic area of men 25-54 years old, the ratings are off 26%. (A ratings point represents 904,000 TV households; shares are the percentage of sets in use.)  "It's not doing as well as expected," said Paul Isacsson, executive vice president of the advertising agency Young & Rubicam.  "CBS had promised advertisers a 5 rating.  It's fallen short."  Mr. Perth said Mr. Sajak's show is profitable, but declined to be specific.  "The show has to start relating more to audiences in big cities, and not just to those in rural areas," he said.  "The list of guests also has to improve.  All we trot out now are television stars and movie stars plugging their latest projects."  Setting a shining example, Senators voted yesterday to kick their addiction to the frank, or free-mailing privileges.  The $45 million would now fund a program for addicted mothers and infants.  Did he?  Or didn't he?  It sounded as if Michael Boskin, chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers, did call on the Federal Reserve to lower interest rates.  But Mr. Boskin says he didn't -- and certainly didn't intend to do so.  Responding to a question at a breakfast sponsored by the U.S. Chamber of Commerce yesterday, Mr. Boskin said, "My own personal view is that there are signs of softness in the economy from where we are now, um, that further easing would probably be appropriate."  At least that's how it sounds on a tape recording made by The Wall Street Journal.  And that's how the man who asked the question, Chamber economist Richard Rahn, heard it.  The financial markets hiccuped.  Fed Chairman Alan Greenspan called Mr. Boskin's office for clarification.  But Mr. Boskin, after assuring his staff that he hadn't made any news, flew to Maine to deliver a speech.  He insists that he said nothing more than what he has said publicly before: that the Fed should ease if the economy weakens.  "I definitely said 'if,'" Mr. Boskin said in a telephone interview.  "Maybe I said it sideways or not into the microphone."  Four weeks ago, White House Budget Director Richard Darman made headlines when he said unambiguously on television that the Fed should lower interest rates.  Two days later, President Bush endorsed that call.  Mr. Boskin didn't join that chorus.  The Fed hasn't altered monetary policy since it nudged down rates a bit in late July.  Several Federal Reserve policy makers have indicated in recent interviews that they aren't likely to lower interest rates further unless they see additional evidence of economic weakness.  "Cold fusion" isn't hot news these days, but it isn't yet on ice.  Amid widespread skepticism, several laboratories continue to report inexplicable amounts of power from electrolysis devices consisting of palladium rods inserted in jars of heavy water.  Even some scientists who doubt these claims of excess energy concede that they're mystified by reports of sudden and unpredictable surges of power from some cold fusion devices.  "There are three or four things we still don't understand," says one member of a federal panel that earlier this summer expressed strong doubts that a new source of energy had been found.  The burden of proof rests heavily on the scientists claiming positive results from the electrolytic cells.  Other major laboratories, such as the Lawrence Livermore and Los Alamos national laboratories, so far have been unable to confirm that the electrolytic cells produce either excess heat or radiation that would hint at fusion reactions.  Researchers at several laboratories, such as those at California Institute of Technology and the big British atomic energy laboratory at Harwell, England, have abandoned efforts to duplicate the cold-fusion experiments, convinced that there's nothing to them.  Except for British chemist Martin Fleischmann and his University of Utah colleague, B. Stanley Pons, none of the experimenters reporting excess energy output claim to be observing the fusion of hydrogen atomic nuclei at room temperatures, the so-called cold fusion phenomenon.  They simply can't explain what's causing the results they are seeing.  "I don't feel there is any more doubt that this is a real phenomenon," says chemist John Bockris at Texas A&M University in College Station, Texas.  But he adds, "I wouldn't say that the principal point {of contention} -- the nature of the energy source and whether it's fusion -- has been resolved."  Prof.  Bockris's experiments have been especially mystifying -- and controversial -- because he claims his electrolytic cells are producing excess amounts of tritium, a triply heavy form of hydrogen whose appearance implies some kind of nuclear reaction.  A University of Minnesota scientist, meanwhile, says that pending publication of his results by a scientific journal, he won't comment on reports that he's beginning to get inexplicable bursts of energy from a cold fusion type of experiment.  But a University of Utah metallurgist confirms that he and colleagues, working independently of Messrs.  Pons and Fleischmann, are seeing the heat output from their electrolytic cells suddenly surge eightfold or more for several hours before cooling.  Messrs.  Pons and Fleischmann also have reported such unpredictable bursts of energy from their experiments, in addition to a steady output of heat several times higher, they say, than can be explained by known chemical reactions.  The "cold fusion" controversy dropped out of the headlines in mid-July when a special panel of science advisers to the U.S. Department of Energy said in a preliminary report that "the evidence for the discovery of a new nuclear process termed cold fusion isn't persuasive."  The panel said it could find "no convincing evidence" that useful amounts of energy could be had from whatever was occurring in the electrolytic cells.  The cells consist of thin palladium rods, encircled by platinum (or in some cases nickel) wires, inserted into bottles of heavy water rich in the doubly heavy hydrogen atom called deuterium.  When an electric current is applied to the apparatus, it begins to decompose the heavy water into oxygen and deuterium atoms, just as a high school electrolysis experiment decomposes ordinary water.  The energy required to decompose water is known and should equal the energy poured into the cell as electric current minus some small amounts to account for electrical resistance.  Messrs.  Pons and Fleischmann claim that the total energy coming from their electrolytic cells exceeds the electrical input.  They argue that this "excess" energy, in the form of heat, must come from some unknown nuclear process involving fusion of deuterium atoms inside the palladium rods.  Robert A. Huggins, a materials scientist at Stanford University, says he also is measuring excess heat production from similar electrolytic cells, but he doesn't speculate on the source of the heat.  The special Energy Department panel found such claims unconvincing because the amount of "excess" heat measured was small enough to be within the range of errors inherent in the measuring instruments used.  "However," the panel added, "there are reports of sporadic temperature 'excursions' or 'bursts' that apparently represent power outputs significantly larger than the input power.  These events cannot be attributed to problems with accuracy or calibration alone and are presently not understood."  These energy bursts, first reported by Messrs.  Pons and Fleischmann from their experiments in the University of Utah chemistry department, are now being seen in five of the nine electrolytic cells at the university's College of Mines.  A cell might be putting out a steady nine watts of power, then suddenly surge to 70 watts, says metallurgist Milton Wadsworth.  These bursts last anywhere from a few minutes to 30 hours.  "We don't know what suddenly turns them on," Mr. Wadsworth adds.  At Texas A&M, Mr. Bockris says the dozen cells operating in his laboratory are similarly erratic in their production of tritium.  A cell appears to be dead, then suddenly starts churning out tritium for as long as four days before stopping again, he says.  The Texas A&M researchers say they have ruled out contamination of the heavy water with tritium and all other extraneous sources of the element.  Mr. Bockris says he has detected weak neutron radiation from two of the dozen cells, but only for a couple of hours.  Physicists say the failure of the electrolytic cells to produce large numbers of neutrons is the strongest evidence that fusion isn't taking place.  Mr. Bockris says he now suspects that the output of tritium is unconnected to the weak neutron production.  Mr. Fleischmann says "it's too early" to know whether it will ever be possible to predict or foster the bursts of energy so they could be used.  As for charges that the measurements of excess heat might be due to measurement errors, he notes that such errors would work both ways, yet no one has reported a heat deficit, only a heat excess.  "We are absolutely sure of our results," adds Mr. Pons, who says he and Mr. Fleischmann are now writing a "seminal paper" that will "further substantiate" their initial claims.  The Energy Department's review panel, which gave its interim report in late July, is supposed to deliver its final conclusions on cold fusion in November.  With its food-related businesses nearing the point of saturation in Hong Kong and with cash piling up, Dairy Farm International Holdings Ltd. is looking for further expansion overseas.  Dairy Farm is one of Hong Kong's largest concerns and a mainstay of the Jardine conglomerate, led by Jardine Matheson Holdings Ltd. Despite the company's name, dairy production has long been eclipsed by food merchandising through local operations ranging from convenience stores and fast-food shops to gourmet delicatessens and restaurants.  In recent years, the company has built interests in Britain, Australia, Thailand and Taiwan.  Dairy Farm's Wellcome Co. supermarket chain, by its own calculations, has a dominant 37% share of Hong Kong's market.  Owen Price, managing director of the Dairy Farm group, says further overseas expansion is essential to keep profit growing at what he regards as a healthy rate of 20% a year.  The company's cash reserves of 700 million Hong Kong dollars ($89.7 million), its minimal debt and its ties to Jardine Matheson's financial muscle have regularly set the Hong Kong stock market buzzing with rumors of Dairy Farm takeover targets.  Mr. Price will only say, "We are keen to invest in building our business.  We'll have to spend."  He expects Hong Kong's contribution to group profit, currently 51%, to drop to a one-third share in the next five years.  Last year, Dairy Farm's net income surged 59% to HK$668 million, after dividend payments on preferred shares, well outpacing the 38% rise in sales to HK$17.58 billion.  Dairy Farm already has substantial holdings overseas.  Ten years ago, it bought Franklins Ltd., Australia's third-largest supermarket chain.  In July 1987, Dairy Farm widened its stake in Kwik Save Group PLC, Britain's sixth-largest supermarket chain, to 25%.  The company also has stakes in supermarkets in Taiwan and Thailand.  Mr. Price, an Australian with 41 years of experience in retailing, says he is committed to low-margin pricing at the Wellcome supermarkets.  Dairy Farm's main rival, the Park 'N Shop Ltd. chain of conglomerate Hutchison Whampoa Ltd., which controls about 27% of the market, is viewed as upscale.  But Wellcome, analysts believe, will stick mainly to its current philosophy and continue to benefit from slightly lower prices, a broader range of dry and frozen goods and lower rents.  While the chain has grown to 145 stores from just one when Dairy Farm bought Wellcome 26 years ago, Mr. Price concedes that room for new outlets is running out: "We're into almost every nook and cranny in Hong Kong."  An additional 40 outlets is all the market will accommodate, he estimates.  Some expansion will also come from the market's natural growth, as well as from enlarging existing stores and gradually introducing more expensive products.  Ultimately, he aims to capture 40% of the market.  One way Dairy Farm has widened its local reach is building up the chain of Manning Dispensary Ltd. drugstores, which Mr. Price expects eventually to nearly double in number to 60.  Another is through the group's 50% stake in Maxim's Caterers Ltd., Hong Kong's largest operator of restaurants, fast-food outlets and cake shops.  As well as benefiting from the group's bulk purchasing, Maxim's gains from Dairy Farm's access to prime sites through Hongkong Land Holdings Ltd., a sister Jardine Matheson company and one of the colony's biggest landlords.  Dairy Farm bought the 7-Eleven franchise for Hong Kong, Singapore and Malaysia earlier this year for HK$450 million.  Having since sold off the non-Hong Kong stores, it has begun integrating the chain's highly dispersed distribution network in the colony with Wellcome's and has introduced professional management.  The resulting room for profit growth is sizable, analysts say.  Analysts believe Kwik Save could become a major vehicle for Dairy Farm's expansion in Britain and then Europe.  Many say that a takeover bid for a majority stake in Kwik Save is inevitable, following the recent expiration of an agreement in which Dairy Farm said it wouldn't increase its stake.  Synthetics Are Making  A Classy Comeback  AFTER YEARS of declaring that pure cotton, silk and wool are the only fibers suitable for their apparel, a number of high-fashion designers are discreetly dabbling with polyester and other synthetics.  Designers say technological advances in synthetics are winning them over.  "The man-made fibers have finally risen to the occasion," says Paul Wilmot, a spokesman for Calvin Klein, who features in his fall collection a $1,250 parka made of a polyester called "microfiber," and a $1,300 wool-and-rayon pants ensemble.  Dress firm Diane Fres Inc. says many women like its $450 polyester dresses as much as the silk ones it makes.  The company offers polyester dresses to appeal to women who travel because the fiber doesn't wrinkle much.  Helping synthetics make a comeback is a new generation of consumers who are too young to remember tacky double-knit leisure suits from the 1970s.  "For most young people, synthetics have no negative stigma," says Bruce Binder, fashion director at Macy's in New York.  Nevertheless, most designers aren't playing up the synthetic content because they realize man-made fibers still have a dowdy image with some consumers.  While acknowledging renewed interest in synthetics, makers of natural fibers doubt polyester is about to take over.  "Despite improvements, polyester still has a long way to go," scoffs a spokesman for Cotton Inc.  He charges that even expensive polyester garments are prone to get fuzz balls and hold odors.  Ironically, there often isn't any wash-and-wear advantage for pricey synthetic clothes.  Victor Costa, a dress firm, says inner linings and fancy trim require that its polyester-blend party dresses be dry-cleaned.  More Designers Take  Sample Sales Public  SEVENTH AVENUE apparel wholesalers are swinging their doors open to the public for "sample sales."  For years, only those who had contacts in Manhattan's garment district were privy to these end-of-the-season clearance sales held at manufacturers' showroom offices.  But nowadays apparel firms have a wider array of leftover merchandise to liquidate because of offshore production overruns, as well as a smattering of showroom samples in small sizes.  So a growing number of savvy shoppers are bypassing department stores and even discount outlets to shop directly at the source.  At the showrooms of such designers as Perry Ellis, Hugo Boss and Ralph Lauren, clothes from the just-ended season are being sold for as much as 75% off the retail price.  The popularity of sample sales means that New York department stores are getting more competition from the very apparel makers with whom they do business.  "Our buyers are bumping into ordinary folks shopping retail at the showrooms," grumbles one New York retailing executive.  Many out-of-towners subscribe to the S&B Report, a monthly newsletter listing as many as 200 sample sales each month.  People schedule shopping trips to New York, especially in December, the best month for such sales, says Elysa Lazar, publisher of S&B.  Magazines Woo Stores  With Fashion Shows  MAGAZINES are sponsoring more fashion road shows to help keep their retail advertisers happy.  This month, Harper's Bazaar expects 500 women at a "Success Express" breakfast fashion show at a Nordstrom store in Portland, Ore., where local businesswomen will address the audience.  Bloomingdale's and Mirabella magazine will team up later this month at a $55-a-plate luncheon for 1,000 women at Chicago's Drake Hotel.  And Washington-based Hecht's department store calls its coming "GQ Live" fashion show with GQ magazine "a major social event" featuring a cocktail party and buffet for 1,000 people.  In all, GQ plans about 30 such fashion shows this fall in department stores.  The shows have become more popular now that many magazines are feeling financially squeezed.  "As magazine ad rates have been under greater pressure, more magazines are forging more of these marketing partnerships," says James Guthrie, an executive vice president of the Magazine Publishers Association.  For the retailers, the shows are appealing because they draw shoppers into the stores.  Fashion magazine subscribers, along with the stores' charge customers, are invited to the fashion shows.  The GQ show "goes a long way to position us as a fashion store in this town," says Tom Hines, a senior vice president at Hecht's.  Fashion magazine editors insist that their retail "partnerships" don't influence editorial coverage.  Arthur Cooper, GQ's editor, says the promotional events "don't drive our editorial pages or focus," adding that GQ's profiles of retailers are done for their news value "and not because they are advertisers."  Odds and Ends  THESE DAYS, a fashionable watch doesn't even have to tell time.  The Spiegel fall catalog's hot seller is an $18 watch that looks like a sun dial but doesn't display the hour. . . .  Businessmen's penchant for wearing loafers that show off more of their feet is encouraging many of them to sport flashier socks.  Retailers from Brooks Brothers to Bloomingdale's say more men are buying dress socks in dark colors but jazzed up with art-deco designs, paisleys and polka dots.  Hans Tietmeyer, state secretary for international financial policy, will leave his finance ministry post at the end of 1989 to join the Bundesbank's executive board.  Mr. Tietmeyer had been considered the leading candidate to succeed Bundesbank directorate member Leonhard Gleske, who is stepping down this month after reaching the mandatory retirement age of 68.  A finance ministry spokesman said Finance Minister Theo Waigel will propose the appointment to Helmut Kohl's cabinet, which is widely expected to approve the recommendation.  Mr. Tietmeyer's appointment would take effect Jan. 1 pending clearance by President Richard von Weizsaecker, which also is expected.  Mr. Tietmeyer, who is 58 years old, would bring to the Bundesbank extensive contacts with international policy forums, notably the Group of Seven industrialized nations.  He often has been the point man for Chancellor Kohl in preparatory talks for world economic summits.  After becoming a member of the Bundesbank's seven-person directorate, which administers the central bank's regular operations, Mr. Tietmeyer is likely to assume Mr. Gleske's responsibility for international monetary issues and agreements.  Mr. Tietmeyer also will become a member of the Bundesbank's policy-setting Central Bank Council.  The panel is made up of Bundesbank President Karl Otto Poehl, the Bundesbank's six other directorate members and the presidents of 11 regional central banks.  Although the Bundesbank is granted policy-making autonomy under West Germany's constitution, directorate members are appointed by the federal government.  The 11 state central bank chiefs, in turn, are named by the governors of their respective states.  One new directorate member isn't likely to change Bundesbank policy.  But Bundesbank watchers expect Mr. Tietmeyer to side with Mr. Poehl's monetary policies, which emphasize international cooperation over unilateral actions.  Other council members have frequently clashed with Mr. Poehl over his effort to coordinate West German currency and interest rate moves with other central banks.  "Tietmeyer is known to support a strong currency and a stable monetary policy, but he also has a lot of international experience and is bound to strengthen the Bundesbank's international thinking," said Ulrich Ramm, chief economist of Commerzbank AG in Frankfurt.  Moreover, Mr. Tietmeyer's close ties to Mr. Kohl's administration "could help bridge any misunderstandings between the Bundesbank and Bonn," Mr. Ramm added.  The world applauds Colombian President Virgilio Barco's crusade against the Andean cocaine barons.  But in Colombia itself there has been less applause, less admiration.  For Colombians, the events of the past few weeks are all decidedly deja vu.  Skeptically they recall that, five years ago, Mr. Barco's Conservative Party predecessor, Belisario Betancur, launched a similar offensive against the cocaine mafia.  Then, as now, there were brave speeches and mass arrests.  But subsequently the traffickers slipped back to their mansions, and the narcotics smuggling resumed.  The war against the drug magnates fizzled out.  Now, Colombians are asking, will Mr. Barco's current anti-narcotics push end similarly?  Also, and more embarrassingly for the Liberal Party government, Colombians like Conservative congresswoman Elvira Cuervo are wondering why their president delayed so long in moving decisively against the cocaine barons.  "I don't think the fight against drugs was regarded as a pressing issue," comments Ms. Cuervo.  "The (anti-narcotics) decrees, which have been announced, could have been brought in three years ago."  Bogota cartoonists have put it more bluntly.  After the murder in August of Senator Luis Carlos Galan, killed by gunmen reportedly contracted by traffickers, one Bogota newspaper published a drawing of the senator with the following epitaph: "A brave man -- cowardly government."  Mr. Galan, a declared foe of the traffickers, was the favorite Liberal Party candidate in the current presidential election campaign.  He was murdered the same day that a police chief was shot dead in Medellin, the center of the illegal cocaine trade.  The murders followed the killings of two judges who were hearing cases allegedly involving the Medellin cartel -- Colombia's largest drug ring.  Colombians demanded and finally got a firm government response to the traffickers' terrorism.  Under new decrees, narcotics suspects wanted abroad are now to be extradited (the first, a reputed money launderer for the Medellin cartel, arrived in Atlanta on Wednesday).  Their property is to be confiscated and, hence forward, they will have to establish the legitimate origin of their fortunes.  But Mr. Barco's legislative blitzkrieg against the traffickers was announced only after he had permitted drug-related violence to reach such dimensions that Colombia's continued existence as a democratic state was imperiled by the cocaine lords.  Five years ago, during the Betancur administration, the scenario read much the same.  Mr. Betancur, a nationalist, had been reluctant to extradite drug racketeers to the U.S.  He did not seem overly perturbed by the narcotics problem until traffickers forced his hand by murdering his tough, anti-drug justice minister, Rodrigo Lara.  After the murder, Mr. Betancur -- the instant crusader -- pounced on the cocaine gangs and announced that extraditions would be resumed.  Today Colombians who have stood up overtly to the cocaine gangs remain a minority.  Notable among them is Justice Minister Monica de Greiff.  She has intensified the battle against drug dealers, despite their threat of "total war" against the government if the current narcotics-control drive continues.  Like Ms. de Greiff, some judges have defied the gangsters.  More than a dozen Justice Department functionaries have been killed this year.  They include Helena Diaz -- the Medellin judge who in July refused to revoke arrest warrants issued for reputed Medellin cartel bosses.  Security Police Chief Gen. Miguel Maza also is a target of the traffickers.  He has disbanded death squads thought to be financed by drug gangs, and in May he narrowly escaped death from a car bomb.  In the past 10 years, dozens of other police officers have been murdered.  Journalists, too, have been on the hit list.  Among them was Guillermo Cano, editor of Bogota's El Espectador newspaper.  Mr. Cano was shot dead in December 1986, after denouncing the drug gangs, and the paper was just hit by a bomb last weekend; many dozens of people were injured, but miraculously no one was killed.  In common with most Colombians, many other journalists have been more prudent.  They have neither condemned nor condoned the cocaine trafficking.  For instance, in Medellin, the city's cautious newspapers have left it to their counterparts in safer cities to wage the anti-drugs fight.  Some Liberal and Conservative legislators have gone one step further, reputedly accepting campaign funds from traffickers.  According to unofficial estimates, there may be as many as several dozen tainted deputies in congress.  In the Betancur era at least, the drug gangs had little difficulty infiltrating politics.  Furthermore, neither the present government nor its predecessor can claim an unblemished record as far s "hot money" is concerned.  It is no secret that some dollars, deposited without undue question in local banks, may stem from the narcotics trade.  Likewise, past tax amnesties have favored both traffickers and the state's coffers.  Colombians fight the drug gangs with one hand while, with the other, they accept their cash.  Colombia, however, can hardly be said to be a cocaine republic.  At the most, some $1.2 billion in narco-dollars -- no more than 20% of total dollar earnings -- are believed to enter the country annually.  This amount is sufficient to tilt the balance-of-accounts favorably, but scarcely enough to drive the economy.  In a bid to please everybody, Mr. Barco has done nothing to rein back Colombians who are actively trying to stamp out trafficking.  Yet at the same time, at least till August, he has not consistently accorded priority attention to the narcotics question.  Had he, for example, been more committed to combating the problem, he would not have named a succession of mediocre justice ministers (excepting Ms. de Greiff, of course).  Defensively, officials cite the seizure statistics as proof that the authorities have in fact maintained their pressure on the traffickers.  Last year, from Jan. 1 to Dec. 14, the security forces captured 18.6 tons of cocaine and destroyed 826 clandestine drug laboratories.  In addition, there was the 1987 extradition to the U.S. of cocaine baron Carlos Lehder, now serving a life sentence in Florida.  But immediately following that extradition, the State Council suspended extradition legislation.  There were no further extraditions until this week.  Mr. Barco could have tried to sidetrack the legal problem -- as he now has done -- with an emergency extradition decree.  Instead, he mothballed the issue.  Only when the traffickers murdered Mr. Galan did the government take up the narcotics question anew in earnest.  Following Mr. Betancur's precedent, Mr. Barco declared war on the drug gangs because they had declared war on him.  The questions, thus, remain: Why did Mr. Barco, the belated crusader, dither so long?  Was it for fear of the security and financial consequences of a clampdown on the "trade"?  Or was it just a matter of misplaced priorities?  Whatever the answers, most Colombians today probably would agree on at least one point: No early end to the drug war is in sight.  ---  Mr. Nares is a free-lance writer living in Colombia.  BUSH WILL GET most of what he wants to fight drugs and may reap credit.  Congress probably will provide all or of the $1.9 billion increase sought for fiscal 1990, or more, after fights over offsetting cuts.  The GOP resists defense cuts.  Democrats may add spending increases of $2 billion annually in 1991.  GOP Sen. Rudman says he "can't conceive of circumstances" where new revenues won't have to be considered if anti-drug spending continues to grow.  Democrats push to put their imprint on Bush's plan.  Likely goals: more aid to local law enforcement and treatment and education programs.  GOP pollster Linda DiVall says Democrats hurt themselves both by "being negative and coming out for more spending."  Bush stands to benefit, but also risks blame if his strategy fails to produce visible gains.  Success with the anti-drug plan would boost drug czar Bennett as a presidential or vice presidential candidate.  MILITARY MOVES to fight drugs in Latin America raise warnings of risks.  Army Special Forces leaders are itching to send troops to accompany drug-aid equipment to Colombia, if Colombia requests military help.  They say units now in Panama could be mobilized quickly and be used initially as advisers.  But other Pentagon officials, hearing echoes of Vietnam, warn that a drug war in Colombia is unwinnable.  One top administration official worries that a heavy U.S. hand in Latin America will allow Panama's Noriega to exploit charges of Yankee imperialism.  U.S. economic aid might not offset the reliance on cocaine in Bolivia and Peru.  U.S. planes involved in anti-drug efforts have been shot at in Peru, where the cocaine trade brings in over $1 billion a year, equal to a third of the nation's legal exports.  COPS COMPLAIN that anti-drug money for enforcement won't be enough.  Despite Bush's emphasis on law enforcement, "you will not see many additional police officers on the street because of this plan," says Hubert Wilson, president of the Police Foundation.  The strategy focuses more on prisons and prosecutors than on police.  Houston Police Chief Lee Brown says more money is needed, "particularly for state and local" authorities, who experts say make more than 90% of all drug arrests.  Bureaucratic snags are a worry.  "Areas with serious drug problems should be identified" and given money directly, argues Charles Pugh, captain of police in crack-plagued Seaford, Del.  Says Miami Police Chief Perry Anderson, "I don't have any idea how much money we'll get or how soon we'll get it."  Columbus, Ohio, chief Dwight Joseph doesn't expect any aid to "trickle down" until at least next summer.  The police officials, however, generally praise Bush for taking a leadership role in combating illegal drugs.  EARS ONLY: Sununu left a social event Wednesday night to go huddle privately with a cabinet member at a dinner party about the extradition of a reputed Colombian drug leader.  The White House chief of staff apparently was concerned about the security of the phones in the private homes.  VOTER TURNOUT and racial issues will be keys to Tuesday's New York Democratic mayoral primary.  Koch decides to rely more heavily on TV ads to try to attract undecided white voters.  Dinkins's calls for racial reconciliation after the Brooklyn murder of a black youth intensifies his support among blacks and liberal whites.  DEMOCRATS HANG ON to the lead in Tuesday's Texas special election for Wright's old House seat, but Democratic candidate Geren hasn't pulled away.  Wright's campaigning helps Geren, but Republican Lanier plans a late offensive of negative ads accusing his rival of changing positions on defense issues.  PROCUREMENT TIGHTENING at the Pentagon gets a boost as new civilian acquisition chief John Betti quietly gains increased authority from Cheney to override purchasing decisions made by the services.  But the real test of Cheney's "reform" drive won't come until next month, when he receives proposals to shrink the enormous web of contracting offices.  PAC ATTACKS fade as lawmakers get cold feet on setting constraints.  House Democrats become a major obstacle.  Speaker Foley wavers, hoping for a bipartisan consensus from a task force.  Some House Democrats fear defeat without political-action committees, which supply half their re-election funds.  Rep. Swift complains of "paranoia."  He says both parties think they will be hurt by any change.  Bush fails to find a House sponsor for his six-week-old plan to banish business and union PACs.  Some House Republicans press their own plan to slash the maximum PAC gift 80%, to $1,000 per election.  But some GOP members defend PACs.  Rep. Edwards says they are being made scapegoats for his party's own weak candidates.  Latest figures show PACs gave $14.5 million to House incumbents during the first half of this year, up 15% from the 1987 first half.  MINOR MEMOS: Asked about his successful effort to quit smoking, Bennett says, "I'm not sure I'm a better man," but "I'm a somewhat bigger man." . . .  An omen?  The Texas congressional delegation plans a salute to former Speaker Wright this month.  The date is the 13th. . . .  An appeals court rules that Ohio Rep. Traficant must pay taxes on bribes he was acquitted of receiving.  In a continuing battle over the cost of health care benefits, a United Auto Workers union local has gone on strike against a Borg-Warner Corp. plant in Indiana that produces parts for Ford Motor Co.  As a result of the strike, Ford said it is considering reducing or eliminating overtime at several light truck assembly plants that use parts made in the Borg-Warner facility.  About 2,200 members of UAW Local 278 went on strike against Borg-Warner yesterday at the Muncie, Ind., plant after the company and the union failed to agree on a new contract.  The disagreement centers on the union's rejection of a Borg-Warner proposal calling for workers to pay a portion of their health care premiums.  Soaring medical insurance costs have made health-care benefits important issues in contract negotiations between management and labor unions.  "Health-care costs need containment with everyone sharing the burden," a Borg-Warner spokesman said.  He added that health-care costs at the Muncie plant increased 47% between 1983 and 1988.  Harry Logan, vice president of Local 287 said the two sides also are at odds over pension plans and work rules.  It's too early to tell how long the strike might continue, Mr. Logan added.  The contract expired Wednesday night after the company and the union couldn't agree on a pact.  Borg-Warner said new talks haven't been scheduled, but it hopes to meet with union officials soon.  The company said it plans to begin operating the plant with supervisory and white collar employees.  A Ford spokesman said the auto maker is considering reducing or eliminating overtime at the plants that build models using the Muncie parts.  The Borg-Warner plant, which builds transmissions and other parts, is the sole supplier of transmissions for Ford's Mustang five-speed models, and of transfer cases for several of Ford's four-wheel drive trucks.  Ford said it has adequate stocks of transmissions for Mustang, which is built in Dearborn, Mich.  But supplies of the truck parts are low.  The trucks that use these parts are Ford's full-size F-Series pickups and Bronco sport utility vehicles.  Ford also said it is considering building fewer of the four-wheel drive versions and more two-wheel models because of the the parts shortage.  Plants that build the trucks are in Wayne, Mich., Norfolk, Va., St. Paul, Minn., Kansas City, Mo., and Oakville, Ontario.  One thing both the South African government and the anti-apartheid movement agree on is that this week's national election in South Africa may be the last one that excludes blacks.  Some 70% of white voters cast ballots for parties that favor extending some form of political rights to blacks.  There is still serious disagreement over what type of democracy South Africa should adopt.  The African National Congress insists on a one-man, one-vote system to decide who will control the all-powerful federal government, one of the world's most centralized.  But moderate whites and blacks say any arrangement that grants absolute power to whatever group has a majority is a recipe for dictatorship: "One man, one vote, once."  They point out that the ruling National Party imposed apartheid after winning only 42% of white votes in the 1948 election, and with the help of skillful gerrymandering it has never lost since.  In almost every other African nation, the lack of effective protection for minorities has resulted in dictatorship, where even black minorities are often brutally oppressed.  The most significant aspect of this election was the extent to which the winning National Party gave up any pretense of trying to woo pro-apartheid whites.  Its election platform called for a "great indaba," or negotiation over power-sharing, full economic freedom for blacks and a new constitution.  There was no mention of "group rights," a code word for continued white domination.  The National Party's gamble paid off, and it managed to win a reduced majority.  Pro-apartheid parties saw their vote stagnate at about 30%.  In contrast, the pro-reform, free-market Democratic Party increased its share to 20%.  White leaders are now discussing a radical decentralization of the national government as a means of ensuring security for all of South Africa's polyglot populations.  Many political decisions would be made at the local level -- as in the United States -- including those involving public education, police and the courts.  "The Solution," a best-selling book by Frances Kendall and Leon Louw, goes further and proposes largely limiting the national government's powers to defense and the protection of rights.  Many blacks are also rethinking their politics.  Aggrey Klaaste, editor of the Sowetan, the nation's largest black newspaper, wants freedom, but he told Reason magazine he has come to distrust political power in Africa" -- a continent red with blood."  He favors black economic empowerment, and has launched a campaign to create a network of private institutions through which blacks can acquire economic muscle and freedom that "no government, black or white, can take from us."  Key to Mr. Klaaste's vision is the black "informal sector" of street traders, taxi owners and backyard shops that may represent 20% of the nation's economy.  Mr. Klaaste says economic empowerment is helping to undermine apartheid, even in housing.  He points out that black buying power now exceeds that of whites; consumer boycotts have recently ground to a halt the towns that refused to abolish some apartheid laws.  Meanwhile, the sanction strategy is losing support.  In May, the respected Gallup Poll found that 85% of South African blacks now oppose sanctions, and 59% believe the presence of U.S. companies helps break down apartheid.  After the tumult of recent years, it's clear that a quiet, largely unnoticed revolution in thinking is taking place in South Africa.  William James, 60 years old, plans to resign as chairman, president and chief executive officer if the takeover bid for Falconbridge by Noranda Inc. of Toronto and Trelleborg AB of Sweden succeeds, the company said.  The 2.13 billion Canadian dollar ($1.80 billion) bid for the Canadian mining concern expires Sept. 15.  Noranda said a replacement has been selected for Mr. James from within Noranda's ranks, but said it wouldn't identify the person until the takeover has been completed.  Several years and $3 billion too late, a federal appeals court has agreed with Texaco Inc.'s basic legal argument in its epic battle against Pennzoil Co.  The Second U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals ruled in an unrelated case that a preliminary agreement between a corporate buyer and seller didn't constitute a binding contract.  If the issue sounds familiar, it's because it was the key question in the Texaco trial in 1985.  That case turned on whether Pennzoil had a binding agreement to purchase part of Getty Oil Co. after the parties announced what they called an "agreement in principle."  A Texas jury found that the agreement was binding and that Texaco had interfered with it by swooping in with a higher offer for Getty.  A judgment against Texaco for more than $10 billion survived a number of appeals, and Texaco ultimately settled the case for $3 billion.  But, for procedural reasons, a federal appeals court never ruled on the contract-law issue.  Such a ruling has now come in a case involving the planned $13.8 million sale of Arcadian Corp.'s phosphate fertilizer business to Arcadian Phosphates Inc., a new entity created to make the purchase.  Arcadian Corp., based in New York, is a unit of Sterling Group Inc., Houston.  Late last week, the Second Circuit said in that case that a preliminary sales agreement is unlikely to be binding when some of the contract terms are still open to negotiation and a final contract document is contemplated before the deal can be completed.  The court said it found no enforceable contract in the Arcadian case in part because the preliminary agreement didn't specify that "a firm commitment" or a "binding agreement" had been reached.  "As a practical matter, it's a signal that unless all the i's are dotted and the t's are crossed, a contract is not likely to be enforced," said Stephen Houck of the law firm of Donovan Leisure Newton & Irvine, counsel to Arcadian, which won the contract claim.  Arcadian Phosphates had sought $53 million in damages.  Said Richard Miller, the Houston trial attorney who led the Texaco defense team in the 1985 trial, "If we had that {Arcadian precedent}, we would have been in high cotton.  I'm just sorry it wasn't on the books when the Texaco case came down."  The Arcadian case won't affect the Texaco settlement or the court decisions that preceded it.  But it may ease the minds of corporate executives and lawyers who feared that, after the Pennzoil case, they might be subject to suits for backing out of preliminary agreements in principle.  In the Arcadian dispute, the buyer and seller signed a memorandum of agreement that specified the purchase price, the timing and amounts of the payments, the fixed assets to be purchased and a final acceptable date for closing.  But the memorandum left open the form of payment, allowed further negotiations concerning a service-and-supply agreement that would follow, and made certain provisions for the possibility that the negotiations would fall through.  When phosphate prices shot up before the deal could be completed, Arcadian changed its negotiating position and sought new contract terms.  Arcadian Phosphates, in turn, sued for breach of contract and also sought damages for expenses it had incurred as a result of the anticipated deal.  Writing for a three-judge panel of the appeals court, Chief Judge James Oakes approvingly quoted a lower court decision that stated, "There is a strong presumption against finding binding obligation in agreements which include open terms, call for future approvals and expressly anticipate future preparation and execution of contract documents."  Judge Oakes noted that "a party that wishes to be bound {by a preliminary agreement} can very easily protect itself by refusing to accept language that shows an intent not to be bound."  In the Texaco case, the preliminary written documents also left a number of contract terms open to negotiation and provided that the deal was "subject to a definitive merger agreement," which had not been completed.  Pennzoil's lawyers focused on handshakes and other actions that they said suggested that the parties nonetheless wished to be bound by the deal.  Mr. Houck, the Arcadian lawyer, said the Texaco case would easily fall within Judge Oakes's category of cases in which a preliminary agreement wouldn't be binding.  As in the Arcadian case, the Texaco case was governed by the contracts law of New York state.  "This is evidence that the court sitting in New York takes a much more skeptical view of preliminary agreements than did the Texas courts," acknowledged Edwin Mishkin of Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton, which represented Arcadian Phosphates.  However, he said that each case must be decided on its facts and that the key issue in such cases remains whether the two sides intended to be bound by their preliminary agreements.  Pennzoil's trial counsel in the Texaco case, G. Irvin Terrell of Houston's Baker & Botts, also cautioned against assuming that the Second Circuit would have decided in Texaco's favor.  "Whether a contract is formed is dependent under New York law on the particular intent of the parties as evidenced by the particular facts," he said, "so a holding in one case may not be applicable to another set of circumstances."  But lawyers who represented Texaco and the various Getty entities said the Second Circuit decision was a clear repudiation of the Pennzoil rulings, and they only lamented its timing.  Said Texaco outside counsel Francis Barron of Cravath Swaine & Moore, "This new case just confirms what everybody thought before.  It's too bad Texaco's appeals couldn't have been decided by judges like the ones who serve on the Second Circuit."  The Arcadian case did provide some solace to Arcadian Phosphates, the jilted buyer.  The court permitted the case to be returned to the trial court for consideration of whether the company incurred expenses when it relied on a promise that Arcadian would negotiate in good faith.  If the court finds in Arcadian Phosphates' favor, Arcadian might be ordered to reimburse Arcadian Phosphates' costs or pay damages.  George M. Gentile, senior vice president of finance, was elected to the five-member board of this maker of factory automation systems.  He takes the seat of David J. Logan, president of the Gerber Scientific Products Inc. subsidiary, who didn't seek re-election at the annual meeting yesterday.  Separately, the company said it adopted a provision that limits directors' liability for breach of duty to their level of annual compensation in a given year.  Robert G. Streit, 48 years old, was named vice chairman of finance and administration for the accounting and consulting firm.  He formerly was managing partner of the Chicago office of a predecessor firm, Ernst & Whinney.  Thursday, September 7, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9% high, 8 15/16% low, 8 15/16% near closing bid, 9% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.80% 26 to 44 days; 8.725% 45 to 59 days; 8.625% 60 to 89 days; 8.375% 90 to 119 days; 8.25% 120 to 149 days; 8.125% 150 to 179 days; 7.75% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.85% 30 days; 8.80% 60 days; 8.70% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.29% one month; 8.30% two months; 8.30% three months; 8.28% six months; 8.28% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.85% one month; 8.80% three months; 8.80% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.73% 30 days; 8.63% 60 days; 8.52% 90 days; 8.50% 120 days; 8.40% 150 days; 8.33% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 9% to 8 7/8% three months; 9% to 8 7/8% four months; 9% to 8 7/8% five months; 9% to 8 7/8% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9% one month; 9% three months; 9% six months; 8 15/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Tuesday, September 5, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.88% 13 weeks; 7.87% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.09%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.25%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10.03%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.05%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.09%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Zbigniew Brzezinski, former U.S. national security adviser, was elected to the board of this chemicals and natural-resources company, increasing membership to 35.  Mr. Brzezinski, 61 years old, is a counselor at the Center for Strategic and International Studies and a professor of U.S. foreign policy at Johns Hopkins University.  Separately, Grace Energy Corp. elected Edwin C. Broun Jr. a director.  Mr. Broun, 66, is president of Broun Energy Services, an energy-services consulting firm.  Grace Energy, a Dallas holding company, is 85% held by W.R. Grace, which holds three of the company's seven directorships.  James P. Gorter was elected to the board of this provider of insurance to the manufactured-home and recreational-vehicle markets.  Mr. Gorter, 59 years old, is chairman of Baker, Fentress & Co.  He previously served as co-head of the Investment-Banking division of Goldman, Sachs & Co., managing partner of the Goldman Sachs Chicago office, and as a member of the Goldman Sachs Management Committee until 1988.  His election increases the number of Foremost directors to 12.  {First of a Series}  BROKEN BOW, Neb. -- Four years ago, this century-old farm town in the sandhills of rural Nebraska was well on its way to becoming a ghost town.  Chard Hirsch, who owned a dress shop on the town square, looked up one day to see police and television crews gathered in front of the bank.  "I thought the bank had been robbed," she says.  Actually, it had failed, along with two other banks and more than one-third of the businesses downtown.  Then, the fire marshal condemned the town's only hotel.  The town's deterioration "was like a total eclipse," says Tom Schmitt, former publisher of the Broken Bow newspaper, who left and now owns a paper in Ravenswood, W.Va.  By the end of the year, the few remaining businesspeople gathered for drinks.  "It was black comedy, but we had a survival party," Mrs. Hirsch says.  But unlike thousands of American hamlets that never recovered from the farm crisis, Broken Bow came storming back -- thanks largely to small businesses.  Today, a picture of vitality unfolds around the spacious frontier-era town square.  The shops are occupied, the void filled by several recent startups.  New ventures, ranging from a maker of grounds-maintenance equipment to a housewares producer to a telemarketer, have created more than 100 jobs in the past three years and generated millions of dollars in revenue from out of state.  In many rural areas that are managing to sustain themselves, "the entrepreneurial environment is the key," says Mark G. Popovitch, senior staff associate at the Council of State Policy and Planning Agencies.  "In many cases, small business is where the lion's share of job generation and wealth generation is occurring."  All over rural America, small business -- from light manufacturers and food processors to retailers and tourism and telecommunications companies -- is playing a growing economic role.  The shrinking of bedrock rural industries such as lumber, agriculture and manufacturing has galvanized many people to find alternatives.  A recent Small Business Administration analysis showed that businesses with fewer than 20 employees are by far the most important source of job growth in rural America, generating 63% of new employment between 1980 and 1986, compared with 37% in urban areas.  Wanting to preserve a way of life for their families in towns where they have deep roots, rural entrepreneurs often benefit from an extra measure of zeal: You can't just walk across the street for another job if the business fails.  The result in some rural areas is a slow grass-roots revitalization, with each dollar invested by entrepreneurs generating more wealth from sales outside the region.  Many federal and state officials are concluding that farm subsidies and incentives to manufacturers to open rural plants aren't the only way to treat the rural economy's ills.  A new crop of economic-development programs with an entrepreneurial bias has sprung up as a result.  The goal of the programs is to help diversify the rural economy, sustain people's income and slow a century-long slide in the rural population.  Rural start-ups have remained statistically almost invisible.  Many don't incorporate or seek conventional credit or insurance services as early as urban businesses, so they don't show up in standard small-business data bases.  In telephone surveys of hundreds of small businesses in Iowa, North Dakota, and other rural states, the Council of State Policy and Planning Agencies found that rural counties are keeping pace with other areas in forming new enterprises.  The bleak economic climate didn't seem to slow the rate of new business starts.  Broken Bow, population 3,800, is a striking example.  Rather than curbing new enterprise, the six-year farm recession that ended in 1987 seemed to stimulate the town.  Bob Goodner, a longtime resident, was devastated by the failure of the farm-equipment dealership where he worked and held a partnership interest.  For a while, "I wasn't in any mental state to do anything," he says.  But he and his wife, Joyce, had lived 32 years and raised six children in Broken Bow.  "I guess we have pretty deep roots here," says Mr. Goodner, an intense, soft-spoken man in jeans and dusty, paint-spattered shoes.  To pass time, he began experimenting with wood in his garage, carving tiny outhouses to amuse his family and friends.  He discovered he had a talent for designing wood products, and he began to craft housewares, including shelves, wall hooks and other items.  He and his wife traveled to crafts shows, then learned through friends of a home-sales distribution company in Denver.  Now, Goodners' Fine Wood sells products in 30 states.  The Goodners employ farm women and others seeking to supplement their income to do piecework.  They also own a retail store on the town square, Selectibles, which displays the work of 68 regional artisans.  The payoff for Broken Bow is significant out-of-state revenue: Mr. Goodner estimates that 85% of the two companies' projected $200,000 in sales this year will come from outside Nebraska.  "There's so much talent out here," Mr. Goodner says, showing a visitor the store's two long aisles of sewn toys, crafts and ceramics.  That reservoir of talent, coupled with low costs, readily available labor and the Goodners' willingness to work extremely hard, have given the couple a competitive edge.  Other Broken Bow residents demonstrated similar initiative.  Worried by the town's economic collapse, a few dozen residents organized a non-profit development corporation called Nest Builders and raised $40,000 by selling stock in $200 chunks.  The money was used mainly for loans or loan guarantees for small businesses.  Ray Brown, a leading entrepreneur, bought the town's condemned frontier-era hotel with three partners and converted it into apartments.  "I didn't want another great big empty building boarded up on the square," says Mr. Brown, who in 1946 founded Brown & Denisia Inc., a nationwide nursing-home developer based in Broken Bow.  On his own, he also converted a nearby furniture store into a small mall, offering cheap retail space to local businesses.  With Mrs. Hirsch, the shop owner, as its manager, the mall functions as a small-business incubator, a low-cost, nurturing startup environment.  The eight businesses there, including several retailers, a restaurant and a travel agency, employ 21 people.  Several others, including an eye-care provider and an insurance agency, have graduated to larger spaces around the town square.  In all, the 100 jobs created by Broken Bow's flock of new businesses in the past four years is twice the employment increase at the town's biggest single employer, Becton, Dickinson & Co., a maker of health-care products.  "We try our darnedest to create jobs," says Mrs. Hirsch.  "And preferably jobs not linked to the farm economy."  "The farm economy is always six months from disaster," says Paul Stec, a restaurant owner and one of Nest Builders's founders.  "We're all aware of that."  Reading through the Yellow Pages sparked ideas about what businesses were needed, such as a children's clothes store.  A suggestion from a real estate agent led to the formation of another new business, R-Vee Telemarketing, which employs 27 workers and had $390,000 in revenue last year.  Nest Builders has promoted or financed flops, too: a jackhammer for home and garden use, for instance, and a pressure gauge for farmers' fertilizer tanks. (The group now owns a garageful of gauges.)  A lasting benefit is greater economic diversification.  The farm crisis spurred entrepreneur Jackson Ideen, a native Nebraskan, to switch from making farm equipment to manufacturing grounds-maintenance tools.  He now employs seven people at Wikco Industries Inc. near Broken Bow.  Through catalogs and fliers, he markets equipment, including log-splitting and tire-changing devices he invented.  Mrs. Hirsch also worked with several small businesses to help them expand their markets beyond Broken Bow.  "I don't think {people in} rural America have a good grasp on their abilities," she says.  "There has to be someone who stands there and yells and screams and stamps his feet and says, 'Let's do it] Let's do it]'"  Dean E. Steel, director of government affairs, and Larry Schwartz, director of manufacturing, were elected vice presidents of this producer of fire-protection and security systems, electronic products and industrial equipment.  Both will report directly to Harry E. Figgie Jr., chairman and chief executive officer.  Rosabeth Moss Kanter, a professor at Harvard Business School, was named a director of this discount retailer, increasing the board to 10 members.  When Ben Gray set out to fight the drug infestation of Omaha by reclaiming a youth from the local gangs, the television producer looked for "the baddest one I could find."  He found Robert Penn, an articulate 17year-old who was a self-described "brain" of Omaha's crack business -- a $10 million-a-year enterprise that has brought unprecedented grief and violence to this heartland city.  "When you said gang in Omaha," says Carl Washington, a community activist whose boxing club for inner-city boys is one of the most successful alternatives for gang members, "what you meant was Robert Penn."  Until he began working for Mr. Gray last summer, Mr. Penn was part of a nationwide network of drug distributors loosely tied to the two major street gangs in Los Angeles, the Crips and the Bloods.  Authorities believe that the most powerful members of these gangs deal directly with the international drug cartels, which supply them with cocaine and other narcotics.  The gang members in turn distribute the drugs through affiliates, who have spread from coast to coast in search of markets and new recruits.  Members of the Crips and Bloods have been arrested for selling crack in 47 cities, and a recent Justice Department report says organized gangs now sell narcotics in every state.  The Bush administration has declared war on this spread of drugs, concentrating on beefed-up law enforcement.  But many people think the chances of victory are slight unless the alienation of youths like Mr. Penn can be overcome.  Mr. Gray believes that "institutional racism and double standards" are what created the gang and drug problems, and that the Bush plan's emphasis on more law and order "has nothing to do with the problem, so won't make any difference."  Rather, he thinks the problem is that "these kids feel locked out of the system."  His solution is "to give them a taste of being inside."  So far, he has succeeded with Mr. Penn, though neither is willing to proclaim victory.  With funding from both his Omaha television station and a federal job-training program, the producer has taught Mr. Penn how to type, write copy, report and handle the technical aspects of television production.  "The biggest moment for me," says Mr. Gray, was the day Mr. Penn opened his first weekly pay check for $122 -- roughly a tenth of what the teen-ager could make on a good day in the drug trade.  "He looked at me and said, 'This is the first time I have ever got money without having to look over my shoulder,'" Mr. Gray recalls.  Mr. Penn, who dropped out of 10th grade last year, plans to enter a high-school equivalency program this fall while continuing to work part-time at the television station, KETV.  He also has some new ambitions, far from his dream as an eight-year-old, growingup in Omaha, to emulate the gangsters of yesteryear.  "I'd kind of like to do what he does," he says, looking over at Mr. Gray.  Still, neither is sure that can happen.  "I'd say Robert's chances of staying out of trouble are about 70-30," says Mr. Gray.  "If he can stay out of the gangs, I think he'll be successful, if only because he's intelligent."  Mr. Penn says: "I can't say I'm not going to do anything bad again.  It's going to be hard."  New pressures loom.  His girlfriend, Antonia Valentine, just had their baby girl.  "It's mostly the money," he says, explaining the difficulty he faces in resisting a return to the drug business.  "Even the little money I have now, I feel broke."  Mr. Gray wants Mr. Penn to provide an example for others.  "What I had hoped, and it seems to be working partly, is that by helping a leader, a guy with charisma like Robert, the others would want to follow what he's doing."  Since hiring the gang leader, Mr. Gray says, he has been inundated by calls from other Crips members who also want to get out and get employed.  Unable to hire them himself, he refers them to local community groups.  His experience makes Mr. Gray believe the Bush administration is "definitely not in touch with what is going on.  What they need to do is to understand who these kids are and why they do what they do.  Most of them don't want to be in it, but they feel they have no choice."  While Omaha is largely a comfortable middle-class community, its inner city is a vivid example of the environment that has nurtured the spread of the drug trade throughout the nation.  Much of the black community, which constitutes about 15% of the city's 350,000 residents, is stuck in what educator and community activist Robert Faulkner, who grew up here, calls a "dead-end street," with virtually no middle class and no upward mobility.  Many of the city's minorities originally came in the 1940s to work in meat-packing plants and railroads.  But most of the packing plants have folded, and the railroads cut back on laborers.  Currently, 30% of the population is unemployed in the three census tracts that form the heart of the city's largely black and impoverished north side.  For those on welfare, the median income is $5,400 a year.  With legitimate employment opportunities scarce, hopelessness plentiful and little local organized crime as competition, Omaha became the perfect environment for selling crack.  Ask Mr. Penn.  "This is the best city for selling dope," he says.  Moving back and forth between here and Los Angeles, where he has relatives in the Crips, he helped establish the local crack trade, recruiting younger children to act as his lookouts, sellers, and couriers and equipping them with cellular phones, walkie-talkies and digital pagers.  "It's a business," says Los Angeles County Police Sgt. Wes McBride.  "What they're doing is setting up distributional networks.  Think of it as franchises."  When Los Angeles gang members first appeared in Omaha two years ago, "It was almost as if they were doing a marketing study," says John Pankonin, supervisor of the Federal Bureau of Investigation's Omaha office, who admits that his agents are now "just barely holding their own."  Within some 16 months, the city was facing what Rep. Peter Hoagland calls "a crisis," a multimillion-dollar cocaine trade with gang-dominated violence to match.  Omaha police say they keep no records of gang-related crimes -- a situation that critics say is part of a pattern of denial that initially let the city's guard down.  But on one recent weekend of gang-related mayhem, Mr. Hoagland asserts, "three people were shot dead, and six more were wounded.  It is the most serious law-enforcement problem to face Omaha in my lifetime."  Omaha is a lucrative crack market, Mr. Penn says, because the relative lack of competition creates the potential for huge price markups.  "You can take a $20 rock {of crack} in L.A. and sell it here for $100," he says.  By the time he dropped out of school last year, believing it was "a waste of time," he was earning as much as $1,200 a day.  The lure of such financial rewards is almost impossible to counter, concedes the FBI's Mr. Pankonin.  "It's very frustrating," he says.  "What alternative have I got for them?  What job have I got for a high-school dropout that will allow him to get up at noon and make $300 in the afternoon?  I don't like to admit it, but they're pretty good capitalists."  In fact, many who work closely with the local gangs believe that they are siphoning off some of the smartest and most ambitious teenagers in the ghetto by offering them entrepreneurial opportunities they simply see nowhere else.  "What's open to me?" is the way Mr. Penn puts it.  "McDonald's and Burger King?  I can't deal with that," he says with disgust.  Such rationalizations infuriate some of those in the community who are working to counter the drug and gang problem.  Mike Walsh, the chairman of Union Pacific Railroad, who has spearheaded a vigorous local business effort to raise $700,000 over the summer to provide positive employment and recreational alternatives to Omaha's inner-city kids, calls such reasoning "a complete cop-out.  It's no different than a stockbroker saying he can make a whole lot more money if he cheats."  "Don't tell me society won't give you a chance if you play it straight," he says.  "In every fast-food business in this town there is employment."  But it is exactly this kind of employment that the gang members are rejecting.  Robert Armstrong, executive director of the Omaha Housing Authority, who has won a national reputation for his hard line against drug dealers in the public housing projects he manages, asserts, "The gangs are offering opportunities to people who are being left out of the mainstream.  These are young people whom society has decided are incorrigible, without the self-discipline or skills to work in a legitimate business.  "What the gangs have done is taken these same individuals, and shown them how to conduct business -- how to buy wholesale, sell retail, do inventory and keep profit margins," Mr. Armstrong says.  "They also teach discipline -- how to pay your bills on time.  The gangs are willing to do what no one else is: Train these kids."  Certainly Mr. Penn sounds quite businesslike about his former trade.  "I like math," he relates.  "I sure did use it hustling.  We had to weigh the dope, and if you didn't round it out, but weighed it to the very last fraction, you could make a whole lot of money."  He is equally matter-of-fact about the violence he used to guard his market share.  At his mother's home, he says, he kept "a lot of guns."  "The people in L.A. taught me how to shoot," he says.  "You know, if you don't shoot them, they're going to shoot you, so when I did it, I really didn't care.  I just wanted to make sure that I did it right.  I wasn't trying to scare people, I was trying to hurt them."  Asked if he killed anyone, Mr. Penn says only, "No comment."  "It never was fun though, hurting people," he says quietly.  "My Dad told me that it's either them or you -- and I just didn't want it to be me."  Sounding like some executives, Mr. Penn complains that the more successful he got, the worse his life grew.  "The more money I got, the more out-of-control my life got," he says.  By the time he reached the age of 16, graffiti were appearing on Omaha walls with his name crossed out, a promise from enemies to kill him.  The police also were hot on his trail.  "People don't realize that hustling's hard work.  You got your police, and your enemies, and kids trying to take your dope.  You're tense every day."  What was fun, evidently, was having the cash.  He frittered most of it away very quickly, though.  Afraid that it might be seized if he put it in a bank account, he stashed most of it with his grandmother, who he says "didn't like what I was doing, but she knew what I was up to."  He says his mother knew too.  He spent much of his drug proceeds buying furniture and a television set for his mother and paying off the family bills, a situation experts say is typical of the way otherwise law-abiding families get corrupted.  He also spent much of his drug proceeds on legal fees for both himself and his buddies in the gang, a situation he believes "bought my way out of jail."  What comes through is a picture of a young man struggling to be a big shot.  "All I wanted," he says, "was respect."  He says he liked it when the younger kids would look up to him.  "They were all asking my advice."  Rev. Elizabeth Beamis, executive director of the Methodist Ministries here, who works closely with the city's disadvantaged, stresses that the gangs are not just about money, or just about belonging, though both are big draws.  "What they are really about," she asserts, "is giving kids a sense of empowerment."  She believes that many of the youngsters she has seen feel excluded from the dominant culture.  "They are sophisticated, they realize that there is a two-tier economy, and that the haves are getting more every day."  Mr. Penn reflects both this sense of exclusion and a deep cynicism about the country, a mindset that gives him little stake in its laws.  He believes that his teachers "didn't give a damn" about him and that the local police are corrupt, a charge Omaha authorities deny.  He also has no faith in the political system.  "Politicians," he says, "I think they're the real gang members.  Everyone knows that in this country money talks, and that politics is a money thing.  It's the politicians who allow the drugs to come here.  I mean if I can find the drugs, why can't they?"  He also believes that those with enough money and influence are able to buy their way out of trouble.  "You just get yourself a good lawyer, and you don't have to serve time," he says.  To a certain extent, Mr. Penn's sponsor, Mr. Gray, agrees.  "These kids aren't dumb," he says, "they see it" when the Department of Housing and Urban Development has a scandal, "and no one goes to jail.  They see it when the Reagan administration has more officials indicted than any other in history," and almost no one goes to jail.  "Believe me, they notice it when Oliver North just does community work."  "What I want is to be happy," Mr. Penn says, dreaming for a moment, "a big house, a pool, horses, satellite television -- to see China, and Mexico -- the American dream."  But he still sees himself as an outcast, just a step away from being an outlaw.  "Society is set up so that black people can't get ahead," he says bitterly.  "I'm not supposed to have the American dream and all that.  I'm supposed to be in jail."  The Department of Health and Human Services launched a major expansion of its effort to compare the effectiveness of different techniques used to treat common medical problems.  The department awarded research grants to study the treatment of heart attacks, lower back pain, cataracts and prostate gland enlargement.  Federal officials believe that the medical treatment effectiveness studies -- also known as outcomes research -- will help improve the quality and lower the cost of medical care.  Results of the studies, each of which will take five years, are expected to help medical societies set guidelines for specialists, increase information available to patients about treatment options and help the government and private insurance companies set coverage policies and rates.  Researchers will use records from Medicare, the health program for the elderly, and will work with large samples of patients to measure mortality rates, rehospitalization rates and other signs of the effectiveness of various treatment techniques.  "We know that there are significant regional differences in the treatments that different patients receive for the same conditions," HHS Secretary Louis Sullivan said.  "We also believe that as much as 25% of the treatments patients receive may be unnecessary."  Outcomes research is receiving more and more attention from officials looking for ways to improve the efficiency of the U.S. health care system.  "We're No. 1 among industrialized nations in per capita spending on health care, but we're not No. 1 in health status," said Dr. Sullivan.  Last year, the human services department spent $1.9 million on the research.  This fiscal year, which ends Sept. 30, it's spending $5.9 million, next year it hopes to spend $52 million, though Congress may cut the administration request.  The grants announced yesterday will provide about $1 million for the first year of each of the four studies.  A team led by Barbara J. McNeill of Harvard Medical School in Boston will study the treatment of heart attacks, which strike hundreds of thousands of Americans each year.  About 60% of heart attack victims are readmitted to the hospital within a year of their attacks.  Michael Fitzmaurice, the director the National Center for Health Services Research and Health Care Technology Assessment in the Public Health Service, said the study will evaluate the effectiveness of angioplasty, the use of tiny inflatable balloons to widen arteries that supply the heart.  It will also evaluate the effectiveness of predischarge testing and other procedures and medicines used after heart attacks.  Lower back pain, which afflicts approximately 80% of all adults at some point in their lives and sends many to their doctors, will be studied by a team led by Richard Deyo at the University of Washington in Seattle.  He will assess the effectiveness of different types of lumbar spine surgery, as well as nonsurgical treatments.  He also will study the wide geographical variation in hospitalization rates for nonsurgical treatment of lower back problems in an effort to learn if hospitalization is more effective than outpatient treatment.  The most common surgical procedure performed on Medicare recipients is cataract removal.  More than one million operations are performed annually, many on an outpatient basis.  A team led by Earl P. Steinberg at Johns Hopkins University in Baltimore will assess the three different surgical methods for treating cataracts.  Enlargement of the prostate afflicts 80% of all males by the time they turn 80.  A team led by John Wennberg of Dartmouth Medical School in Hanover, N.H., will study different surgical techniques, as well as nonsurgical treatments.  In the future, the government wants to expand its outcomes research beyond the Medicare population.  Mr. Fitzmaurice said the human services agency would like to study the treatment of inner ear infections, a common ailment for young children, and the wide geographical variations in the rate of births by Caesarean section.  The chairman and the general manager of Banca Nazionale del Lavoro resigned amid a growing scandal about three trillion lire ($2.64 billion) of unauthorized credits extended by the Atlanta branch of Italy's largest bank.  Chairman Nerio Nesi and Giacomo Pedde, BNL's director general, tendered their resignations to Treasury Minister Guido Carli amid a sharp political outcry over the apparent lack of controls at the state-owned bank.  The Treasury was expected to name replacements either late last night or today and various candidates' names have been floated.  But Budget Minister Paolo Cirino Pomicino, whose offices are in the Treasury, said in an interview yesterday that Mr. Nesi will be replaced by Renato Cantoni, a Socialist who is currently chairman of Istituto Bancario Italiano of Milan and that Mr. Pedde will be succeeded by Paolo Savona, a Republican professor of economics with some international standing who is president of Credito Industriale Sardo, a Sardinian bank.  Of the $2.64 billion of unauthorized credits that BNL confirmed yesterday, the bank said $1.02 billion represented financing given to Iraqi government agencies.  A further $700 million represents financing guaranteed by the U.S. Commodity Credit Corp. Also, BNL said it agreed to make a further $920 million of letters of credit to Iraqi government entities but that these hadn't been carried out.  BNL is analyzing whether these $920 million in agreements are binding and whether their execution would affect the continuation of the bank's regular activities.  BNL is cooperating with U.S. authorities and has concluded that the Commodity Credit Corp. will cover the $700 million.  The BNL scandal began last month, when the bank said it was under investigation by U.S. and Italian authorities for unauthorized export-credit guarantees for U.S. and Italian companies selling to Iraq.  BNL said the transactions, which apparently went undetected for at least two years, hadn't been authorized by management.  According to a regulator at the Georgia Department of Banking and Finance, the transactions came to light when the Federal Bureau of Investigation received a telephone tip.  The FBI alerted the Federal Reserve.  Christopher Drogoul, who was called back to Atlanta from a vacation in France after the irregularities were discovered, was suspended as branch manager of BNL in Atlanta shortly thereafter.  On Wednesday, BNL said that it intended to file a complaint against him.  State bank regulators say he has been cooperating with various authorities in an investigation.  Mr. Drogoul said Wednesday night from his home in an Atlanta suburb that he hadn't been advised of the bank's announcement that it intends to file a charge against him.  He declined to discuss the affair further.  "There have been all kinds of bizarre and wild stories floating around, and I've been advised not to comment," he said.  So far, it's not certain that the exposure to war-devasted Iraq will create losses for BNL, as Baghdad thus far has paid its debts.  However, the scam has hurt the image of the bank, whose shares have been suspended in Milan trading and whose debt rating is under review by Moody's Investors Service Inc.  In addition, some observers fear the scandal could delay BNL's plans to raise capital even as the need becomes more urgent.  The Bank of Italy has ordered BNL to comply with its capital-adequacy ratios by 1992, which would require the bank to raise two trillion lire by then.  With several trillion lire more of exposure, the needed capital could rise by a few hundred billion lire, banking sources said.  BNL in June signed a letter of intent with two of its minority shareholders, the state-owned pension agency and a state insurance agency, to increase their stakes in the bank in exchange for an 800 billion lire cash injection.  That operation was put on hold by Treasury Minister Guido Carli, even before the Atlanta scam was disclosed last month.  But officials of both the pension and insurance agencies said yesterday that they plan to go ahead with the transaction.  The 63-year-old Mr. Nesi, a Socialist who had held the post since 1978, was pressured to resign after admitting in an interview with Turin's La Stampa last week that what was happening in the Atlanta branch "had escaped us."  "When a bank manager admits that," said an industry observer, "he's admitting he's unfit to run the bank."  Under Mr. Nesi, a former head of the Torino Savings Bank, BNL's management had been criticized two years ago by the Bank of Italy for lack of internal management controls on the granting of credit, although the Atlanta branch wasn't singled out for criticism.  In Washington, Larry McElvain, the Commodity Credit Corp.'s operations director, confirmed that the lending agency, an arm of the Agriculture Department, has guaranteed payment on more than $700 million in exports to Iraq.  The agency would only have to make good on its 98% guarantee if Iraq failed to make the required payments to BNL's Atlanta branch, he said last night.  "They are covered for Iraqi risk, and there's no sign of trouble on the Iraqi end," Mr. McElvain added.  The Iraqi bank, one of the largest participants in the agency's export credit program, has a history of "making timely payments."  "I don't know the specifics of the Lavoro case," he said.  "But to our knowledge, there is no evidence of any violations of our program, such as misrepresentations or fraud in obtaining one of these guarantees."  ---  Martha Brannigan in Atlanta contributed to this article.  Paccar Inc. said it sold its Wagner Mining Equipment Co. division to Stockholm, Sweden-based Atlas Copco AB. Terms weren't disclosed.  Paccar doesn't disclose Wagner's sales, but Paccar says the unit has more than a 30% share of the world-wide market for mining equipment.  Paccar, which makes trucks and military equipment, had sales of $850 million for the second quarter.  Atlas, a supplier of mining and construction equipment, has annual sales of $2.5 billion.  The airliner smoking section is in more jeopardy than ever.  The Senate Appropriations Committee approved a permanent ban against smoking on all domestic flights, regardless of their length.  The ban would significantly expand the current law that prohibits smoking on flights of less than two hours' duration.  The measure has the private support of the airlines, which are happy to see smoking banished -- but eager to avoid offending their cigarette-smoking passengers.  By an 18-11 roll-call vote, tobacco interests lost in their bid to block the new language.  The industry is increasingly isolated in the face of steady pressure in Congress to expand the temporary restrictions first voted two years ago.  The measure would take effect 90 days after enactment, eliminating one of the few remaining sanctuaries for hassle-free smoking.  The Senate committee took the action as part of a transportation-spending bill allocating nearly $26.5 billion for the fiscal year beginning Oct. 1.  The House, as part of the same transportation bill, has already voted to ban smoking permanently on flights of two hours or less.  The language would extend this prohibition to the 20% of domestic flights that aren't currently covered by the no-smoking rule.  The same long-distance traffic accounts for a larger share -- more than a third -- of total airline passengers, and tobacco allies had hoped to draw the line at two hours.  "I take it I'm talking to a fixed jury," complained Sen. Ernest Hollings.  Although the South Carolina Democrat commands broad power as chairman of the Senate Commerce Committee, he was matched against a popular issue and opponent, Sen. Frank Lautenberg, who heads the transportation subcommittee distributing funds to favored projects for appropriation members.  "Two hours is not enough, ask the American people," said the New Jersey Democrat.  "Separating the seating doesn't separate the air we breath."  Industry opponents to the ban appear uncertain as to what strategy to pursue on the Senate floor.  But their best hope may be to force delays in hopes of putting pressure on Appropriations Committee Chairman Robert Byrd.  The West Virginia Democrat voted with Mr. Lautenberg yesterday but is determined to move expeditiously on fiscal 1990 bills and may have little stomach for a prolonged debate.  Mr. Lautenberg has invested heavily in the issue, and though his persistence has annoyed some senior Democrats, he has the advantage of a measure that has clear bipartisan support.  The Bush administration hasn't raised any opposition.  Both foreign and U.S. carriers would be covered by the adopted smoking provision, which would apply to flights that begin or end in the U.S.  Robert Horton was tapped to be the next chairman of British Petroleum Co. and is expected to seek a multibillion-dollar U.S. acquisition soon after he takes control of Britain's biggest company.  The 50-year-old deputy chairman will succeed Sir Peter Walters when he retires at age 59 in March.  The naming of Mr. Horton, an unusually brash Briton who loves America, was expected.  BP already is the largest oil producer in America, but still "needs a much bigger presence in the U.S.," says Bruce Lazier, an oil-industry analyst in New York for Prescott Ball, a Cleveland-based brokerage concern.  "That has to be the main strategic impetus of BP right now."  BP could spend up to $10 billion on a U.S. takeover, Mr. Lazier says, by financing it with a blend of debt and equity.  Los Angeles-based Unocal Corp., with extensive refining and marketing activities on the West Coast, long has been seen as a possible acquisition target.  Buying Unocal also could give BP a needed boost in its natural-gas reserves.  Other takeover possibilities include Phillips Petroleum Co. of Bartlesville, Okla., and New York-based Amerada Hess Corp.  Last February, Mr. Horton ruled out any large American acquisitions until the company pared its heavy debt burden -- a process he then figured would take at least 18 months.  But yesterday, his message had changed.  "If the right opportunity presents itself, of course we wouldn't be constrained by what the absolute level of debt happens to be," Mr. Horton said in a telephone interview.  "I have several interesting ideas up my sleeve," he added, declining to speculate about specific targets or timing of any bid.  Mr. Horton emphasized that BP has a strong cash flow and has nearly completed efforts to shed operations not related to oil and gas.  The oil giant currently has most of its coal assets and operations on the block in a sale that analysts estimate may fetch as much as $500 million.  BP's heavy involvement in the U.S. largely grew out of Sir Peter's 1986 ouster of independent management at Standard Oil Co. Sir Peter, chairman since 1981, installed Mr. Horton to run the Cleveland-based concern.  A year later, BP paid $7.9 billion for the 45% of Standard Oil stock that it didn't already own.  Mr. Horton then melded Standard with BP's other North American assets to form BP America Inc.  In the top job at BP, Mr. Horton likely will earn less than the roughly $1 million annual salary he collected while running Standard.  He said he will earn close to #400,000 ($620,200) this year in salary and bonuses.  Sir Peter's pay and bonuses totaled #514,558 last year.  BP won't limit its expansion efforts to the U.S., Mr. Horton noted.  "I hope the Far East will form a sizable part of that as well," he said.  "And I don't discount further rationalizations and swaps in Europe."  BP's U.S. asset swap last fall with Mobil Corp. "could be an analogy" for similar European swaps, Mr. Horton went on.  BP gained a quick entry into the lucrative West Coast gasoline market by agreeing to buy a Mobil refinery and related assets for $152.5 million.  In exchange, BP's Sohio Oil Co. unit gave Mobil 330 Sohio Oil-owned and leased service stations in Florida, Michigan and six Mid-Atlantic states and Northeastern states.  Depressed oil prices and BP's relatively high debt levels may crimp Mr. Horton's plans to enlarge the company's international presence, some analysts said.  "They would have to wait until they felt reasonably certain oil prices would stabilize at current levels," suggested John Toalster, an oil-industry analyst at London brokers Hoare Govett Ltd.  In addition, Mr. Toalster questioned the wisdom of BP's new focus on its core oil-and-gas business, because that business "seems to be having fairly modest growth -- mainly 1% to 2% per annum."  But analysts agree that BP should benefit from Mr. Horton's "commando" reputation for taking charge quickly and making bold changes.  As head of BP's chemicals division in the early 1980s, he earned the nickname "Horton the Hatchet" for reversing losses by slashing 60% of the work force and closing 20 plants.  As deputy chairman, he recently created Project 1990, a team of six top executives hunting ways to eliminate bureaucratic layers and shake up the corporate culture.  They are "looking at the {entire} mission of the company," Mr. Horton explained.  The possible upshot?  BP could move into second place from a precarious third among world oil producers.  "I don't aspire to size for the sake of size," Mr. Horton said in an interview in February.  "I have no desire to end my career in a BP that's bigger than Shell and Exxon."  Instead, he added, he wants to retire with BP the best-run and most profitable oil company.  The company said David Simon will succeed Mr. Horton as deputy chairman and retain his current post as a managing director.  BP also said Ray Knowland, chief executive of BP Chemicals, will become a managing director in March.  It doesn't always pay for a mutual fund to do the right thing.  At least that's the argument of the Prospector Fund, a gold stock fund that reimbursed its shareholders for losses from a portfolio manager's fraud, but now its founder is facing a stiff penalty anyway.  The Securities and Exchange Commission yesterday capped a 2 1/2 year investigation by approving an administrative order that imposes a fine of $52,234 on Prospector's founder Clark Aylsworth.  The order also permanently bars him from any supervisory or managerial position at a mutual fund.  Mr. Aylsworth, in consenting to the order, neither admitted nor denied the SEC accusations that he violated anti-fraud provisions of federal securities law.  The case stems from an elaborate fraud by Prospector's former portfolio manager that cost fund investors about $16 million.  The fund disclosed the problem to the SEC, fired the manager in 1985, and beefed up its internal controls.  Moreover, shareholders in the fund have since been repaid about $18 million, representing losses and interest, in three distribution checks.  The severity of the SEC action startled some industry executives because the fund's shareholders have been fully repaid.  And Mr. Aylsworth argues that the case could discourage mutual funds from settling with shareholders and paying them back if they're defrauded.  "The lesson to be learned by the industry is that if you have a problem, you are better off to stonewall it," Mr. Aylsworth says.  "Don't provide disclosure, because they will only use it against you."  The SEC, which hasn't yet publicly released the order, declined to comment.  Prospector Fund has been a hot performer lately.  This year through August it had a 16% return-price change plus dividends -- the best of 35 gold funds tracked by Lipper Analytical Services Inc.  The SEC tends to be more lenient on funds when they act vigorously to clean up their own house, says Charles Padgett, a former SEC administrator who currently is general counsel for J.& W. Seligman & Co.  But if SEC staffers believe a fund officer hasn't acted quickly or in good faith, the penalties often are harsher.  "If you're brought in screaming and shouting, you're not given a whole lot of credit," Mr. Padgett says.  The SEC contended that Mr. Aylsworth, while having nothing to do directly with the fraud, knew of some of the violations in late 1984 and early 1985, well before disclosing the problem to the SEC -- a position Mr. Aylsworth vehmently denies.  In the settlement, the SEC accuses Mr. Aylsworth of failing to properly supervise the fund when its former portfolio manager defrauded shareholders.  The former manager, Carl Lazzell, is out of prison after serving a jail term.  A Canadian court found that Mr. Lazzell was bribed by two Canadian stock promoters to buy millions of dollars of worthless stock for the fund on the Vancouver Stock Exchange.  As part of the order, the fund has launched programs to detect any future abuses.  Those programs include an inhouse auditor and counsel, plus a full-time compliance officer.  The order also accuses United Services Advisors Inc., the fund's adviser, of violating anti-fraud provisions of federal securities law.  And the order forces Mr. Aylsworth to "pursue the sale, merger or acquisition" of United Services or the sale of his equity holdings in the firm.  "We certainly welcome this opportunity to bring this chapter to a close," says Bobby Duncan, United Services' president and chief executive.  "The company is poised to move forward into the 1990s a stronger and wiser organization."  The fund already has notified shareholders that it reached a definitive agreement to sell a controlling block of stock to Frank Holmes, an officer of Merit Investment Corp., a Toronto investment dealer.  The fund also told holders that Mr. Aylsworth will continue as a consultant to the fund.  In addition to barring Mr. Aylsworth from acting in a supervisory or managerial role in any mutual fund, the order forces him to pay $52,234 to United Services.  That figure represents profits he may have made on the sale of his United Services stock when that company went public in 1985, before the fraud was disclosed.  The Federal Aviation Administration, in a response to the July crash of a United Airlines plane in Sioux City, Iowa, is preparing to order airlines to conduct expensive new tests on DC-10-10 jet engines.  The tests, designed to determine whether the engines' fan disks contain imperfections, will very likely cost the airlines a total of "$10 million or more," according to Anthony Broderick, the FAA's acting executive director for regulatory standards and compliance.  Most affected would be United, a unit of UAL Corp., which has 141 of these engines, and American Airlines, a unit of AMR Corp., which has 147 such engines.  Other U.S. and foreign airlines have an additional 199 of the engines, which includes spares.  Only the engines on DC-10-10s, the kind of aircraft that crashed in Iowa July 19, will have to be tested.  There are three CF6-6 engines made by General Electric Co. of Fairfield, Conn., on each DC-10-10, which is made by McDonnell Douglas Corp.  In the Iowa accident, the tail engine blew apart, apparently severing the plane's hydraulic lines, which control most major plane movements.  After struggling to control the plane, the pilots crashed into a cornfield while attempting an emergency landing.  One hundred eleven people were killed.  A spokesman for GE, the giant electrical products, financial services and broadcasting concern, said, "It is premature to comment."  Safety investigators suspect the engine broke up after the fan disk, a 300-pound hunk of titanium that holds the fan blades, failed.  Such a disk failure could have been caused by imperfections or cracks in the titanium.  But federal officials can't be sure because they haven't been able to find the disk pieces among the tall corn.  But in extensive testing of engine disks made from the same titanium ingot as the one on the United plane, GE and FAA engineers have found a tiny crack in one of the disks.  Mr. Broderick said he doesn't know whether the crack relates to the accident, but added that it is so small, it probably doesn't have safety significance.  In any case, the FAA is planning to require airlines to test all DC-10-10 engines, using the latest technology.  However, the plans could change if the agency uncovers information that calls for a different course of action.  Under the expected order, which will probably be issued this month, the airlines would have to remove the engines from the aircraft, take them apart, and put the three-foot-wide disks into a water chamber where they would be bombarded with ultrasonic waves.  A computer would then analyze whether there are any "echoes" and what they mean.  The testing, besides being expensive, could be disruptive for the airlines.  The FAA estimates it will take 40 hours to test each disk.  European Community finance ministers, meeting this weekend at the French Mediterranean resort of Antibes, will seek to avoid a clash over long-term goals as they consider the initial steps of their plan to create full monetary union.  The meeting, which has been dubbed a "brainstorming session" by EC officials, probably will concentrate on preliminary details of the so-called Delors Report, a long-term plan that envisions creation of a federal system of central banks and a common EC currency.  Nigel Lawson, British chancellor of the exchequer, is expected to argue for an alternative to the Delors format, though it is unclear whether he will offer a specific counterproposal at this meeting.  French officials, who are in charge of the session, say they expect the ministers to concentrate on topics on which there already is general agreement.  The council will take its first serious look at two proposals seen as the backbone of the Delors plan's initial steps known as Stage One.  The first is a revision of 1964 legislation to give central bank governors a more active role in coordinating EC monetary policy.  A second will seek to revise the loose guidelines set in 1974 to bolster the policy-making function of EC finance ministers when they meet together as the EC Council of Ministers.  The ministers will also discuss EC tax policy and review the macroeconomic situation in the EC.  This work on Stage One is not highly controversial and is likely to move ahead regardless of any debate over the longterm goals.  "It will still be very interesting to see what emphasis the ministers put on things and whether there will be any major detours en route" towards creating a single currency, said a French official involved in preparations for the meeting.  Last June in Madrid, EC leaders agreed to proceed with their goal of economic and monetary union and to take steps so that Stage One could be in operation by July 1990.  French Finance Minister Pierre Beregovoy, who will head the meeting this weekend, hopes this decision-making process can be completed by November.  A third working paper, likely to be the most controversial, will broadly outline the list of longer-term issues to be tackled in setting up the second and third stages of the Delors report.  This paper discusses procedures for setting up an intergovernmental conference that would be called to amend the EC's founding Treaty of Rome.  Such a treaty amendment is needed eventually to transfer control over economic and monetary policy from the individual countries to the Council of Ministers and other collective EC institutions.  Mr. Lawson is expected to repeat British reservations about such a treaty change.  But Britain's search for specific alternatives on monetary union apparently hasn't yet produced anything solid.  Ideas floated include proposals for separate, but competing, currencies and a return to something akin to the former gold standard.  One problem with the competing currencies is that if they were allowed to float freely, there would be little role for the European Monetary System, which Britain has said it will join someday.  Following the Madrid summit, a group at Britain's Treasury Department began a full-time search for ideas that could be called monetary union, but that didn't involve a single European currency, or a powerful EC banking authority similar to the Federal Reserve Board in Washington.  Federal prosecutors are investigating possible theft, money laundering and kickbacks in the stock-loan departments of major brokerage firms during most of the 1980s, according to people familiar with the probe.  With the expected guilty plea and cooperation of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.'s former head of stock-loan operations, Dennis T. Palmeri, the government could expose a variety of wrongdoing that has long been suspected of flourishing in stock-loan operations.  The government, say people familiar with the probe, is investigating whether some takeover speculators made illegal payments to stock-loan employees, including kickbacks to top officials.  The government is also probing whether officials in stock-loan departments of major brokerage firms engaged in a scheme in which they skimmed money from stock-loan fees and then laundered the stolen funds overseas.  And investigators are examining possible violations of the Federal Reserve Board's Regulation T, which governs the amount of credit that brokers can extend for customers' stock purchases.  Shearson's Mr. Palmeri, who resigned from the securities firm in June, has negotiated a plea agreement with the Manhattan U.S. attorney's office that calls for him to plead guilty to felony charges and cooperate with the government's investigation, according to individuals familiar with the case.  Mr. Palmeri couldn't be reached for comment.  His lawyer, Stanley S. Arkin, and federal prosecutors involved in the case either declined to comment or couldn't be reached.  It couldn't be learned what Mr. Palmeri has told government investigators.  Stock loans are a lucrative but little-known business on Wall Street in which securities firms and investors lend big blocks of securities to each other in exchange for fees or the use of money.  But what started decades ago as a service to clients who needed quick delivery of securities that may not have been available has mushroomed into a money-making machine fueled by takeover speculators, pension funds and other investors and operating almost anonymously from the back offices of major brokerage firms.  The stock-loan business, while vital to Wall Street, is "subject to a great many abuses," says Ira Lee Sorkin, a New York lawyer who brought several stock-loan abuse cases when he headed the Securities and Exchange Commission's New York office from 1984 to 1986.  "Let me tell you, there's a lot of money to be made in stock loans," says Mr. Sorkin.  But he adds: "Based on my experience, there was very little supervision over the stock-loan activities of firms."  What makes supervision of the industry even more difficult, he says, are the large numbers of stock-loan "finders," or firms that seek commissions from matching up lenders and borrowers.  These commission arrangements often lead to kickbacks and other fraud, Mr. Sorkin says.  The stock-loan business "is a back-office function -- where favors are a normal part of doing business -- that most senior managements don't understand and therefore don't have the relevant controls to police," says Wall Street analyst A. Michael Lipper, president of Lipper Analytical Services Inc.  While they may not understand it, managements do know that stock-loan departments can reap big profits.  Accordingly, salaries of some stock-loan employees now rival those of top stock and bond traders, Wall Street executives say.  The Manhattan U.S. attorney's office has been probing the stock-loan business for at least the past two years, people familiar with the investigation say.  Now, with Mr. Palmeri's expected cooperation, years of possible wrongdoing involving stock loans could be exposed.  Mr. Palmeri, who held the title of executive vice president at Shearson, a 62%-owned unit of American Express Co., was a major player in the stock-loan industry.  His stock-loan department typically generated over $100 million in revenue a year, say industry officials.  "Dennis was a big wheeler-dealer," says the head of a stockloan department on Wall Street who asked not to be identified.  Mr. Palmeri handled billions of dollars of securities and his influence was felt by other firms that dealt in stock loans.  Among his other dealings, he was an active supplier of securities to such major takeover speculators as Ivan F. Boesky, who is now in jail.  Indeed, people familiar with the government's probe say it has been aided either directly or indirectly by the investigation of Mr. Boesky for insider trading.  In recent years, the SEC has brought a variety of civil charges involving securities-law violations by the stock-loan departments of brokerage firms.  Criminal charges have been rare.  But in 1986, a former supervisor in the stock-receiving department at Merrill Lynch & Co. pleaded guilty to three felony charges related to a scheme that defrauded Merrill of $500,000 in interest income on borrowed stock.  The government alleged that the head of a stock-loan finder firm and at least two Merrill Lynch employees arranged bogus loans of stock to Merrill Lynch that allowed the finder firm to illegally pocket interest income.  In a 1985 civil case, the SEC censured Thomson McKinnon Securities Inc., alleging that its stock-loan department in September 1982 used a total of $39.3 million in securities fully paid for by customers as collateral for loans obtained by Thomson McKinnon.  Stock-loan departments can use as collateral securities that are bought by customers partially on credit; however, they aren't allowed to use fully paid securities for such a purpose without the customer's approval.  Thomson McKinnon settled the SEC case without admitting or denying wrongdoing.  In this and other SEC enforcement actions brought since 1971, the SEC has punished brokerage firms by levying fines equal to several days' stock-loan profits.  Poland's prime minister, Tadeusz Mazowiecki, unveiled his cabinet nominees before a closed meeting of Solidarity's Parliamentary deputies.  As scraps of the cabinet list were dropped by deputies in the Parliament's entry hall, it appeared that Solidarity would take less than half the portfolios for itself.  The Peasants Party, without which Solidarity can't govern, would get four, and the Democrats two.  But the Communist Party, as a condition for giving way to Solidarity, will retain the levers of coercion: the ministries of defense and interior.  While the Communists remain outside the government coalition, they evidently have also been granted at least three other posts.  These were said to include transportation, giving the party more control over strategic hardware, and a much-reduced but still important central-planning office.  The Communists are expected to receive a deputy prime minister's appointment as well.  Parliament will hold hearings on the proposed cabinet over the weekend, and vote on confirmation early next week.  The Communists apparently lost their bid to run the Foreign Ministry, however.  In a compromise that favors Solidarity, the job reportedly will go to a Roman Catholic intellectual, Krzysztof Skubiszewski, who has served on an advisory council to the head of the Polish church.  He has no political ties.  As a sop, but an economically important one, the Communists were offered the ministry of foreign trade, Solidarity deputies said.  Solidarity will shoulder much of the rest of the burden of extracting the economy from three decades of Stalinism and one decade of failed reform.  Mr. Mazowiecki's choices seem to lean toward liberals who favor a free market, seasoned by social conscience, rather than toward backers of a welfare state.  A 42-year old economist, Lezek Balcerowicz, was said to be his pick as minister of finance and as deputy prime minister overseeing the economy.  The prime minister was expected to name as Industry Minister Tadeusz Syryjczyk, a member of a Krakow society for the promotion of private enterprise.  The head of a similar group in Warsaw, Aleksander Paszynski, would take charge of housing.  And a longtime Solidarity adviser, Witold Trzeciakowski, would chair a new council of economic advisers.  The main sticking point last night was over the question of agricultural policy.  The Peasant Party insisted on filling the job with the same man who has overseen agriculture under Communist rule, Kazimierz Olesiak.  Mr. Mazowiecki reportedly will name another Peasant Party member of his own choice.  Meanwhile, Rural Solidarity, an independent group closely related to Solidarity, was demanding the agriculture portfolio, too.  "The Peasant Party, which counts the least in the countryside, got a deputy premiership and several portfolios and we, the most important, don't get anything," Jozef Slisz, the Rural Solidarity head, wrote in yesterday's Solidarity newspaper.  But he said his organization won't "sulk," and will vote with Solidarity anyway.  The Delaware Chancery Court removed what is likely to be the last obstacle to Time Warner Inc.'s acquisition of Warner Communications Inc.  The court rejected the contention of Chris-Craft Industries Inc., formerly the largest shareholder in Warner Communications, that it had the right to veto the structure of Time Warner's offer for the Warner shares that Time Warner doesn't already own.  Chris-Craft, which has feuded often with Warner since swapping ownership stakes with the entertainment company five years ago, had argued that its large holding of Warner preferred shares entitled Chris-Craft to a separate vote on the second step of Time Warner's two-step offer for Warner Communications.  The formerly named Time Inc. had made its $70-a-share offer for Warner without needing or soliciting any approval from Time shareholders.  Chris-Craft had argued that its own approval was needed as a major Warner holder.  But Delaware Chancery Court Judge William Allen ruled against Chris-Craft's claim, which the company made after Warner had filed suit asking the court to clarify the rules regarding the preferred shares.  In July, Judge Allen ruled against Paramount Communications Inc.'s move to block the Warner acquisition.  Officials at Chris-Craft and Time Warner couldn't be reached to comment.  Time Warner currently owns about 60% of Warner's shares and has offered a package of preferred stock, plus Warner's own stake in a Chris-Craft subsidiary, for the remainder.  A Warner spokeswoman said the acquisition is expected to be completed by year end.  Continuing to shake off the effect of lower yields on money-market mutual funds, investors added $1.26 billion to funds in the week ended Wednesday, raising the total to $344.65 billion.  Individual investors provided the bulk of the week's increase, according to the Investment Company Institute, a Washington trade organization that tracks the funds.  "Even though the yield spreads favoring money-market funds over alternative investment outlets available to individuals narrowed considerably from their April peak, by historical standards these spreads remain very attractive," said Jacob Dreyer, vice president and chief economist of the Institute.  "Institutional investors, on the other hand, who are very sensitive to even slight changes in interest-rate differentials, responded to declining money-market fund yields by shifting some assets out of funds and into direct money-market instruments," like bankers' acceptances, certificates of deposit, commercial paper and U.S. Treasury bills.  Separately, the average seven-day compounded yield fell to 8.58% from 8.64% in the week ended Tuesday, according to Donoghue's Money Fund Report, a Holliston, Mass., newsletter.  Of the 463 funds the Investment Company Institute follows, 141 institutional funds lost $557.1 million and now total $84.77 billion.  Of funds for consumer use, 227 funds in the general-purpose category registered a gain of $770.1 million, to $110.68 billion.  The 95 broker-dealer type funds reported a total intake of $1.04 billion, to $149.21 billion.  The United Airlines machinists union says representatives of Texas investor Robert Bass and the leveraged buy-out firm of Kohlberg Kravis & Roberts "among other investors" have contacted it about bidding for United's UAL Corp. parent.  The overtures from the Bass group and KKR suggest that a pending offer from UAL's pilots union and management may face unexpected competition.  The labor-management's group's $300-a-share $6.75 billion offer -- backed by UAL chairman Stephen M. Wolf and UAL marketing partner British Airways PLC -- appears to have the inside track with UAL's board.  The board also is considering a $275-a-share, or $6.19 billion, offer from Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis.  UAL stock fell $5.125 a share to $281.75 a share yesterday in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange on rumors that Mr. Davis is selling his UAL shares.  A Davis spokesman declined to comment.  Mr. Davis is believed to have owned 3.5% of UAL's 21.6 million shares outstanding.  John Peterpaul, vice president of the International Association of Machinists, confirmed that the Bass group is seeking a meeting to discuss whether the machinists' union would be interested in supporting a bid.  Mr. Peterpaul added that KKR expressed interest in bidding.  He described the discussions as "very preliminary" and declined to provide further details.  Mr. Peterpaul also declined to identify the other investors he said have contacted the union since Mr. Wolf and the pilots union announced their bid last Friday.  Spokesmen for Bass, KKR and UAL declined to comment.  Another machinists' official said that the Bass group and KKR were open to giving UAL employees a partial ownership stake.  The pilot-management proposal calls for a 75% ownership stake for UAL employees, a 10% stake for management and 15% stake for British Air.  Earlier this week, Mr. Peterpaul attacked the pilot-led proposal, saying the additional leverage it would place on UAL threatens United's survival.  However, Mr. Peterpaul didn't rule out participating in the pilot-management bid.  The machinists union's willingness to talk with other potential bidders appears aimed in part at putting pressure on the company and the pilots union to address some of its concerns about leverage and job security.  "They want to make sure the machinists have a place at the table and the surest way to do that is to make it look like there are competing bidders," a person involved in the UAL negotiations said.  Wall Street sources familiar with Mr. Bass's pattern of investing said that he would be unlikely to mount a bid for UAL at a price exceeding $300 a share as long as there were other bidders.  They said the Bass Group is following UAL developments closely to see if either the Davis or management-pilot bid falters.  The Bass Group is likely to join forces with a foreign carrier if it did bid, the sources added.  Persons familiar with KKR cautioned that the buy-out firm might well decide against bidding for UAL because of the capital-intensive and cyclical nature of the airline business.  Also, KKR usually prefers working with incumbent management and might consider UAL management's participation in a competing bid a drawback.  However, that wasn't the case in KKR's $25 billion buy-out of RJR Nabisco Inc., where it opposed a management-led bid after trying unsucessfully to join it.  And, KKR has shown interest in the airline industry before.  It bid $117 a share for Northwest Airlines parent NWA Inc. this past summer, just $4 shy of investor Alfred Checchi's winning $121-a-share bid.  Still, other bids without the support of the UAL management and its pilots union, face a variety of drawbacks.  The pilot union has pledged $200 million from one of its pension plans and $250 million in wage and work-rule concessions -- terms it is unlikely to offer an outside bidder.  The pilot proposal also contemplates an additional $120 million in labor-cost savings from UAL's non-contract employees.  The pilots said they want the other labor groups to join in their bid, but say the bid still will be feasible without the other group's participation.  Now arriving on the investment scene is a new product for big traders who want to zip in and out of different sectors of the stock market.  It comes from Fidelity Investments, the Boston mutual-fund giant.  Starting next week, customers of Fidelity's discount brokerage arm will be able to trade any of nine new stock "baskets."  Each basket holds shares of 10 companies in a single business sector, such as health care, energy or leisure.  The baskets are the latest in a string of unusual products Fidelity has rolled out in recent months to lure investors who might otherwise do business through traditional, full-service brokerages.  The goal is to attract customers who, perhaps emboldened by the market's post-crash revival, want to play the "stock rotation" game, jumping nimbly from one stock group to another.  The new Sector Trading Network, as it is known, is an outgrowth of Fidelity's eight-year-old Select funds, which invest in narrow segments of the stock market.  The company hopes the new product will enable it to hang on to the big-time, active traders it has shooed away from its Select funds.  Fidelity also hopes to attract money managers who now trade individual stocks through rival brokerages.  Commissions on the baskets will be substantially less than the cost of trading the stocks individually.  Minimum investment: $10,000.  By creating the basket system, Fidelity is extending an olive branch to the active fund switchers.  The company has long complained their frequent switching drives up costs in the Select funds.  Fidelity's 36 Select funds each invest in a particular industry and are thus much more volatile than broadly diversified mutual funds.  In any given quarter, some Fidelity Select funds are likely to rank among the best-performing and others among the worst-performing of all mutual funds.  The new service is "a niche product in its origin," marketing manager Gail Eisenkraft says.  But "we expect to go beyond" the currently small group of active Select fund traders to attract "the brokerage trader who either manages large amounts of his own money, or other people's money."  Fidelity will market the new service through direct mailings to its existing brokerage and mutual fund customers.  The company expects to "go slowly in terms of advertising."  The 10 stocks in each basket generally will represent the largest holdings, in dollar terms, of the comparable Sector fund, which generally would hold at least twice as many issues.  But stocks that are likely to have poor liquidity won't be included in the baskets.  New baskets will be introduced quarterly.  Baskets are available in "lots" of $10,000, representing about $1,000 of each stock in the basket.  Commissions are levied on purchases and sales.  They range from $200 for six lots or fewer, to $640 for 50 lots plus $8 for each lot beyond 50.  Eric Kobren, publisher of an independent newsletter on Fidelity, says the new product "makes a helluva lot of sense for the guy who's out there managing" a sizable pool of money.  For example, an investor buying six lots, or $60,000 of a basket product, would pay only $200 in fees.  That contrasts with $867.50 in commissions if he bought the same stocks individually through Fidelity's brokerage, which is among the higher-priced "discount" brokers.  Mr. Kobren calls the baskets Fidelity's "most innovative new product since Select" funds, introduced in 1981.  For small investors, Select funds usually will remain a cheaper, more convenient means of playing narrow market segments.  If trades are made within 30 days and are in excess of $50,000, however, the baskets are cheaper, Mr. Kobren says.  He also notes the baskets can be cheaper for investors who intend to hold them for more than a few months, because they do away with the annual expenses of 2% or more from Select funds. (Of course, that also means doing without subsequent portfolio shuffling by the fund manager.)  Among Fidelity's other recently introduced products are: a service enabling brokerage customers to trade non-Fidelity mutual funds through their Fidelity accounts; and a program through which Fidelity money managers advise individual customers on distributing money among Fidelity funds.  ---  @ Trading Industry Stocks by the Bunch  @ Industry 'Baskets' Being Offered by Fidelity Investments  @ -- Chemicals  @ -- Energy  @ -- Financial  @ -- Health Care  @ -- Industrial Materials  @ -- Leisure  @ -- Precious Metals  @ -- Technology  @ -- Utilities  @ Composition of Chemicals Basket (As of Aug. 16)  @ STOCK SHARES PRICE VALUE  @ American Cyanamid 17 58 1/4 $990.25  @ Avery International 35 27 945.00  @ Du Pont 9 117 1/2 1,057.50  @ Ethyl 35 27 5/8 966.88  @ FMC Corp. 20 46 3/4 935.00  @ W.R. Grace 30 35 3/4 1,072.50  @ Great Lakes Chemical 11 88 5/8 974.88  @ Monsanto 9 117 5/8 1,058.63  @ Nalco Chemical 25 43 1/4 1,081.25  @ Olin 15 68 1/4 1,023.75  @ TOTAL $10,105.64  Signaling optimism in the U.S. economy, businesses have increased their plans for spending on new plant and equipment this year, the government reported.  Despite evidence the economy is slowing, companies across the business spectrum told the Commerce Department in an August survey that they plan to raise their capital spending 7.7% from last year in order to expand and modernize.  When they were asked the same question in April and May, the businesses said they planned to increase capital spending 6.5% in 1989.  In an even earlier survey, in December, they said they were only planning a 5.9% boost.  All the figures were adjusted to remove price changes.  "Operating rates are pretty high, and we're in a period of world-wide prosperity," said Sam Nakagama, chairman and chief economist of Nakagama & Wallace, a Wall Street economic advisory firm.  Jerry Jasinowski, executive vice president of the National Association of Manufacturers, added, "Part of the explanation for continued healthy capital spending is a decrease in concerns about a recession in 1990."  If businesses realize their plans, they would shell out a record $473.66 billion for new plant and equipment this year -- $464.0 billion after adjusting for inflation.  Businesses completed the government questionnaires -- sent out June 30 and due to be returned Aug. 1 -- as a number of economists were warning of a recession by late 1989 or early 1990.  A batch of subsequent economic statistics has led many analysts to abandon those fears.  But Mr. Jasinowski said, "Most businessmen, in contrast to economists, look at this picture more in terms of the longer-term competitive position.  On that score, the reason we continue to see such healthy capital spending numbers is the substantial backlog of unmet investment needs in manufacturing."  Most of factories' capital spending in recent years has gone into up-to-date computer or information-processing systems for administrative offices, he explained -- not into state-of-the-art production equipment that American factories desperately need to increase their competitiveness in the global market.  "Most firms have not modernized their plants to the extent they need for the 1990s," Mr. Jasinowski said.  Despite a slowdown in manufacturers' orders, hiring and production, manufacturing industries now plan to raise their capital spending 6.1% this year, according to the August survey.  That is up from the 3.6% increase they indicated in the May survey.  An official at B.F. Goodrich Co., which produces plastics and chemicals, also said new environmental controls are forcing companies to increase their capital outlays.  Here is the breakdown by major industries of capital spending results for past periods and estimates for current and future periods.  For comparability with annual totals, the quarterly figures are at seasonally adjusted annual rates, in billions of dollars:  @ Anticipated  @ Actual -----------1989---------  @ Total Total Apr- Jul- Oct  @ 1988 1989 Jun Sep Dec  @ All Industries ...... 430.76 473.65 470.86 481.24 483.04  @ Manufacturing ....... 166.32 181.90 181.53 185.41 185.44  @ Durable ............. 78.30 82.23 82.97 82.51 82.17  @ Nondurable .......... 88.01 99.67 98.57 102.90 103.27  @ Mining .............. 12.66 12.22 12.70 12.34 11.70  @ Railroad ............ 7.06 7.85 7.37 7.24 8.75  @ Air Transp. ......... 7.28 9.53 9.49 11.30 10.31  @ Other Transp. ....... 7.00 7.37 7.40 7.22 6.79  @ Public Utilities .... 46.67 50.76 52.01 50.54 49.69  @ Commercial & Other .. 183.76 204.02 200.36 207.18 210.36  Dataproducts Corp., which had been seeking a buyer since February, effectively took itself off the block yesterday and announced a sweeping restructuring.  The reorganization will entail laying off about 11% of its total work force, selling numerous properties, recognizing a onetime charge of $45 million, discontinuing its regular dividend and distributing a special, one-time cash payout to shareholders.  "We're going to make Dataproducts more focused, more like a start-up company, more entrepreneurial in nature," Jack Davis, the computer-printer maker's chairman and chief executive officer, said at a news conference here.  It wasn't clear, though, whether the action would mollify DPC Acquisition Partners, which has made a $15-a-share hostile bid for the company.  The suitor, led by New York investment firm Crescott Inc., had no immediate comment on Dataproducts' plans.  But analysts said DPC probably won't just go away.  "I'm sure they're feeling quite frustrated," said William Easterbrook, of Kidder, Peabody & Co.  "I don't see anything they've gotten out of this."  Mr. Davis declined to speculate on what DPC might do from here, but called its $283 million offer unacceptable.  "They have not been able to bring financing," he maintained.  In American Stock Exchange trading yesterday, Dataproduct's shares finished at $10, down $2.25.  Dataproducts, which for more than a year has been actively trying to devise a strategy to increase its value to holders, said it approached 70 concerns about purchasing the Woodland Hills, Calif., company for "a premium price."  But it received only two bids -- one from DPC and another from an unidentified concern -- and determined both to be inadequate.  Dataproducts and its investment bankers, Goldman, Sachs & Co., also contacted 10 major banks to pursue a recapitalization -- an alteration in its capital structure that would have allowed for a huge payout to its investors.  However, none of the banks was interested in financing such a transaction, Mr. Davis said.  Thus, Dataproducts has come up with the following blueprint instead:  -- In an effort to streamline, Dataproducts will split into three sectors: printer equipment, printer supplies and solid-ink printer technology.  Mr. Davis spoke most enthusiastically about the company's proprietary solid-ink color printer, expected to hit the market next summer.  -- The company will phase out its domestic printer manufacturing operations, mostly in Southern California, and relocate those activities to its lower-cost plants in Hong Kong and Dublin.  About 400 jobs will be cut as a result, and the company expects annual savings to be about $20 million from the move.  -- It plans to sell its New England subsidiary, which provides government and military customers with data communications equipment, airborne equipment and printers.  DPC is among the unit's prospective buyers.  Dataproducts also has reached an agreement in principle to sell its Woodland Hills real estate holdings for $63 million.  -- Assuming the company is able to complete the property sales, it expects to have enough cash on hand to declare a special dividend of about $3 a share.  In addition, Dataproducts said it has decided to discontinue its eight-cent-a-share semiannual dividend.  -- Dataproducts will most likely take the $45 million charge against earnings in the current quarter, which ends Sept. 23, and therefore anticipates a net loss for the period.  The hit reflects the cost of moving operations overseas, severance compensation, write-offs of discontinued product lines, taxes on previously undistributed foreign earnings and legal expenses.  For the year-ago quarter, the company posted profit of $1.1 million, or six cents a share, on revenue of $88.2 million.  Some might say that NBC lost "The R.A.C.E."  The two-part NBC News special, designed to test the racial attitudes of studio audiences and home viewers, finished third in the network ratings both Tuesday night and Wednesday night.  Furthermore, the experimental computerized audience-polling technology broke down halfway through the first show when a telephone cable went out of commission somewhere between Denver and New York.  Viewers were treated to the sight of two special guests, film director Spike Lee and Boston University President John Silber, complaining on air that their hand-held devices weren't registering their answers to questions.  The studio audiences in four cities had to stay late and repunch some of their answers, which were discussed the following night.  Nevertheless, both NBC, a unit of General Electric Co., and Quick Tally Systems, developer of the technology, said they consider the programs a success and don't expect the less-than-dazzling performance of the interactive technology to dim its future potential on television.  "We would know how to solve the {phone cable} problem if it happened again," said Eli Bleich, head of Quick Tally.  "We had safeguards for everything else but that."  Paul Greenberg of NBC News, who co-produced "The R.A.C.E." with host Bryant Gumbel, said: "I feel pretty good because we were trying to deal with such a tough subject as racism and in a way that would get viewers at home thinking and reacting.  I think we did that."  A late round of computer-guided sell programs knocked stock prices down, and airline stocks sank again after influential analysts said investors should approach those stocks cautiously.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 12.91 to 2706.88.  The average, which has risen for nine weeks in a row, is down 45.21 points so far this week.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 160,160,000 shares, almost even with Wednesday's 161,800,000.  Sharply declining airline stocks helped drag the Dow Jones Transportation Average down 27.74 points, its largest decline since Dec. 3, 1987, and its 12th largest ever.  Among the victims of yesterday's sell-off, AMR fell 4 3/8 to 82 5/8 on 1.7 million shares, and UAL, parent of United Airlines, skidded 5 1/8 to 281 3/4.  Delta Air Lines plunged 4 1/4 to 75 1/4, Southwest Airlines fell 1 to 28, and USAir Group lost 1 5/8 to 48 3/8.  Midway Airlines declined 7/8 to 19 3/4.  The company, facing a takeover offer by Ampco-Pittsburgh, filed for an offering of two million convertible preferred shares.  After the market closed Wednesday, First Boston airline analyst Paul Karos told clients he is concerned about slowing revenue growth in the industry.  Mr. Karos said aggregate industry revenue in the first quarter was up 12.3% from the same period in 1988.  In the second quarter, the gain was 6.2%, and in July, revenue growth slowed to 1.3%.  Mr. Karos said July's revenue growth was the slowest since the second quarter of 1986, when airlines cut fares drastically as oil prices fell.  This time, however, the scenario is different, Mr. Karos said.  Revenue growth slowed this summer because of the softening economy and consumer sensitivity to rising fares.  "You have financial restructuring continuing on the one hand and revenue growth deteriorating on the other," said Mr. Karos.  "For those who think the restructuring will continue, I say you can buy on pullbacks.  For those who believe it's over, I recommend taking profits."  Julius Maldutis, airline analyst for Salomon Brothers, reiterated his cautious stand on the market to clients yesterday morning.  Traders also referred to a recent letter to shareholders from AMR Chairman Robert L. Crandall, in which he wrote: "Looking ahead, we are less optimistic than we were three months ago.  We see no evidence that the air transportation industry has lost its inherent volatility.  While traffic is strong, yields were weaker in June than in earlier months, and there may be further weakness ahead."  Fuel costs, which are about 14% of its American Airlines unit's operating expenses, continue to exceed AMR's forecasts, the chairman said.  Financial stocks such as Federal National Mortgage Association attracted buyers despite the broad market's weakness.  Fannie Mae jumped 4 to 107 3/4 as 1.3 million shares changed hands in composite trading.  Analysts at Merrill Lynch, Smith Barney, Goldman Sachs and C.J. Lawrence all repeated recommendations on the stock, and Merrill Lynch raised its earnings estimates, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Two other government-sponsored agencies also fared well, as Federal Home Loan Mortgage advanced 2 3/4 to 89 1/8, and Student Loan Marketing gained 1 1/8 to 44 1/4.  The savings-and-loan sector outgained every other Dow Jones industry group by a wide margin.  Great Western Financial rose 3/8 to 21 5/8 in active trading, H.F. Ahmanson rose 1/2 to 22 7/8, Golden West Financial gained 1 5/8 to 55, and Glenfed gained 1/2 to 24 3/4.  Expectations of higher oil prices after a California refinery had to be shut down this week because of a fire gave the oil sector a boost.  Exxon rose 3/8 to 44 1/4 on 1.9 million shares, Chevron climbed 1 1/2 to 59 1/8, Texaco firmed 3/8 to 51, Mobil advanced 7/8 to 56 5/8, and Royal Dutch Petroleum rose 3/4 to 67 3/8.  Among blue-chip issues, Eastman Kodak went up 3/4 to 49 1/8 on renewed speculation about a possible favorable settlement in the company's patent-infringement case against Polaroid and rumors that investor Carl Icahn might build a stake.  Goodyear Tire & Rubber, which surged 4 1/8 Wednesday amid rumors that Pirelli of Italy would make a bid, remained unchanged at 57 5/8.  But International Business Machines eased 1/2 to 116 1/4, Minnesota Mining & Manufacturing dropped 2 to 74, Merck slipped 1 1/8 to 71 1/8, International Paper lost 1 1/8 to 54 1/4, and Philip Morris fell 2 to 164 1/4.  Tiffany jumped 6 1/8 to 60 3/8.  Developer Donald Trump received federal clearance to buy more than $15 million of the company's shares; at current prices, $15 million would represent less than a 2% stake.  Mr. Trump plans to acquire the stock as an investment, the company said.  Allergan, the Big Board's most active issue, plunged 3 3/4 to 20 3/4 on 3.2 million shares.  Citing lower-than-expected revenue from its optical division, the company reduced its projection for sales growth this year.  Genentech gained 1 1/4 to 21 1/8 as two million shares were traded.  Analysts cited an apparent delay in Food and Drug Administration approval of SmithKline Beecham's Eminase, a lower-priced competitor of the company's drug Activase.  Pfizer gained 7/8 to 69 3/8 after the FDA approved a once-a-day formulation of its drug Procardia for treating angina and hypertension.  Alza, which developed the new formulation, rose 1 5/8 to 39 3/8 on the American Stock Exchange.  Enron, which filed for an initial public offering of a partnership that would take over its liquid pipeline operations and certain gas processing facilities, gained 1 5/8 to 52 3/4.  The company plans to sell a 75% interest in the partnership, Enroe NGL Partners.  Mead dropped 1 7/8 to 44.  Chairman Burnell R. Roberts told Dow Jones the company expects to report third-quarter operating earnings of about 80 to 85 cents a share, compared with $1.06 a share a year earlier.  He said full-year earnings are also expected to be down.  Data Design Laboratories fell 1/2 to 5 7/8 after posting a $1.7 million loss for the June quarter.  It had net income of about $2 million a year earlier.  Stoneridge Resources rose 5/8 to 10 1/8.  The company cited a buy recommendation from Roney & Co., a Detroit-based brokerage house, and its proposed acquisition of Acceptance Insurance Holdings.  The American Stock Exchange Index gained 0.32 to 383.19.  Volume totaled 13,550,000 shares, compared with 12,300,000 Wednesday.  There were 272 issues advancing, 281 declining and 279 unchanged.  Dataproducts fell 2 1/4 to 10 on news of a proposed restructuring, which will result in a total of about $45 million in charges.  Among other things, the company would stop paying a semiannual dividend, make a special payout of about $3 a share, sell certain assets and cut its work force by about 400.  A.T. Cross Class A dropped 3 1/2 to 34 1/4.  The company said earnings for the third quarter will be down from a year earlier despite higher sales.  Senate Majority Leader George Mitchell said he intends to fight the forces burgeoning in Congress this year to reduce the tax on capital gains.  The influential Maine Democrat said he opposes any reduction in the tax this year, including a plan gaining favor among Democratic leaders in the House that would remove from taxation that part of the gain attributable to inflation.  A cut in the capital gains tax rate would lose revenue in the long run and would disproportionately benefit rich people, he said.  Sen. Mitchell's position isn't likely to prevail, however, as the issue is expected to be decided in the next few weeks.  President Bush has made the reduction a priority, and a one-vote majority of the House Ways and Means Committee backs a plan he supports.  The panel's chairman, Rep. Dan Rostenkowski (D., Ill.), is suggesting an alternative and is likely to seek a compromise with the president.  White House and committee staff members yesterday held prelimary talks on a compromise.  In the Senate, Chairman Lloyd Bentsen (D., Texas) of the Finance Committee is examining capital gains options, but hasn't decided what, if anything, to push.  A tax bill to be drafted by the committee probably won't include a capital gains component initially.  But because a cut in the capital gains rate would raise revenue in the short run, the issue is likely to surface quickly as a way of funding a variety of popular tax credits that are scheduled to expire.  What's a nice stock like Eli Lilly doing in a place like this?  The pharmaceutical company is endowed with $4 billion in annual sales, steadily rising earnings and a much-admired cornucopia of drugs, including the successful new anti-depressant Prozac.  Yet Lilly ranks sixth on the New York Stock Exchange short-interest list, with more than five million shares sold short as of mid-August.  Short selling normally amounts to a bet that a stock will go down, as an investor sells borrowed shares and hopes to profit by eventually returning cheaper shares to the lender.  Companies that attract shorts often have shaky finances, unproven new products or wildly swinging earnings.  But none of that describes Lilly.  Money managers, analysts and even some short sellers call the large short position in Lilly shares a bewildering puzzle.  Neil B. Swieg, drug analyst at Prudential-Bache, thinks he has figured it out.  Speculators, he believes, are short-selling stocks of giant drug companies that they think are too big to be takeover targets, and using the proceeds to speculate (often through call, or purchase, options) on smaller drug stocks that might be takeover bait.  Favorite targets of takeover speculation, Mr. Sweig says, include Schering-Plough, Upjohn and Warner Lambert.  "It's grown headier and headier.  More and more froth has come into it," he says.  "There are very big bets being placed on another Squibb, friendly or otherwise." (Bristol-Myers plans to acquire Squibb for stock.)  In the options market, Upjohn is the speculators' darling, says Bernard Schaeffer, editor of Option Advisor, a Cincinnati market letter.  He notes that there are more than 19,000 call options outstanding to buy Upjohn shares at 40 in October.  Upjohn closed yesterday at 40 7/8, up 1/2.  Syntex is another speculative favorite, says Geoffrey Payne, who edits a Pompano Beach, Fla., newsletter called Watch the Shorts.  The shorting of Lilly shares is "obviously an arbitrage," he says, adding, "I wouldn't short {Lilly}.  It has a beautiful chart pattern.  Fundamentally, it's brilliant."  Lilly, which finished at 60 1/4 yesterday, has been one of 1989's best-performing stocks, up 44%.  But lately it has been "down in the dumps," says a trader at Shearson Lehman Hutton.  He says traders figure "there's no reason to go after that one when you can go after a company that has takeover possibilities."  Speculators are short-selling not only Lilly but also other big drug companies.  Short interest is high in American Home Products (1.3 million shares, or the equivalent of 7.4 days' recent trading volume) and in Merck (2.3 million shares, or 3.6 days' worth).  The Lilly short positions amount to more than 11 days' trading volume.  The total short position in the drug group now is the highest in five years, says Philip Erlanger, senior technical analyst with Fidelity Investments.  He takes this as a bullish sign, because short sellers eventually must buy shares to replace the ones they borrowed -- even if the buying is grudgingly done.  Shorting big stocks to play little stocks sounds like a cute strategy.  But it may be too clever by half.  "The good buy candidates are the ones they're shorting to speculate in the takeover stocks," says Mr. Schaeffer.  Mr. Erlanger says short sellers run a great risk of being squeezed by rising prices for drug stocks.  In the case of American Home Products, he thinks they're being squeezed already.  He figures the average short seller borrowed shares when they were around 84; they now are at 98 3/4.  It's too soon, he says, to make similar calculations for Lilly.  The big-stock/little-stock play isn't the only reason some people are shorting Lilly.  "I think everyone has accepted the idea that the dollar is not going to weaken," says Michael Murphy, a California short seller and newsletter editor.  That prospect, he says, hurts both Lilly and Merck, because their sales abroad will translate into fewer dollars. (He is short Merck, but not Lilly.)  Ron Nordmann, a PaineWebber analyst, notes that Prozac faces increased competition.  But he considers this a poor reason to sell Lilly short.  Lilly says it's aware of the short selling, but refuses to comment further.  Several well-known short sellers say that whoever is betting against Lilly, it isn't them.  "We typically don't short good companies that are overpriced," says Tom Barton, a general partner at Feshbach Brothers (generally considered the nation's biggest short sellers).  "We try to short lousy companies that are overpriced."  Lilly and Merck are "both awfully good companies," Mr. Murphy says.  "And you don't make a lot of money short-selling good companies."  ---  Eli Lilly  (NYSE; Symbol: LLY)  Business: Pharmaceuticals  Year ended Dec. 31, 1988:  Sales: $4.07 billion  Net Income: $761 million; $2.67 a share*  Second quarter, June 30, 1989:  Per-share earnings: 75 cents vs. 63 cents*  Average daily trading volume:  425,599 shares  Common shares outstanding: 275.4 million  *Adjusted for two-for-one stock split paid in April 1989.  Foreign investment by U.S. manufacturers rose in the first half from a year earlier, according to the Conference Board, with acquisitions of foreign concerns representing more than half the 1989 total.  U.S. companies announced 99 manufacturing projects in the first six months of 1989, compared with 90 in the first six months of 1988, the nonprofit, industry-supported group said.  In all of 1988, 180 projects were announced.  The Conference Board, which has been conducting the survey since 1979, said new manufacturing investment in the early 1980s totaled between 190 and 215 projects annually.  In the latest first half, the value of the investments was about $6.1 billion for the 23 projects that reported figures.  The 20 that reported in the first half of 1988 were valued at $2.8 billion.  Of the new investments, 53 were acquisitions of foreign-owned firms, while 33 were joint ventures.  The board said eight new plants were built, and five major expansions of existing facilities were reported.  Chemical, food, paper and electronics companies were the most active investors, the study showed.  The board said fewer small and medium-sized companies have made direct investments overseas so far in 1989 than in previous years.  In the latest study, 57 of the projects were in Western Europe, with 18 in the U.K. and 17 in West Germany.  Twenty projects were in the Pacific region, including six in Japan and four in Australia.  Most of the 14 new manufacturing projects in Canada were acquisitions.  Five new projects were in Latin America, and three joint ventures in the Soviet Union were announced.  Common Cause suggested replacing the Federal Election Commission.  The citizens lobby defended the agency in 1981 when conservative Senate Republicans mounted an attempt to kill it.  But in a 90-page report titled "The Failure-to-Enforce Commission," the group now says the FEC has allowed parties and political-action committees to evade legal limits on contributions and expenditures through a variety of loopholes.  The report is being released today.  "Given that the FEC's problems are so deeply embedded, the best, albeit drastic, remedy at this stage may be for Congress to abolish the FEC altogether and to create a new election law enforcement agency," the study says.  It recommends establishing a new agency with a strong chairman and members who before being appointed would be screened by a nonpartisan panel made up of retired judges or other non-politicians.  By tradition, the president now appoints commissioners from names recommended to him by Senate and House leaders.  A case that could expand the legal definition of parenthood is expected to go to trial in state court in Los Angeles in the next several weeks.  The case involves a lesbian's right to seek joint custody of a child conceived through artificial insemination.  The former partner of a lesbian mother claims that her role in the child's conception and her financial support entitles her to participate in the child's upbringing.  The case is significant, said Nathan Goldberg, an attorney for the plaintiff, "because so many lesbian couples are now becoming parents."  There is no law "that talks about the rights of lesbian parents," he added.  Mr. Goldberg and another Los Angeles attorney, Gloria Allred, base their case on a theory they call "parenthood by estoppel."  Explained Mr. Goldberg, "The theory is that there are certain things a person can do to be the legal equivalent of a parent."  In her 1988 suit against the mother in Los Angeles County Superior Court, Terri Sabol claims that she assisted in the insemination process, paid pregnancy expenses, and supported the mother and child through October 1988.  A relative of Ms. Sabol donated the sperm.  A baby girl was born in 1986 and the couple split up about two years later.  Ms. Sabol alleges that the mother, Susan Bowling, who had earlier agreed to visitation rights, began restricting Ms. Sabol's time with the child in October 1988.  Defense attorney Glen Schwartz, of Los Angeles, said that because Ms. Sabol is neither the biological nor the adoptive parent, she will have a tough time proving her case.  "The basic question here is, what is a parent?" said Mr. Schwartz.  "Are we going to create another group of people who can be adjudged to be a parent?  At what point does a person become a parent?  We need definitions.  There must be legislative action to do this."  ---  MYERSON & KUHN recruits former Federal Trade Commission chairman.  Daniel Oliver, chairman of the FTC from April 1986 until August 1989, has become a partner in the New York law firm of Myerson & Kuhn.  The firm, founded in January 1988 after the breakup of Finley, Kumble, Wagner, Heine, Underberg, Manley, Myerson & Casey, has lost eight equity partners in the past few months, said name partner Harvey Myerson.  Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. fired the firm in April after a billing dispute.  Mr. Oliver, 50, said that he had looked into the problems and that his concerns had been alleviated.  He will head the trade regulatory practice at the 120-lawyer firm and divide his time between the Washington and New York offices.  Mr. Myerson said, "In light of the battering we have taken in the press, I'm proud that people like Dan Oliver believe in us."  ---  BASKIN, FLAHERTY, Elliott, Mannino, Gordon & Scully's Washington office splits.  Two name partners and seven associates of the Philadelphia-based firm have joined forces with the Washington firm of Metzger, Alprin, Jones & Burk to form 20-lawyer Metzger, Gordon & Scully.  Partner Stuart J. Gordon declined to comment on the split except to call it "amicable."  But lawyers familiar with the breakup said the Washington office wasn't getting much business from Baskin, Flaherty's Pittsburgh and Philadelphia offices and that Washington lawyers felt they were sacrificing too much of the revenue they generated to the firm's other offices.  Henry F. Siedzikowski, managing partner of Baskin Flaherty's Philadelphia office, said the Washington practice wasn't meshing with Baskin Flaherty's other offices and that it wasn't profitable.  Mr. Siedzikowski said the firm had been considering closing its Washington office when the split occurred.  @ ---  UNIVERSITY HIRES collection agency to get judges to pay overdue bill.  Pan American University in Edinburg, Texas, recently hired the agency to recover a $9,000 debt it had been trying to collect for nearly 19 months.  The money is allegedly owed by the Southwest Texas County Judges Association, whose 29 members sponsored the debate of six Democratic presidential candidates at Pan American Dec. 15, 1987.  The school says the association agreed to pick up the tab for use of its facilities.  That bill, totaling $9,133.35, went out less than two months after the debate.  "We've been trying to collect ever since," says Bruce Erickson, a spokesman for the university.  The results so far?  Payments from two county judges; several letters from judges who said they didn't know what Pan American was talking about; and a letter from an Austin attorney representing the association "basically telling us to take a leap," says Mr. Erickson.  The attorney, Randall Wood, acknowledges saying something along those lines when he wrote the letter last June 30, two weeks before Pan American brought in the collection agency.  Mr. Wood says several of the judges had expressed bewilderment over the bill, and it "looked a little weird" coming so long after the debate.  Mr. Wood says subsequent correspondence convinces him Pan American did have some sort of understanding that it would be paid, although he believes the agreement wasn't communicated very well and he doesn't think the judges are legally bound by it.  Even so, barring some subsequent development, the attorney says he'll probably advise them to "pay their shares."  ---  BURNS'S RECRUITING SPREE: Arnold Burns, the former Justice Department official who heads the Washington office of Proskauer Rose Goetz & Mendelsohn, continues to bring new blood to the New York law firm.  Since Mr. Burns joined the firm a year ago, Proskauer's Washington office has doubled in size to a dozen lawyers.  The latest entries are two litigation partners, Warren Dennis and Christopher Wolf.  Both lawyers were recruited by Mr. Burns from the Washington office of Philadelphia's Ballard, Spahr, Andrews & Ingersoll and specialize in lender liability litigation.  A former penny stockbroker who was convicted in 1987 of wire fraud and tax evasion told a House subcommittee that the market for unlisted securities is closely linked to organized crime.  Lorenzo Formato, a participant in the federal Witness Protection Program, declined to disclose names of underworld figures but said his businesses were used to launder money.  He said that "some way or another, organized crime has its hand on the shoulder of every over-the-counter brokerage firm that's making any kind of money."  Mr. Formato, who spoke from behind a partition to conceal his identity, testified yesterday before the House Telecommunications and Finance Subcommittee.  John Watson, president of the Security Traders Association, a trade group that represents traders in the OTC market, called Mr. Formato's characterization of the industry "completely false."  He said there is a big difference between "fly-by-night" penny-stock operations and other segments of the OTC market.  Mr. Formato said he raised millions of dollars as a stockbroker and stock promoter before he was arrested.  He was an executive of Laser Arms Corp., which was indicted in September 1986 for bilking investors by promoting a so-called self-chilling beverage can that never existed.  Mr. Formato pleaded guilty in the case.  Rep. Edward Markey (D., Mass.), chairman of the subcommittee, said he plans to draft legislation to fight penny-stock fraud, including the widespread use of "blank-check blind pools."  Blind pools are often used to raise money for shell firms with no discernible assets.  Blenheim Exhibitions Group PLC, a U.K. exhibition and conference organizer, said it is buying four French exhibition businesses for an initial consideration of #29.9 million ($46.4 million).  The acquisitions are to be financed through a rights issue involving the creation of 3.56 million shares, to be offered to shareholders at 875 pence each.  The four businesses Blenheim is buying are the Batimat Group, a trade exhibition group for the building industry, the Captic Group, the Sedep Group and Top Resa.  The groups being acquired will occupy 58% more space than all of Blenheim's existing U.K. exhibitions, the company said.  "We now have absolute leadership in the exhibition sector in Europe with over 50% of our turnover derived outside the U.K.," said Blenheim Chairman Neville Buch.  The acquisition is conditional on shareholders' approval.  The state of Texas sued Quaker Oats Co., charging that advertisements for its oatmeal and oat bran falsely claim that eating the cereal reduces cholesterol and the risk of heart attack.  The lawsuit, filed in Texas state court in Dallas County, is one of a number of actions being taken against food companies by a nine-state group of attorneys general known as the health-claims task force.  Jim Mattox, Texas attorney general, said of Chicago-based Quaker: "We're in the middle of an oat-bran craze in this country that was primarily started by Quaker in order to sell its products.  Consumers have been duped."  Mr. Mattox, who is widely expected to run for governor of Texas, isn't exaggerating by much when he calls it a craze.  Quaker said that oatmeal sales, which had been flat for years, began skyrocketing in the fall of 1987 -- when studies showing that oatmeal can help reduce cholesterol were widely publicized.  Quaker's oatmeal sales gained 25% in the 12 months following release of the studies, and rose an additional 9% the following year, when many new competitors entered the suddenly booming market, a Quaker spokesman said.  The company expects oatmeal sales of about $500 million this year, he said.  In a statement, Quaker said its ads are "truthful and supported by valid, reliable scientific evidence."  The company also said it is "extremely disheartening to see the attorney general obstructing . . . the goal of nutrition education."  At the heart of all this is a series of ads featuring actor Wilfred Brimley, a grandfatherly sort who played the baseball team manager in the Robert Redford film, "The Natural."  In the ads, Mr. Brimley urges viewers to eat oatmeal, saying: "It's the right thing to do."  Quaker's ads say that the company's oatmeal and oat bran can help lower cholesterol levels -- as part of a low-fat, low-cholesterol diet.  That qualification, however, appears in smaller letters on the cereal box, the lawsuit says.  The lawsuit asks for a temporary restraining order against the ads.  It asks that Quaker be forced to disclose in all ads the exact diet required -- including how often and how much oatmeal to eat to achieve the desired results -- and that the research cited was financed by the company.  Texas asserts in the suit that Quaker pitches oatmeal as a drug substitute, urging people to "self-medicate with Quaker oats" rather than seek the help of a doctor for high cholesterol or heart problems.  About a year ago, a health advocacy group questioned the health claims, and the Federal Trade Commission reviewed the ads, concluding last June that Quaker wasn't misleading consumers and that people realized that any benefit came within the context of a proper diet.  During that period, the company has also been providing information to Texas, which is leading the nine-state task force in this matter.  A spokesman for Mr. Mattox said the task force's other states don't plan to file similar suits unless "they have to."  The states hope the Texas action will force Quaker to change its ads nationally.  Quaker said it expects to successfully defend itself in the lawsuit and has no plans to alter its claims.  The Securities and Exchange Commission told legislators it doesn't have the authority to assert jurisdiction over Sir James Goldsmith's hostile bid for B.A.T Industries PLC.  The SEC statement prompted U.S. Representatives Neal Smith (D., Iowa) and Harold Rogers (R., Ky.) to suggest that legislation may be necessary to give the SEC more authority over such transactions.  In a statement, Messrs.  Smith and Rogers said they were encouraged by SEC Chairman David Ruder's assurances that the SEC intends to monitor the bid.  However, they said, "The House is much more likely to support legislation that would ensure that the SEC does have jurisdiction to intervene in this and other highly leveraged offshore transactions."  The SEC letter to Messrs.  Smith and Rogers came in response to a July 24 letter from the legislators expressing concern about the impact of the proposed takeover on the U.S. employees who work for Batus, a Kentucky-based unit of B.A.T.  Eastman Kodak Co. said nine chemical drums at its Kodak Park plant here ruptured early yesterday, releasing a hazy, smog-like cloud.  Several people complaining of eye and throat irritation sought treatment at local hospitals and were released.  Two nearby schools were closed for the day.  While the cloud apparently wasn't dangerous, it is likely to add to Kodak's environmental woes in its hometown.  The company has been accused by the Environmental Protection Agency of knowingly contaminating ground water at Kodak Park, its core manufacturing facility.  The photographic, chemical and pharmaceutical firm said the 55-gallon corrugated chemical drums, which were stored in a warehouse, contained a chemical used to manufacture photographic dyes for color film.  Early yesterday, workers placed the drums outside, after noticing a chemical reaction occurring in the plastic-lined containers, a Kodak spokesman said.  The chemical takes on properties akin to a heavy smog when it oxidizes.  Kodak has been under attack by residents worried about health issues and the value of their homes.  Tests last year indicated that ground water was contaminated with methylene chloride, a suspected cancer-causing chemical used to make film.  Chambers Development Co. said it made five acquisitions that together will generate annual revenue of $11.4 million.  The acquisitions include solid waste collection and hauling concerns in Pittsburgh, Dallas and Orangeburg, S.C., and security agencies in Phoenix, Ariz., and Oakland, Calif.  Chambers declined to disclose the terms, but said the concerns are profitable.  Chambers operates waste collection, hauling, recycling and landfill operations and has a subsidiary that provides guard and other security services.  Net income of Gevaert N.V., a Belgian holding company with interests in the manufacture of photographic equipment and materials, plunged to 841.8 million Belgian francs ($20.4 million) in the first half from 3.86 billion francs a year earlier, the company said.  Gevaert's 1988 results were boosted by a one-time gain of about three billion francs from its sale of shares in Societe Generale de Belgique, an engineering, metals and financial-services holding company that was at the center of a takeover battle in early 1988.  Gevaert said its current earnings in the first half of 1989, based on an estimate of dividend income, rose by 37% from the year-earlier period.  It said full-year earnings probably will exceed 1.5 billion francs, compared with 4.2 billion francs, including the extraordinary gain, in 1988.  Lincoln Telecommunications Co. said directors tightened the company's anti-takeover provisions because of concerns that "the continued accumulation" of the Lincoln, Neb., company's shares by Gabelli Group Inc. could be "potentially disruptive."  At a special meeting, the board trimmed to 10% from 20% the point at which an outsider's stake will trigger the rights plan's dilutive poison-pill measure.  In early August, a group that includes New York investment firms Gabelli Group and Gamco Investors Inc. disclosed it had increased its stake in the telecommunications company to 8.7% of the common shares outstanding.  The Nasdaq over-the-counter market rose fractionally; but traders complain that individual investors continue to avoid smaller stocks.  The Nasdaq Composite Index added 0.43, to 469.68, a gain of 0.09%.  The OTC market resisted the selling that depressed New York Stock Exchange issues.  The Big Board Composite fell 0.2% on the day.  Trading volume on Nasdaq totaled almost 134 million shares.  So far this month, the daily turnover has averaged 126.2 million shares.  That's just ahead of the pace for July, the slowest month this year.  Individual investors "aren't in the market place," said Ralph Costanza, managing director of the OTC trading desk at Smith Barney, Harris Upham.  Although the OTC market slumped last fall, with the Nasdaq composite dipping 1.4% from Aug. 31 to Nov. 30, things might be different this year.  Jonathan S. Raclin, senior vice president of Chicago Corp., said institutional investors are more interested in the small-stock sector these days.  "More money is coming into small stocks from (pension) plans, so investment advisers and mutual-fund managers are gravitating toward (small issues)," he said.  "There's been a dramatic upsurge in the number of people willing to talk about small stocks," said Mr. Raclin.  He is the manager of trading, sales and research of small- and medium-sized issues at the firm, whose clients include 250 institutional investors in the U.S. and abroad.  Mr. Raclin said the institutions, which usually don't spend large sums on small stocks, are investing small portions in the issues.  He added that some of the interest they are showing probably won't be converted into purchases.  "Certainly, not all of (the investors) are into it with both feet," he said.  "But it's (still) better than when they said, 'Go away.'"  Added William Sulya, head of OTC trading at A.G. Edwards, St. Louis, "I just think we are ready for things to break out big-time on the upside in secondary stocks."  He said that while gloomy market conditions forecast by some analysts has caused many individual investors to grow more cautious, the skepticism is healthy.  "When everyone's saying sell your stocks, I'm one who says get in," he says.  Applied Biosystems tumbled 3 3/4 to 24 3/4 on 1.6 million shares, more than 10 times its average daily volume.  The drop was precipitated by the analytic-instruments maker's announcement that earnings for the fiscal-first quarter ending Sept. 30 will be below profit of $4.4 million, or 32 cents a share, a year ago.  The company blamed increased research and development spending for the lower results.  The company said the impact of the situation on the full year's results can't be determined yet.  Kurt Kruger, a Hambrecht & Quist analyst, said part of the problem is that the growth of Applied Biosystems' core businesses is slowing down and its newer products will face more competition.  Therefore, he said, "It will take time to develop a head of steam."  He added: "The company is a strong player in a high growth field, but we're getting more realistic about what it can deliver."  MCI Communications rose 1 to 40 1/4 on nearly 4.2 million shares, and was Nasdaq's most-active stock.  A spokeswoman for the telecommunications concern confirmed that Morgan Stanley made positive comments about the company, Dow Jones Professional Investor Report said.  The gain by MCI also pushed the Nasdaq Utility Index ahead 0.49, to 739.54.  The barometer of big industrial stocks, the Nasdaq 100 Index, slipped 0.94, to 442.40.  The Nasdaq Financial Index, which tracks larger financial stocks, added 1.68, to 468.73.  First Executive continued to climb back from its recent low of 11 1/4.  The stock added 1/2 to 13 1/2, third on the most active list with trading volume of more than 1.5 million shares.  Varitronic Systems tumbled 1 7/8 to 10 1/4.  On Wednesday, the stock climbed 1 3/8 on what traders claimed was typical volatility before the release of the company's latest quarterly earnings.  Yesterday, Varitronic reported net income of 13 cents a share for its fiscal fourth quarter ended July 31, far below the 33 cents earned a year ago.  While many analysts expected the quarter's earnings to be lower than those of last year, the results were worse than expected.  Varitronic also said it is in preliminary talks with Kroy Inc. about a possible merger that would cost Varitronic about $50 million.  Cracker Barrel Old Country Store jumped 2 to 28 after it reported that net jumped more than 25% in the fiscal-fourth quarter ended July 28, to 54 cents a share from 43 cents a share a year ago.  Brite Voice Systems dropped 1 1/8 to 12 7/8.  Its initial public offering was priced at $12.50 a share late Tuesday.  Some analysts worry that a dispute between Brite Voice, a Wichita, Kan., manufacturer of interactive voice response and audiotex systems, and a major customer could hurt the company's earnings.  Chips & Technologies fell 3/4 to 20 3/4.  The company cut its earnings estimate for the fiscal-first quarter ending Sept. 30, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  The expected earnings range was lowered to between 55 cents a shares and 60 cents, from the earlier projection of 60 cents a share for the quarter.  Chips & Technology's stock has been under pressure because of general concerns about the health of the personal-computer market and the economy in general.  Intel, a big semiconductor stock, dropped 1/4 to 29 3/4.  Some software stocks were also weak.  Microsoft slid 1 to 58 1/4, Lotus Development was unchanged at 26 1/2, and Rainbow Technology fell 1/4 to 19 1/4.  Laventhol & Horwath, the seventh largest U.S. accounting firm, and Spicer & Oppenheim, the 14th largest, are "in preliminary discussions" for a possible merger, George Bernstein, chief executive officer of Laventhol, said.  Reports have been circulating in accounting circles for weeks that Spicer, which has been encountering some financial problems, was seeking a merger partner.  Based in New York, Spicer has a large number of brokerage firms, including Bear Stearns Cos., as audit clients.  The October 1987 stock market crash has hurt its business.  In recent months, Spicer has cut its 1,000-member U.S. staff by 10% in an effort to cut costs.  Mr. Bernstein said that a merger of the two firms world-wide would create an international organization with $1 billion in annual revenue.  "We believe Spicer is a very good niche firm, but our merger discussions are very early at this point," he said.  Steven Oppenheim, Spicer's chief executive partner, said the two firms had held "very preliminary talks."  He added, "We don't know if they are going to continue."  He declined to elaborate.  Spicer & Oppenheim's international organization has the same name, while Philadelphia-based Laventhol, which is heavily involved in real-estate feasibility consulting, is a member of Horwath International.  An elite group of top executives from some of the nation's largest discount retailers, drug chains and consumer marketers has held a series of private meetings over the last two years to discuss what one participant calls "common industry problems."  The group, whose existence was acknowledged by some participants this week, is highly unusual because of its size and composition and because of members' efforts to keep its existence a secret.  The 40 or so participants include top executives at such normally tenacious competitors as K mart Corp. and Wal-Mart Stores Inc., drug chains such as Revco D.S. Inc. and Walgreen Co., and marketers like Procter & Gamble Co. and Bristol-Myers Co.  Unlike trade associations, the organization has no name, no formal agenda, no charter, no bylaws and puts nothing in writing.  Although no one alleges it has engaged in illegal collusion or price-fixing, discovery of the organization's existence has angered executives from smaller retail chains who weren't invited to join.  "It reeks of something suspicious," said Donald Beeler, president of Minnetonka, Minn.-based Snyder's Drug Stores Inc., the country's 31st-largest drug chain.  Told of the group's meetings, Eli Cohen, president of Duane Reade Co., the 25th-largest chain, said, "It concerns me. . . .  I'd like to know more about this."  As a rule, chief executives steer clear of such gatherings to avoid any suggestion of impropriety.  In the past, trade associations or more informal gatherings of industry executives have been vehicles for collusion on matters ranging from prices to credit terms.  Most formal trade associations, such as the National Association of Chain Drug Stores, are careful to steer clear of such issues.  At least one leading retail executive, Michael Bozic, president of Sears, Roebuck & Co.'s main retail unit in Chicago, declined to participate in the retail group, reportedly because of legal concerns.  "We don't belong," said a Sears spokesman, "and we don't have anything to say about it."  Bob Bolger, an industry consultant who attended one meeting, noted that "some people don't feel comfortable in an environment of his kind.  Legally, they've got to be very careful."  Charles W. Corddry III, an attorney in the Federal Trade Commission's bureau of competition, said he has never heard of anything like the nameless retail group.  "It strikes me as unusual," Mr. Corddry said.  "When we look at a trade group, it has organizational documents, employees, things like that, and a name."  While nothing sinister can be inferred from the simple act of competitors meeting, he was surprised to learn that lawyers aren't present to take minutes, "if only to show they didn't talk about prices.  It sounds really weird."  According to several of its members, the group was organized by David Pinto, president of Racher Press Inc., which publishes two industry trade publications.  Mr. Pinto started the group, the members said, at the behest of several retailers, most notably L.S. "Sam" Skaggs, chairman of American Stores Co., the Salt Lake City-based parent of Osco Drugs.  Membership is restricted primarily to chief executive officers or chairmen.  A spokesman for American Stores declined to comment.  "Take my word on it, there is nothing wrong with this," Mr. Pinto said in an interview.  "At the first meeting, someone got up and said, 'Suppose it is construed that we're talking about price.' One of the people said, 'Listen, we know what we can talk about and what we can't.  If we're not man enough to police ourselves, we're not man enough to meet among ourselves.' That was the first and last time this has been brought up."  The group was formed, Mr. Pinto said, to address how best to deal with a range of changes in the retailing industry, including the development of hypermarkets, which are mammoth grocery and discount-goods stores, discount warehouses and special retailers.  While he insisted there is nothing unusual about the group, Mr. Pinto declined to name its founders.  "I'm not authorized to tell you that," he said.  "I would be violating my loyalties."  Many members refused to discuss the group at all.  "I have nothing to say.  Talk to Dave Pinto," said Fred Canning, president and chief operating officer of Walgreen.  Joseph Antonini, K mart's chairman and chief executive, also refused to comment.  Through a spokesman, Lawrence Hoff, president of Upjohn Co., not only declined to comment but took the unusual step of suggesting a reporter speak to one of his competitors, Ronald Ahrens, president of the consumer products group at Bristol-Myers.  "How did you hear about this?  I didn't think it was generally known," said Philip Wilber, chairman and chief executive of Worthington, Ohio-based Drug Emporium Inc., the 13th-largest drug chain.  He plans to attend his first group meeting soon.  "This is just a group of people that can talk to each other in confidence, that can get together and talk about things that are bothering them," Mr. Wilbur said, adding that Mr. Pinto's reputation for discretion was a big factor in his agreeing to join.  "He's just perfect for this.  He knows the people he can have a confidence with, and he knows the people he can't have a confidence with.  That's the key."  According to Mr. Pinto and others, the group has had at least three weekend meetings, twice at the Mansion on Turtle Creek hotel in Dallas and most recently at the Westin Crown Center in Kansas City, Mo., in June.  The topics it has discussed en masse certainly wouldn't break any laws.  In Kansas City, John Pepper, president of Procter & Gamble, gave a speech to some three dozen executives, offering to share his company's expertise on the best ways to handle the industry's mounting garbage problems.  In Dallas in October, Ronald Ziegler, former press secretary to Richard Nixon and currently president of the National Association of Chain Drug Stores, addressed the group on the outlook for last fall's presidential election.  Members also break up into small groups to discuss a wide range of topics.  "We're not talking about the price of slippers," said Revco's chief executive, Boake A. Sells.  "We're talking about pollution-control issues and narcotics problems.  There's been nothing said that I wouldn't repeat to my mother."  But to some, the group's formation is just another example of the big guys teaming up to stomp on the little guys.  "You have to be realistic," said John Haronian, president and chief executive of Douglas Drug Inc., the 48th-largest drug chain.  "This kind of thing happens.  No matter how you say you don't like it, this is the real world."  K mart Corp. said it is offering to purchase the stock of holders who as of Aug. 17 owned less than 100 common shares.  The retail concern said the offer, which will extend through Oct. 12, is being made in an effort to reduce the costs of servicing these accounts.  K mart wouldn't say how much it expects to save as a result of the offering.  The company said it will pay the average of the New York Stock Exchange closing prices for its stock from Sept. 7 through Oct. 12; K mart closed at $42.25, up 25 cents yesterday.  K mart said the offer is being directed to about 45,500 holders who own a total of about 1.5 million shares.  K mart has about 200 million common shares outstanding.  Newhall Land & Farming Co., Valencia, Calif., said it sold 238 single-family lots, on 87.4 acres, in its Northbridge residential development for $43 million to Bramalea California Inc., a home-building unit of Trizec Corp., Calgary, Alberta.  Newhall Land said the sale will add about $23 million, or $1.16 a unit, to net income for the third quarter, and an additional $7 million in coming years as the project is completed.  In addition to the sales price, Newhall Land will get part of the project's profits, after a preferred return to the buyer.  The land-resources company said it will use proceeds to reduce bank loans taken in connection with its recent repurchases of depositary units.  New York Times Co. said it will raise the newsstand price of its weekday edition to 40 cents from 35 cents, effective Sept. 18.  Lance Primis, president, said the increase was due to "rising production and distribution costs."  The boost affects newsstand sales within 75 miles of New York City.  The New York Times raised its newsstand price to 35 cents from 30 cents about a year ago.  Prior to that, there had been no price increase for six years.  There will be no change in the price of home delivery, nor in the $1.25 newsstand price of the Sunday New York Times.  Sharp Electronics Corp. unveiled a large-screen projection television called SharpVision that uses the first single-beam liquid crystal display projection system in a consumer product.  Other big-screen projection TVs rely on a three-beam system that usually delivers picture quality inferior to that of regular TV picture tubes.  SharpVision can project a high-resolution image of up to 100 inches, measured diagonally, onto its own glass-beaded screen.  The SharpVision unit, which weighs 30 pounds, will go on sale this month.  It carries a list price of $5,200, with screen included.  Steve Search, Sharp's national marketing manager for video, said the company has budgeted $10 million for advertising and expects to sell 10,000 units in the first year.  Sharp Electronics, based in Mahwah, N.J., is a unit of Sharp Corp. of Japan.  RJR Nabisco Inc. expects to sell its Del Monte canned-foods business for about $1.48 billion to a leveraged buy-out group led by Citicorp Venture Capital, according to market sources.  The sale, expected to be announced next week, means that RJR will receive a total of $2.35 billion for Del Monte's tropical-fruit and canned-food businesses.  That total falls short of the $3 billion that Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., which took RJR private in a $25 billion leveraged buy-out, hoped Del Monte would fetch, according to a former RJR executive.  "We all knew it was a tough piece to sell," he said.  He speculated that KKR would next try to sell the Planters LifeSavers business, and may eventually have to sell parts of its domestic Nabisco business.  That business, along with the tobacco company, are considered RJR's crown jewels, and assets that KKR has said it wants to keep.  Though the total price was lower than hoped for, the Del Monte sales seem to keep RJR on track toward a goal of selling $5.5 billion in food assets within the first year after the buy-out.  The asset sales will play a big part in determining the buy-out's success.  The first major sale, a $2.5 billion purchase of five European food businesses by BSN S.A. in France, was far above expectations.  RJR yesterday confirmed a report in The Wall Street Journal that it plans to sell the Del Monte tropical-fruit unit, which sells bananas and pineapples, for $875 million to Polly Peck International PLC.  RJR bonds, which moved up substantially in price since the buy-out was completed last spring, inched up slightly in reaction to the tropical-fruit sale news.  The price "wasn't out of line.  So this continues a trend of adequate prices being received, confirming that cash flow will be more than adequate to service the debt," said Roy Burry, a beverage and tobacco analyst at Kidder, Peabody & Co.  The sale of the canned-food division, which sells canned fruits and vegetables, doesn't include Del Monte's Canadian operations, but does include the businesses in the U.S., Europe, Latin America, and the Far East.  RJR plans to keep the Canadian business, which could by itself be worth $100 million or more.  Although less than hoped for, a former RJR food executive said the final sale price for Del Monte was nonetheless "good" for KKR.  Before the sale of the tropical-fruit unit was disclosed, word had been out that KKR was having trouble selling Del Monte in one piece and might resort to selling it at a lesser price to somebody else to break up, another former RJR executive said.  The Del Monte purchase would be the largest buy-out for the Citicorp unit, a midsized buy-out organization whose largest previous transaction was a $1.35 billion buy-out in December 1986 of Reliance Electric Corp., which Citicorp Venture led with Prudential-Bache Securities Corp., according to Securities Data Corp.  The two-part Del Monte auction was orchestrated by Goldman, Sachs & Co.  In addition to advising Citicorp on the purchase, Merrill Lynch & Co. is expected to assist in the financing, which is likely to involve a sale of high-yield, high-risk junk bonds.  The canned-food sale price is 1.3 times the company's expected $1.9 billion sales, but only nine times its expected 1989 pretax operating profit of $160 million.  But the numbers aren't strictly comparable because the Canadian unit isn't being sold.  The tropical-fruit sale price was also 1.3 times sales and 13 times expected 1989 operating earnings of $70 million.  But if the $200 million value of ships which Del Monte has already bought and paid for, and which Polly Peck plans to sell, is subtracted from the $875 million price tag, the multiple of earnings would be only 10.  RJR Nabisco Inc.'s cookie and cracker unit unveiled plans for 12 new products, including what the company called the world's first microwave cookie.  Nabisco Biscuit Co. officials said plans call for spending $50 million this year and $100 million in 1990 to promote the new products, which are expected to be on store shelves this fall.  Company executives said the hefty financial commitment should dispel reports that the company's leveraged buyout by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. would drastically cut product development and promotional spending.  Of the new entries, perhaps the most original is Suddenly S'mores, cookies that mimic the campfire concoction of chocolate bar, marshmallow and graham crackers.  But instead of melting the cookies over an open fire, they go into a microwave oven.  Most of the other products are simply line extensions of existing best-sellers that don't represent much of an innovative gamble.  They include Premium Bits and Triscuit Bits, both miniature-sized versions of the regular crackers.  Other new products, including Oat Thins, which look like Wheat Thins, and Harvest Crisps will attempt to capitalize on the oat bran craze.  Regional launches are planned this month for most of the new items.  A national launch is planned for the second quarter of 1990.  The Acura division of American Honda Motor Co. said it is freezing prices on all but its most expensive 1990 model Legend automobiles.  Prices on all but the top of the line LS model won't increase from 1989 levels.  Thus, the base price for the four-door Legend sedan remains at $22,600 and the Legend Coupe base price holds steady at $24,760, the U.S. operations of Japan's Honda Motor Co. said.  The new base price of the LS is $29,610, up $450 or 1.5% from $29,160 for the 1989 version.  New features on the four-door coupe LS include real wood trim, a rear spoiler and high-performance tires.  The four-door sedan LS also has real wood trim.  Acura said it isn't changing prices on its 1990 model Integra, which start at $11,950.  The 1990 Integra went on sale in May.  A late afternoon sell-off knocked stock prices down a few notches while currency traders drove the dollar moderately higher in the face of concerted central bank intervention.  Bond prices eased.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average lost 12.91 points to close at 2706.88 after trading modestly higher through much of the day.  The Dow Jones Transportation Average took a bigger hit, losing 27.74 points to 1480.97 as investors continued to jettison high-priced airline stocks.  The dollar stood up to a steady barrage of central bank intervention, posting gains against both the West German mark and the Japanese yen.  With little economic news to motivate investors, the bond market was moribund.  Stock prices opened on an upbeat note as institutional and foreign buyers moved in to take advantage of the perceived bargains left in the wake of Wednesday's nearly 25-point plunge.  But there wasn't sufficient interest to sustain a rally and prices settled into a narrow range through most of the day.  A late round of program selling related to stock index arbitrage finally sent prices lower.  Hugh Johnson, chief investment officer at First Albany Corp., said it won't be hard to persuade money managers to sell stocks.  He said economic data are showing that the manufacturing side of the economy is weakening and the sustained strength of the dollar is likely to worsen that situation as it makes U.S. exports less attractive.  This performance of financial markets this week -- falling stock prices and stable bond prices -- tend to foreshadow a weaker economy, he said.  The dollar gained sharply in early European trading on speculation that the West German Bundesbank wouldn't push interest rates higher at its policymaking meeting.  After the German central bank indeed held interest rates steady, traders and central banks battled throughout the day.  The dollar ended off its highs, but above Wednesday's New York close and traders said the U.S. currency is likely to hit 2 marks next week.  In major market action:  Stock prices slipped in moderate trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 160.2 million shares.  Declining issues on the Big Board barely outpaced gainers 714 to 713.  Bond prices were off slightly.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year issue lost less than an eighth of a point, or less than $1.25 for each $1,000 of face amount.  The yield on the issue rose to 8.11%.  The dollar was higher.  In late New York trading the dollar was quoted at 1.9800 marks and 146.63 yen compared with 1.9755 marks and 146.15 yen.  Ashland Oil Inc. said it agreed to pay $325 million to National Iranian Oil Co. to settle a 10-year dispute over crude oil purchased from Iran.  The Ashland, Ky., oil refiner and marketer expects the settlement to result in a pretax charge of $42 million in its fiscal fourth quarter, which ends Sept. 30.  In the 1988 fourth quarter, Ashland earned $66.2 million, or $1.19 a share.  The accord with Iran also calls for a settlement of all litigation between them.  Iran's claims exceeded $768 million.  Ashland officials worked to settle the dispute for almost a decade.  The case was set to go to trial in a federal court in Mississippi on Monday.  A separate suit was filed in Bermuda and Ashland filed various counterclaims against Iran.  John R. Hall, chairman and chief executive officer of Ashland, was in Mississippi this week overseeing the settlement, which he termed fair and best for both parties.  What's unclear about the settlement is its effect, if any, on a separate federal investigation of Ashland's former chief executive, Orin E. Atkins.  Mr. Atkins was arrested in July 1988 for theft of confidential Ashland documents, which federal officials say he and associates tried to sell to Iranian officials to help the Iranians in the oil-dispute case.  Mr. Atkins was released on bail and formal charges haven't been brought by the U.S. attorney in New York.  People close to the case say the U.S. attorney is continuing the investigation but its status is unclear.  Mr. Atkins's lawyer previously said Mr. Atkins would be cleared.  An Ashland spokesman said: "We don't think the settlement will have any affect on the situation."  While the settlement will result in the charge, officials emphasized that the company had anticipated paying for the oil, carrying $283 million as a current liability on its books relating to that payment.  "Ashland never disputed receiving the crude oil or that it was obligated to pay a reasonable price for it," Mr. Hall said.  Iran sued for $283 million, plus interest of about $485 million.  Ashland officials contended that Iran breached its contract by raising the price and altering other terms of its agreement in 1979.  Charles J. Luellen, Ashland president and chief operating officer said the settlement indicates that Iran "thought we had a pretty good case."  Attorneys for the Iranian oil company couldn't be reached for comment.  Mr. Luellen said that despite the charge "this year is still going to be good."  A U.S. investment-management concern acquired 9.4% of Saatchi & Saatchi Co., renewing speculation about a possible takeover bid for the advertising giant.  Saatchi, the world's biggest advertising group, said Southeastern Asset Management Inc. bought about 14.9 million shares represented by American Depository Receipts, making Southeastern by far the largest Saatchi holder.  While Southeastern isn't expected to make a takeover play itself, its investment was viewed as significant by Wall Street, signaling that perhaps Southeastern is betting on a Saatchi takeover bid by someone else.  But Saatchi professed nonchalance at the development, describing Southeastern's investment policy as involving "long-term holdings in major corporations."  In a telephone interview, Timothy Jackson, Saatchi's investor-relations director, said, "We welcome long-term holders" of Saatchi shares.  He wouldn't comment further on the announcement.  In a statement, Southeastern said the purchases of Saatchi stock "are for investment purposes only" and aren't aimed at "changing or influencing control of Saatchi."  Southeastern, based in Memphis, Tenn., manages $2.3 billion for U.S. investors.  Southeastern Asset declined to comment beyond its prepared statement.  The announcement pushed Saatchi stock sharply higher on London's Stock Exchange.  Saatchi shares rose 15 pence to 325 pence ($5.05) apiece, before falling back a bit to trade late yesterday at 321 pence, up 11 pence from Wednesday.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Saatchi shares closed at $15.25 apiece, up 37.5 cents.  Speculation about a possible bid for Saatchi has been kicking around for several months, although specific candidates aren't mentioned.  Saatchi shocked investors in March with the news that fiscal 1989 pretax profit would fall below fiscal 1988's already disappointing results.  Three months later, the company reported a 68% plunge in pretax profit to #20.2 million in the six months ended March 31.  The company also confirmed then that it is trying to sell or spin off its consulting division.  And just last month, Saatchi said the current advertising market is softer than the company had expected.  Southeastern, while it has no history of takeover attempts itself, has had a good nose for takeover stocks.  According to Alan Gottesman, an analyst with PaineWebber Inc., Southeastern bought shares of both J. Walter Thompson Co. and Ogilvy Group Inc. at least six months before successful bids were made for each by WPP Group PLC.  "What may well have attracted {Southeastern} to those other two were that they were significantly undervalued, quite independently of whether they were to get taken over," Mr. Gottesman says.  Still, he adds, Southeastern "has had in the past" good luck picking takeover candidates.  The firm, headed by O. Mason Hawkins, has owned sizable stakes in several companies in recent years, including Allegheny International Inc., Bell Industries Inc., and ProGroup Inc. CDA Investment Technologies ranked the firm the fourth-best performer among investment managers in 1988; at the time, Mr. Hawkins attributed those results to investments in financial companies such as American Express Co. and Salomon Inc., as well as in the newspaper industry.  Southeastern's stake in Saatchi is nearly triple the 3.3% holding jointly owned by company founders Charles and Maurice Saatchi.  "It is a fairly serious stake," said Brian Sturgess, an advertising-industry analyst at London brokers Barclays de Zoete Wedd Holdings Ltd.  He suggested Southeastern may be "betting on somebody making a bid fairly soon."  But any predator might well wait for Saatchi to sell its consulting division.  Analysts peg the company's current debts at #120 million to #150 million.  If the consulting businesses fetch #250 to #350 million, as expected, Saatchi would have at least #100 million in cash -- and be far more attractive to a predator.  Saatchi has said it expects to complete any sale of the consulting division by the end of this year.  Mr. Jackson declined to comment yesterday on progress in the group's efforts.  ---  Taster's Choice to McCann  McCann-Erickson got a much-needed jolt of caffeine yesterday, winning the $25 million Taster's Choice instant coffee account from Nestle Foods Corp., a unit of Nestle S.A.  The account is the Interpublic Group agency's first major new business win in many months.  The agency has been rocked by a number of account losses recently, including the $20 million to $25 million American Express Gold Card account and the Camel and Winston cigarette brands, together valued at more than $55 million.  McCann eliminated 15 to 20 staff positions after losing the cigarette accounts.  The addition of Taster's Choice, the nation's leading premium instant coffee brand, to McCann's account roster is clearly a morale-boosting victory.  In awarding it the business, Nestle cited a desire to consolidate its ad assignments and McCann's "excellent" work on its Nescafe coffee account, business that it has handled since 1981.  Taster's Choice advertising had previously been handled by Della Femina, McNamee WCRS.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNT: National Football League Properties, New York, named Grey Advertising, New York, agency of record for its NFL merchandise line called Team NFL. Billings weren't disclosed.  WHO'S NEWS: Two top executives of Boase Massimi Pollitt, the London ad agency recently acquired by Omnicom Group, are joining Omnicom's BBDO agency in London.  Peter Jones, formerly president and chief executive of BMP, will head the office; Tim Cox, also a senior BMP executive, will become its media director.  Cooper Cos., Palo Alto, Calif., said it rescheduled its shareholder meeting for the second time.  The meeting is now set for Sept. 27, the health-care products maker said.  A Cooper spokesman said the company changed the date from Sept. 15 because the Securities and Exchange Commission had taken longer than expected to review proxy materials.  The spokesman said the company wanted to give shareholders enough time to review the materials.  Last month, a judge ordered the meeting delayed from its original Aug. 2 date.  The judge said, among other things, that Cooper's proxy statement had failed to include up-to-date financial information and that dissident shareholders had improperly solicited proxies.  Dissident shareholders have been challenging Cooper's management over the performance of the company.  It had a loss of $38 million on sales of $245.9 million in the six months ended April 30.  Dow Chemical Co. said it set a proration factor of 43.128% on shares of Marion Laboratories Inc. common stock tendered during Dow's offer to buy 58.5 million Marion shares.  The $38-a-share tender offer was part of a complex transaction to give Dow control of the Kansas City, Mo., pharmaceutical company.  Dow said the proration factor was determined after 135.6 million Marion shares were tendered.  Dow said payment for the shares will begin Friday.  With the purchase of the shares, Dow will own 38.9% of Marion's common stock; Dow also has the voting control of a further 13% of Marion's shares held by Marion's founder and chairman, Ewing M. Kauffman, and his family.  Bond prices gave up early gains and ended mixed in quiet trading.  Although a stronger dollar and comments from a White House economist sent Treasury prices higher, technical factors knocked them down.  The benchmark 30-year bond ended about 1/8 point lower, or off by about $1.25 for each $1,000 face amount.  The long-term bond had been up as much as 1/4 point in early trading.  Short-term Treasurys along with corporate, municipal and mortgage-backed securities ended slightly lower to modestly higher.  The bond market opened on a positive note in response to news that policy makers at West Germany's central bank, known as the Bundesbank, voted to leave interest rates unchanged.  "When the Bundesbank did not raise rates, the dollar firmed and then the bond market firmed up," said Steven Saslow, executive managing director in charge of risk at Carroll McEntee & McGinley Inc. But, he added, trading was extremely light, continuing a pattern that began last month.  "We didn't see a whole lot of action from customers.  Most of the buying was among speculators and dealers," he said.  Treasurys were also helped by the remarks of Council of Economic Advisers Chairman Michael Boskin.  In a speech before the U.S. Chamber of Commerce, the White House's chief economist said that a further easing of monetary policy by the Federal Reserve would "probably be appropriate."  Bond buyers interpreted his comments as meaning that the Fed should lower rates.  But Mr. Boskin later clarified his remarks and said he didn't intend to call on the Fed to immediately lower interest rates.  Soon afterward, bond prices started to ease.  Later in the day, the market was hit by profit-taking and large liquidations in the mortgage-backed securities market.  Traders estimate more than $1 billion of mortgage securities were sold yesterday by ailing thrift institutions.  There were rumors that one of the sellers was New West Federal Savings & Loan Association, a so-called "bad bank" that was established to hold the troubled assets of American Savings & Loan Association.  New West, which was formed in 1988 when the Federal Savings & Loan Insurance Corp. arranged the bailout of failed American Savings, has been liquidating its $13 billion mortgage portfolio since July.  Traders said yesterday that the thrift sold $800 million of Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. 9% securities.  There also were rumors that other thrifts sold Federal National Mortgage Association 8% and 8 1/2% securities.  Such sales hurt Treasury issues because many of the dealers who buy the mortgage securities hedge their market risk by selling intermediate and long-dated government securities.  Although the size of the mortgage liquidation was relatively small when compared to the trillion-dollar Treasury market, analysts explained that the market was jolted because trading activity has been extremely thin.  "It's not that there was aggressive selling, it's just that the buying dried up and so few investors were in the market," saidJohn Slosberg, senior fixed-income analyst at Technical Data Global Markets Group in Boston.  The early-morning rally "really didn't have much of an underpinning," he said.  Treasury Securities  Treasury securities were narrowly mixed in thin trading.  The benchmark 30year bond ended at a price of 100 1/32 compared with 100 4/32 Wednesday.  The issue's yield, which moves in the opposite direction from its price, rose to 8.11% from 8.10%.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted late at a price of 98 22/32 to yield 8.18% compared with 98 26/32 to yield 8.16% Wednesday.  The latest two-year notes were quoted at a price of 99 24/32, up slightly from Wednesday's price of 99 23/32.  The yield fell to 8.32% from 8.34%  Short-term rates eased yesterday.  The discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was 7.80% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.05% while the rate on six-month bills was 7.80% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.21%.  Corporate Issues  Corporate bonds ended unchanged after dull trading.  Among new issues, a $300 million debt offering by Rockwell International Corp. saw good investor demand despite the lack of event-risk protection.  The aerospace and electronics concern offered 10-year noncallable notes priced to yield 8.965%, a spread of .8 percentage point above the 10-year Treasury note.  Morgan Stanley & Co. was lead manager of the deal.  Dealers say the Rockwell deal was a sellout because investors believe the company's close business relationship with the U.S. Defense Department makes it an unlikely takeover candidate.  Merrill Lynch Capital Markets won the right to sell a $200 million issue of subordinated notes by the Bank of Nova Scotia.  The 10-year noncallable notes were reoffered at a price to yield 9.047%.  Foreign Bonds  News that West Germany's Bundesbank decided to leave key interest rates unchanged gave most foreign bonds mild support.  But in Japan, the news was overshadowed by the dollar's advance against the yen.  One bond trader in Tokyo said the market there has been "shaken very badly" by the dollar's surge and concerns about upward pressure on interest rates in Japan and abroad.  "I don't like this market," he said.  "I'm very bearish."  With the outlook for bonds still uncertain, traders said some Japanese investors are turning to short-term securities.  Rates on one-month and three-month certificates of deposit, for example, were yielding above 5.5%, 1/4 percentage point more than Japan's benchmark.  Still, Japanese government bonds posted slight gains.  The benchmark No. 111 4.6% bond due 1998 closed at a price of 96.09, up 0.06 point, to yield 5.25%.  In West Germany, the benchmark 6 3/4% bond due June 1999 rose 0.10 point to 99.20 to yield 6.87% while the 6 3/4% notes due 1994 rose by the same amount and ended at 99.10, to yield 6.97%.  In London, the government's 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 closed at a price of about 113 31/32 to yield 9.84% while the 11 3/4% issue due 1991 rose 3/32 to 99 14/32 to yield 12.15%.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities gave up early gains of as much as 1/8 point and finished with slight losses amid speculation about large sales by thrift institutions.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for September delivery ended at 97 3/32, down 2/32; 9 1/2% securities at 99 5/32, down 3/32; 10% securities at 101 10/32, down 2/32; and Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp.9% securities at 96 7/32, down 2/32.  The Ginnie Mae 9% securities were yielding 9.54% to a 12-year average life assumption, as the spread above the Treasury 10-year note held at 1.36 percentage points.  Municipals  Municipal bonds were unchanged to 1/8 point higher as traders waited for a new supply of issues to shake out of the sluggishness.  California's $384.6 million of general obligation bonds provided some excitement to an otherwise dull day.  Of the total, $339 million of bonds subject to the alternative minimum tax was won by a Citicorp group with a true interest cost of 7.38%.  Bank of America garnered the $45.6 million portion of the California issue that was not subject to the tax with a bid setting the true interest cost at 7.02%.  Proceeds of the sale will to be used to help finance the purchase of homes or farms for war veterans in California.  In the secondary market, the bellwether New Jersey Turnpike Authority's 7.20% issue at 98 1/4 was unchanged from late Wednesday to yield 7.35%.  Commodore International Ltd.'s U.S. unit said it signed an agreement for Connecting Point of America Inc., a large chain, to carry its personal computers.  Harry Copperman, president of the unit, said in an interview that the agreement is aimed primarily at West Chester, Pa.-based Commodore's Amiga line.  Those are technologically slick computers that have had only limited success partly because Commodore's distribution has been weak.  Connecting Point has 325 stores, giving Commodore significant additional distribution on top of the more than 1,000 dealers that already carry its products.  Mr. Copperman said the company has several other distribution agreements in the works, as well, although they would be on a much smaller scale.  He also said the company is re-evaluating its current distribution network, requiring that dealers offer better service and focus more on customers in certain industries.  Mr. Copperman also said Commodore will escalate marketing efforts, largely with a more than $10 million ad campaign that will run in the fourth quarter.  WestAir Holding Inc. reported that its August traffic rose 50% to 48,599,000 revenue passenger miles from 32,466,000 miles a year earlier.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  Load factor, or the percentage of available seats occupied, declined 1.5 percentage points to 48.2% from 49.7% logged during August last year.  For the first eight months of 1989, the airline reported that traffic rose 50% to 316,372,000 revenue passenger miles from 210,796,000 miles a year earlier.  Load factor fell to 45.8% from 47.9%.  Kansas City Star Co., publisher of the afternoon Kansas City Star and the morning Kansas City Times, said it is studying whether to merge the two papers, which currently operate with separate editorial staffs.  Kansas City Star Co. is owned by Capital Cities/ABC Inc.  "For years there have been consistent rumors that publication of the afternoon paper would cease," wrote Publisher James H. Hale in a memo to employees.  The current study is aimed at providing a "definitive answer" to the question, said Mr. Hale, adding "it is essential that we place these newspapers in the best possible strategic position for the long term."  The Star, with daily circulation of 171,000, is considered weaker than the Times, which has a daily circulation of about 267,000.  In recent years, the Star's readership has declined steadily as the Times' has grown stronger.  Mr. Hale's memo said no decision has yet been reached, and added that any staff reductions that might result from such a combination would occur through attrition, not layoffs.  Morrison Knudsen Corp., Boise, Idaho, said it and a joint-venture partner had won a construction contract exceeding $133 million with the U.S. Army.  The Corps of Engineers awarded the contract to Morrison and Harnischfeger Engineers Inc., a Milwaukee, Wis., process-engineering concern, Morrison said.  The companies will operate as Red River Constructors Inc. to design and build a 1.2 million-square-foot automated warehouse for the Army near Texarkana, Texas, the company said.  Morrison, a construction and engineering concern with $1.91 billion sales last year, already is building another such facility in Pennsylvania.  It's partner is a unit of Harnischfeger Industries Inc.  London stock prices recovered some of the ground lost a day earlier, closing sharply higher in modest dealings after interest-rate fears and worries over new U.K. rights issues abated.  Tokyo stocks finished lower for the third consecutive day.  At London, the Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index closed at 2415.9, up 25.1, and only slightly below its session high of 2416.1.  The index had lost 35.2 points Wednesday.  A narrower measure of the market, the Financial Times Stock Exchange 30-share index, closed 20.4 higher at 1999.1.  Volume was modest at 508.9 million shares, down from 540.1 million Wednesday.  Dealers said they saw the recovery largely as a reaction to the severity of Wednesday's drop.  Whether the market further recoups its recent losses is somewhat uncertain, given a more sluggish recovery in New York.  At the close of the London dealings, the Dow Jones Industrial Average was up 2.09 points at 2721.69.  The DJIA closed 24.89 lower Wednesday at 2719.79.  Fears of a potential flood of new rights issues eased early in the day when Polly Peck International confirmed it will finance part of its #557 million ($863 million) purchase of the fresh fruit operations of Del Monte through a 3-for-7 rights issue.  The #283 million to be raised in the issue is less than many market watchers had expected.  The Polly Peck news also took the steam out of speculation that other, larger companies were about to launch rights issues.  London shares have gyrated since the FT-SE 100 broke through the psychologically important 2400-point level on Friday and to its highest close in 1989 on Monday.  Dealers said there have been growing concerns over whether institutional players will aggressively buy anew, or just seek to book profits before the end of the third quarter.  "It feels good enough at the moment," a U.K. dealer said of the FT-SE 100's return to levels above 2400.  "It could go further.  But a lot depends on what Wall Street does overnight."  Other dealers agreed, saying continued weakness in the DJIA could add to London's concerns over institutional interest and keep the FT-SE 100 locked in a near-term range of 2375 to 2425.  Dealers noted that the market still appeared intent Thursday on recovering some of its losses.  Polly Peck recovered more than the 14 1/2 pence (22.5 cents) it lost Wednesday when worries about a rights issue peaked.  The shares closed at 369 pence ($5.72), up 70.  Thorn EMI, also the focus of rights-issue speculation recently, gained 18 to 885.  But Eurotunnel shares shed 17 to 703 on some continued nervousness that the Anglo-French consortium would soon announce a rights issue to help it with cost overruns on the channel project.  Corporate earnings reports arrived at or below most market expectations during the session.  The reports, however, didn't severely affect the session's upward momentum, dealers said.  Reckitt & Colman advanced 32 to #12.33.  The maker of health and household products said strong European sales growth in household goods and toiletries helped boost first-half pretax profit by 14%.  In oils, Burmah shed 5 to 640 on profit-taking after reporting a 17% rise in net income during the six-month period ended June 30, thanks to strong growth in core businesses.  Enterprise Oil was up a penny to 604 after it reported pretax profit in the first six months of the year jumped 33%.  At Tokyo, traders said both institutional and individual investors hugged the sidelines because of growing speculation about higher interest rates, the dollar's continuing strength and lower bond prices.  Kinju Nomura, director of the equity division at Taiheiyo Securities, said investors are beginning to shed large-capitalization issues as exchange and interest rates become more unpredictable.  Thursday's market was tempered by the uncertain mood and a reluctance to enter the market, he said.  The Nikkei index of 225 selected issues was down 118.75 points at 34152.56.  The index lost 170.64 points Wednesday.  In early trading in Tokyo Friday, the Nikkei index rose 90.5 points to 34243.06.  Thursday's volume on the First Section was estimated at 600 million shares, in line with 581 million shares Wednesday.  Declining issues outnumbered advancing issues by 532 to 410, while 168 remained unchanged.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index (Topix) of all issues listed in the First Section, which fell 10.64 points Wednesday, was down 9.31 points, or 0.36%, at 2593.39.  The Second Section index, which gained 11.30 points Wednesday, was up 36.81 points, or 1.09%, to close at 3420.16.  Volume in the second section was estimated at 23 million shares, down from 25.5 million Wednesday.  Steels continued to suffer deep losses.  Kawasaki Steel was down 18 yen (12.3 cents) to 812 yen ($5.55), Kobe Steel lost 13 to 741, NKK fell 18 to 740 and Nippon Steel was down 18 to end the day at 765.  Constructions shed points.  Taisei lost 30 to 1,510.  Shimizu fell 60 to 2,040 and Ohbayashi was down 50 to 1,630.  Traders said these large-capitalization issues are unlikely to rebound for a long time unless the U.S. reduces interest rates.  Among interest-sensitive stocks, banks were lower.  Sanwa Bank lost 70 to 2,800, Mitsubishi Bank fell 20 to 3,180 and Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank was down 30 to 3,460.  What little buying there was was directed at incentive-backed, smaller-capitalization issues.  Among them, foods maintained the popularity they have enjoyed throughout the week.  Nissin Food Products advanced 300 to 4,650, helped by the strong earnings prospects sparked by a newly developed instant cup noodle as well as the speculation that the company might distribute large gratis issues, traders said.  Elsewhere, stock prices closed lower in Sydney, Wellington, Seoul and Manila, and were higher in Hong Kong, Singapore and Taipei.  Share prices closed higher in Frankfurt and Amsterdam; lower in Paris, Zurich, Stockholm and Milan; and mixed in Brussels.  South African gold stocks rose.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Sep 6 Sep 5 Year  U.S. .......................... 321.4 324.4 + 25.5  Britain ....................... 717.2 727.1 + 31.3  Canada ........................ 432.8 435.4 + 17.9  Japan ......................... 1526.1 1535.6 + 7.4  France ........................ 546.7 547.4 + 23.5  Germany ....................... 259.9 260.1 + 25.0  Hong Kong ..................... 1931.0 1920.8 - 4.9  Switzerland ................... 237.1 236.5 + 37.1  Australia ..................... 355.1 354.9 + 22.3  World index ................... 530.2 532.5 + 7.2  The research council of the National Academy of Sciences struck a blow at conventional, pesticide-heavy farming techniques, condemning federal programs that discourage alternative farming practices.  The council, after a four-year study focusing on alternative agricultural approaches, called on Congress to overhaul current federal farm programs.  The report counters the conventional belief that crop rotation and biological pest control are unproductive and unprofitable.  It said that such practices, along with reduced pesticide and synthetic-fertilizer use, sometimes even boost crop yields.  Wider adoption of such practices would bring "greater economic benefits to farmers and environmental gains for the nation," the report said, citing public concern about chemicals in water and foods.  Already, the council said, agriculture causes between $2 billion and $16 billion in damages to the nation's water supply each year.  Chemical companies and industry groups had mixed reactions to the report.  Gary Myers, president of the Fertilizer Institute, criticized the academy.  "They want to encourage an elitist food policy.  It is a real slap at the American consumer and the American farmer."  He said farmers haven't switched to alternative practices because they aren't economically viable and would raise food prices.  He said U.S. crop yields are among the highest in the world, and that the country shouldn't tinker with a winning formula.  But James W. Searcy, manager of global product development for Du Pont Agricultural Products, said federal policies discouraging alternative techniques should be changed.  Although Du Pont Co. is a large chemical producer, he said the company is preparing to market biological control techniques and genetically engineered crops that better resist disease and pests.  Meanwhile, Charles Hess, assistant agriculture secretary for science and education, said the USDA agrees with the report's recommendations and would support similar proposals for the 1990 congressional farm bill.  Although most farmers don't use alternative agricultural methods, more have recently adopted such techniques to reduce costs, protect their own health and combat pests that are increasingly resistant to chemicals.  More farmers would embrace alternative and environmentally sound farm practices if federal programs were to change, said Richard Harwood, who worked on the NAS report.  Commodity price-support programs specifically discourage crop rotation, which allows the use of nitrogen-fixing plants as a substitute for synthetic fertilizers.  Crop rotation also helps control soil erosion, which is occurring at a rate of three billion tons a year.  The report also recommends overhauling federal grading standards for produce that impose "cosmetic" criteria that are difficult for farmers to meet with alternative methods, but have nothing to do with the food's nutritional quality.  Oranges with slight mite damage on the skin, for example, get lower gradings and thus fetch reduced prices, even if they are to be used for juice, Mr. Harwood said.  The government, he added, must launch educational efforts so that consumers won't shun cosmetically damaged products.  And, it must pump $40 million into research on alternative agricultural practices, which until recently the government and U.S. universities have largely ignored, the report said.  Canada's two national airline companies have broken with industry practice by revising their frequent-flier plans so that certain travelers will be credited with only a half a point for each mile flown.  Frequent-flier plans generally credit travelers with a minimum of one point for each mile.  Air Canada and PWA Corp. said the half-point credits will apply from Feb. 1 to travelers who pay less than the full economy fare for flights within Canada.  Discount fares to points outside Canada still will be credited with one point a mile.  Both companies will reduce credits for full-fare economy flights to one point from 1.25 points a mile.  The companies have differing plans to revise the points credited to other classes of fares.  Randy Petersen, editor and publisher of Frequent, a frequent-flier magazine in Colorado Springs, Colo., said he didn't know of any other programs that offer less than one point a mile.  He predicted that the Canadian innovation would "never, never, never" spread to the U.S. because of greater airline competition there.  Blair Baldwin, manager of PWA's frequent-flier plan, said the new point structure better reflects the fares paid by passengers.  He said it also would moderate the growth of accumulated frequent-flier points, which had been "skyrocketing."  Canadian carriers offered as much as six points a mile last year during a three-cornered price war that concluded with PWA's acquisition of Wardair Inc. PWA also owns Canadian Airlines International.  Westinghouse Electric Corp., Pittsburgh, said a unit, First Westinghouse Capital, provided a $35.5 million mezzanine debt and equity financing package in the $375 million acquisition of General Nutrition Inc. by Thomas H. Lee Co. and MLLee Acquisition Fund Limited Partnership.  The acquisition was completed recently following a tender offer for 30.8 million General Nutrition common shares at $11.50 a share.  General Nutrition is a Pittsburgh-based retailer and maker of vitamin and mineral supplements and other health-related items.  Thomas H. Lee Co., Boston, specializes in friendly leveraged acquisitions, and MLLee Acquistion Fund is a public investment partnership established by the investment concern.  Investor Robert I. Green said that he intends to seek a court order compelling the management of Bancroft Convertible Fund to supply information in connection with his $44 million offer for the New York company.  Mr. Green said he had requested a computer list of Bancroft shareholders as well as company records for the past five years.  He said Bancroft management had offered him a list of holders that wasn't computerized and hadn't offered the records that he had requested.  Bancroft management hadn't any comment; Bancroft is a closed-end mutual bond fund invested in convertible bonds.  Mr. Green said the records are "pertinent and material" to his offer and that he will file suit in Delaware courts seeking the order.  In March, Mr. Green, who owns 8.5% of the fund, offered to buy all other shares outstanding for $18.95 a share, or about $44 million.  In American Stock Exchange trading yesterday, Bancroft closed at $18.75, unchanged.  The dollar resumed its ascent toward the psychologically important exchange level of two marks, despite concerted intervention by at least 10 central banks.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar stood at 1.9800 marks and 146.63 yen, up from 1.9755 marks and 146.15 yen Wednesday.  The pound fell to $1.5512 from $1.5525.  In Tokyo Friday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 146.20 yen, down from Thursday's Tokyo close of 146.65 yen.  In early European trading Thursday, the dollar was quoted as high as 1.9935 marks and 147.35 yen.  A combination of central-bank intervention and profit-taking initially brought it off those highs.  Late in New York activity, the dollar fell further -- nearly a pfennig and almost half a yen -- on what some traders said were some large sell orders in relatively thin markets.  That drop then snowballed as nervous traders scrambled to lock in profits.  Nonetheless, "net, net, the dollar is still a buy," said Jack Kessler, senior vice president in charge of Chase Manhattan Bank's New York foreign-exchange operation.  The immediate explanation for the dollar's rise was an early belief that the West German central bank wouldn't raise key interest rates at its scheduled meeting yesterday and then the announcement that in fact it didn't.  Analysts said the dollar remains bolstered by a U.S. economy that is more robust than many had thought earlier and a growing belief that the Federal Reserve won't lower U.S. interest rates soon.  Higher interest rates usually increase a currency's allure to international investors, traders and speculators.  If the dollar remains near its current levels -- many analysts at the start of the year predicted it would be as much as 25% lower than its current levels -- it could impede international efforts to reduce further the large U.S. trade deficit.  That is because a resilient U.S. currency makes U.S. exports more expensive and reduces the cost of imports.  A stronger dollar, however, also helps retard the growth of U.S. inflation by keeping import costs down as well as those of U.S. products that compete with imports.  In many ways, yesterday's activity was a replay of Tuesday's: currency markets tried to push the dollar above two marks; central banks sold the dollar when it was trading near 1.99 marks; the market retreated a bit on the intervention and profit-taking, yet the U.S. currency finished relatively strong.  On Wednesday, the dollar declined amid apprehension that the Bundesbank and Bank of Japan might raise key interest rates, thus increasing the attraction of mark- and yen-denominated investments.  Despite the ability of the central banks to keep the dollar below the two mark level, "by next week we'll surely see two marks," predicted Marcus Croonen, a dealer at DG Bank in Frankfurt, West Germany.  "The market is too bullish at the moment.  Everyone wants to see two marks; they want to test it."  Even so, he and many other traders and analysts say the U.S. currency's potential to rise far above either that level or 150 yen is limited.  "The central banks have the strength {to hold the dollar down}, but not at the moment," said Mr. Croonen.  "They will let the market see two marks, and then they will put the buck down."  While major central banks are concerned about the dollar's recent strength, they also appear to be taking its rise in stride.  Traders described the dollar sales during the past few days as rather modest.  For instance, they estimated that the Bank of Japan has sold an average of $200 million to $300 million in Far Eastern trading during the past three days, with roughly $400 million spent yesterday.  Those sums are a far cry from the more than $1 billion a day that traders said Japanese authorities spent trying to wrestle the dollar down during its last run-up in May and June.  Central banks could also resort to interest-rate maneuvers to lower the dollar.  For instance, rate boosts in West Germany and Japan coupled with lower rates in the U.S. would reduce the dollar's appeal relative to that of the mark and yen.  But each country has its own motive for relying solely on intervention at the moment.  "Young people in the Bank of Japan would like to see interest rates a bit higher because of the higher dollar, but the senior people are more concerned about internal political matters," said Yoichi Sakaguchi, chief trader for Sanwa Bank in New York.  After suffering big losses in recent parliamentary elections and facing more elections by next summer, Japan's ruling Liberal Democratic Party, contend analysts, is reluctant to tamper with Japanese economic growth or risk upsetting domestic stock and bond markets by raising interest rates.  Moreover, as a matter of policy, Japan tends not to raise or lower official interest rates as often as several of its major Western counterparts.  Thus, Mr. Sakaguchi said, "They won't change the discount rate, but will let the market take up short-term rates."  While the mark is weak both against the dollar and higher-yielding European currencies, the Bundesbank prefers not to be forced to raise rates, analysts said.  In addition, they said reduced commodity prices have somewhat mitigated the inflationary effects of a weak mark.  What's more, "the threat of higher interest rates if the dollar moves up {further} is always in the armament of the Bundesbank," said Kenneth De La Salle, manager of foreign exchange at National Westminster Bank in London.  Noting that as long as there was still solid demand for the dollar, he said: "It's pretty much senseless trying to turn a market where sentiment is quite strong."  Yet Mr. De La Salle added: "You don't have that hyped feeling; {the dollar's rise} is a steady movement, not a panic."  Later this year, West German industry and labor unions are scheduled to hold major wage negotiations.  If it felt it was necessary, the Bundesbank could raise interest rates then, "particularly if the exchange-rate situation would favor such a move," said Gisela Kurtz, an economist at Deutsche Bank in Frankfurt.  For its part, the U.S. sees the stronger dollar as damping inflation, contended some analysts.  In addition, "with the going dollar rate, Americans are able to serve world markets to the extent they want to and to the degree they have the capacity utilization to do it," said Ms. Kurtz.  But "as long as domestic demand is very high, American companies -- small and medium-sized corporations in particular -- won't turn to exports," she said.  Ms. Kurtz and others don't read these differing central-bank concerns as a sign of disagreement within the Group of Seven major industrial countries: the U.S., Japan, West Germany, France, Britain, Italy and Canada.  "I don't feel there is a rupture in as much as they are concentrating on domestic stability in keeping inflation down, are averse to an extremely high dollar and wouldn't want very erratic {currency} fluctuations," she said.  While many analysts say the G-7 has sought to keep the dollar within a secret trading range of 1.70-1.90 marks and 120-140 yen, "they aren't obligated to maintain a rigid range against all forces," said Ms. Kurtz.  "They are flexible and well they should be."  Because of this cooperation, many traders don't see the dollar climbing much above two marks.  "The two-mark level will most certainly bring the central banks into the market," said Mr. De La Salle of National Westminster.  Other traders also pointed out that European portfolio managers tended to lock in profits on their U.S. investments by selling dollars when the currency rose above two marks.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $360.20 an ounce, down $1.40.  Estimated volume was a light 1.6 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Friday, gold was quoted at $359.35 an ounce.  Fabri-Centers of America Inc. said it will move its corporate headquarters, warehouse and distribution facility to a larger building in Hudson, Ohio, early next year.  The sewing supplies and housewares retailer said it will sell the Beachwood facility after buying a 625,000-square-foot facility in Hudson.  Cost of the move wasn't disclosed.  Beachwood is a suburb on Cleveland's East Side, and Hudson is about 15 miles southeast of Cleveland.  The company's strategy calls for relocation of its smaller fabric retail stores to much larger locations, averaging 10,000 to 12,000 square feet, said Alan Rosskamm, president and chief executive officer.  The relocated headquarters and distribution center will be able to efficiently handle the increased sales and inventory requirements projected from these larger stores, he said.  Southwest Airlines Co. said its August traffic jumped 15.8%, to 894 million revenue passenger miles from the previous year's 772.1 million.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  The August load factor, or percentage of seats filled, increased to 67.4% from 62.6% last year.  For the year to date, Southwest, based here, reported a 29.5% increase in traffic, to 6.37 billion revenue passenger miles from 4.91 billion for the same period in 1988.  Load factor for the year also was up, to 65.2% from 56.8%.  A.T. Cross Co., Lincoln, R.I., said it expects profit for the third quarter to be below that of the year-ago quarter, citing a smaller-than-expected sales gain.  A year earlier, net income was $8.6 million, or 51 cents a share, on sales of $56 million.  The company said sales of writing instruments are up, but sales of leather goods are down, partly because of strong sales the year earlier from introductions of a new line by its Mark Cross unit.  The company said that for the year it expects to achieve its sales goal of 12% growth, but it said earnings will be "somewhat below that growth goal."  In 1988, Cross had net of $35.4 million, or $2.13 a share, on sales of $227.6 million.  United Merchants & Manufacturers Inc. said its president and chief executive officer is considering purchasing a controlling interest in the textile and apparel company and restructuring it.  The official, Uzi Ruskin, owns about 1.2 million of United Merchants' 9.1 million shares.  The company said its board had authorized Mr. Ruskin to "attempt to develop such a proposal" and would pay him reasonable legal and other fees.  The company said the proposal may hinge on continued availability of tax-loss carry-forwards, which totaled about $200 million in fiscal 1988.  The company said the investing group may include Menachem Atzmon, beneficial owner of about 4% of the company's shares.  Directors also will consider alternative proposals and the board has appointed a special committee to consider proposals.  United Merchants, which designs, makes and markets textiles, clothing and accessories, had a net loss of $14.9 million on $125.5 million in sales for the third fiscal quarter ended March 31.  An insurance-reform group sued California Insurance Commissioner Roxani Gillespie, accusing her of dragging her feet in implementing the state's rate-cutting Proposition 103.  The suit, filed in Sacramento Superior Court yesterday on behalf of the group Voter Revolt, charges that Ms. Gillespie isn't doing her job to establish rules by which the proposition will be enforced.  "She's completely failed to implement 103," said James Wheaton, the lead attorney who filed the suit.  Approved by voters in November, Proposition 103 calls for a 20% reduction in property- and casualty-insurance rates in California.  It also calls for changes in the way auto-insurance rates are calculated.  Last June, the state's supreme court called for exemptions to the rollbacks for companies that could prove that the cuts would deprive them of a chance to earn a "fair rate of return."  Ms. Gillespie has suggested that 11.2% is a fair rate of return, angering consumer groups that question the methods by which she came about that number.  The suit calls for Ms. Gillespie to stop using that number, which Mr. Wheaton calls an informal "back-of-the-envelope calculation" that is in "complete violation" of California's administrative procedures.  The suit, Mr. Wheaton said, includes a "record of nonfeasance" that charges that Ms. Gillespie has neglected two aspects of the implementation: She hasn't set standards by which hearings will be held to determine who gets rollback exemptions, it charges, and she hasn't set rules to determine how companies can set auto-insurance rates.  Proposition 103 calls for companies to use new rules to rate and underwrite auto insurance on Nov. 8.  State insurance officials in Ms. Gillespie's office couldn't be reached for comment on the suit.  Separately, Ms. Gillespie said she accelerated the schedule for hearings on rate rollbacks.  California's four largest insurers would be called for hearings within 30 days to determine whether their rate of return merits enforcing rate rollbacks, she said.  She said 449 insurance firms have applied for exemptions to the rollbacks.  Former shareholders of Pacific Lumber Co. filed suit against Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., Michael Milken and Ivan Boesky, charging fraud in the 1985 takeover of Pacific Lumber by Charles Hurwitz and companies he controls.  The suit, filed in a state court in Eureka, Calif., by three members of the Murphy family, seeks more than $18 million in damages and requests a jury trial.  The suit charges that the Murphy family members were forced to sell their shares at $40 each, well below what it calls their "true" value of more than $70 each, because of fraud by Drexel and others in connection with the takeover of Pacific Lumber by Maxxam Corp., a company controlled by Mr. Hurwitz.  At the time, the suit says, the members of the Murphy family held 600,000 shares.  Last October, four other former shareholders of Pacific Lumber filed a $2.25 billion suit in federal court in Los Angeles seeking to invalidate the takeover.  The holders also filed a similar suit in state court in Eureka.  Drexel has agreed since then to settle Securities and Exchange Commission fraud charges by paying the government $650 million and pleading guilty to six felony counts not related to Pacific Lumber.  The federal suit filed in Los Angeles has been consolidated with about 15 other suits against Drexel, Mr. Boesky and Mr. Milken in a federal court in New York.  A Drexel spokesman said, "We haven't been served with the suit, so we don't have any comment."  Mr. Milken, Drexel's former junk-bond chief, is under federal criminal indictment on stock-fraud and racketeering charges.  He couldn't be reached for comment.  Mr. Boesky, once a prominent Wall Street arbitrager, was sent to prison for insider trading.  Pacific Enterprises said a unit discovered an oil field in Logan County, Okla.  The utility holding company said its Pacific Enterprises Oil Co. unit completed drilling in the Holmes prospect in the interval between 5,289 feet and 5,294 feet.  It tested at 160 barrels of oil and 65,000 cubic feet of natural gas per day on a 24/64-inch choke with a flowing tubing pressure of 40 pounds per square inch.  The company owns a 100% working interest in the Holmes discovery well and has 358 acres under lease on the prospect.  The nine major U.S. auto makers built 871,655 cars and trucks in the U.S. during August, up 7.2% from 813,114 vehicles a year earlier.  The Big Three increased their U.S. car and truck production by 4.3% during August, compared with a year earlier.  General Motors Corp., Ford Motor Co. and Chrysler Corp. built 3.9% more cars in the latest month than in August 1988, but their share of total U.S. car output fell to 82.4% from 85.5% a year ago.  Truck production at GM, Ford, Chrysler and Nissan Motor Corp.'s U.S. plant totaled 334,200, up 6.2% from a year earlier.  The five major Japanese auto makers with their own or joint-venture plants in the U.S. boosted their total car and light-truck production in August by 34% to 105,632 vehicles from 78,753 a year earlier.  Meanwhile, auto makers expect to build this week 109,342 cars in the U.S., down from 121,609 in the year-ago week.  The Japanese and joint-venture plants increased their share of output to 16.9% this week from 12.6% a year ago.  For the year to date, total U.S. car production is down slightly from the 1988 level.  Car output by Japanese plants rose 44% for the year through last Friday, while Big Three car output fell 5.2% for the year so far.  ---  @ This Last Yr.  Ago -Yr. to Date- %  @ Week-e Week-r Week 1989 1988 Chg.  @GM 54,239 61,571 62,430 2,176,511 2,269,671 - 4  @Ford 21,577 23,156 26,317 1,196,189 1,255,672 - 5  @Chrysler 15,000 17,022 17,511 639,872 709,538 -10  @Honda 5,750 6,421 5,886 259,645 255,214 + 2  @Nissan 2,232 2,724 2,302 81,687 75,635 + 8  @Nummi- 1,950 1,145 2,650 138,407 114,924 +20  @Mazda 3,396 3,998 4,513 153,541 86,961 +77  @Toyota 2,966 3,340 0 85,575 0 d  @Diam.Star 2,232 2,276 0 46,445 0 d  @Industry 109,342 121,653 121,609 4,777,872 4,803,454x - 1  @ d-Percent change is greater than 999% e-Estimated. r-Revised.  Includes Chevrolet Prizm and Toyota Corolla. x-Includes Volkswagen production through July 1988.  ---  @ Aug Aug To date To date  @ U.S. Output 1989 1988 1989 1988  @ GENERAL MOTORS  @ Cars-b ........ 221,191 249,502 2,202,392 2,232,756  @ Trucks-buses .. 139,277 127,534 1,132,553 1,085,533  @ Total ........ 360,468 377,036 3,334,945 3,318,289  @ FORD MOTOR  @ Cars .......... 143,368 132,728 1,167,698 1,216,594  @ Trucks ........ 129,077 129,628 1,061,455 1,019,664  @ Total ........ 272,445 262,356 2,229,153 2,236,258  @ CHRYSLER CORP.  @ Cars .......... 78,247 43,950 623,570 666,801  @ Trucks ........ 54,863 51,019 454,948 418,736  @ Total ........ 133,110 94,969 1,078,518 1,085,537  @ HONDA  @ Total ........ 30,820 33,812 252,455 246,428  @ NISSAN  @ Cars .......... 11,041 12,987 78,921 72,174  @ Trucks ........ 10,983 6,488 81,681 65,155  @ Total ........ 22,024 19,475 160,602 137,329  @ TOYOTA  @ Total-a ...... 24,542 5,345 145,013 39,297  @ MAZDA  @ Total ........ 16,512 20,121 146,710 81,244  @ DIAMOND STAR  @ Total ........ 11,734 0 43,746 0  @ INDUSTRY  @ Cars .......... 537,455 498,445 4,660,505 c-4,591,291  @ Trucks-bus-x .. 334,200 314,669 2,730,637 2,589,088  @ Total ........ 871,655 813,114 7,391,142 c-7,180,379  a-Includes Toyota Corolla and Camry cars only. b-GM car figures include the Chevrolet Nova built at Nummi. c-Includes Volkswagen production through July 1988. x-Includes only buses and trucks built by auto makers.  System Industries Inc., blaming delays in shipping new products, said it posted a loss in the fourth quarter on a 33% drop in sales.  The Milpitas, Calif., maker of computer data storage equipment said it had a loss of $1.5 million in the quarter ended July 22, compared with net income of $25,000, or 13 cents a share, a year ago.  Sales fell to $22.8 million from $34 million.  The company noted the loss was an improvement over the year's earlier quarters; the company had a third-quarter loss of $25.9 million on sales of $25.2 million.  "The company's restructuring plan initiated near the end of the third quarter has contributed to improved operating efficiencies in the fourth quarter," a company official said.  For the year, System Industries posted a loss of $32.6 million, compared with net income of $3.2 million, or 80 cents a share, a year ago.  Sales fell 25% to $101.1 million from $134.1 million.  New York lawyer Martin S. Ackerman said he has begun the process of soliciting consents to oust Asher B. Edelman as chairman of Datapoint Corp. and to unseat the company's board.  Mr. Ackerman, who specializes in turning around troubled companies, said he believes the computer-products concern's "situation is critical" and that it needs new direction immediately.  He is proposing a slate of five directors to replace Datapoint's seven-member board.  Under a consent solicitation, Mr. Ackerman and his group have two months to collect votes from holders of 51% of the company's shares to replace the board.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Mr. Ackerman said Datapoint's stock has declined since Mr. Edelman took control in 1985 and the company has suffered large losses, including a $20.3 million loss for the nine months ended April 29.  In addition, Mr. Ackerman charges that the company has paid large fees to Mr. Edelman and other directors, and that Mr. Edelman has used Datapoint funds to finance investments in other companies.  At the end of its third quarter, Datapoint had $39.4 million in marketable securities, up from $26.8 million on July 30, 1988.  Mr. Edelman, a New York investor and arbitrager, moved his main investment operations to Europe last year to focus on European investments.  He continues to own about 10% of Datapoint, the company said, down from his peak investment of 15%.  Ross Laughead, Datapoint vice president and general counsel, said the company just received notice from Mr. Ackerman and hasn't had a chance to review the solicitation.  In addition to himself, Mr. Ackerman is proposing as directors Frank T. Alfieri, chairman of investment banker MacDonald & Co.; Marvin A. Sackner, chief executive officer of a Florida medical-devices maker; Robert L. Frank, president of a French manufacturing company, and Nicolas Herpin, a sociology professor at the University of Paris.  Mr. Ackerman said the group together owns about 463,700 Datapoint shares, or about 4.6%.  He said he is nominating two French directors because about 85% of the company's business takes place overseas.  Campeau Corp. plans to put its glitzy Bloomingdale's department store chain up for sale, according to one person familiar with the Toronto-based retail and real-estate company.  Campeau acquired Bloomingdale's as part of a $6.6 billion acquisition of Federated Department Stores Inc. in May 1988 that left Campeau deeply in debt and hobbled financially.  Its first attempt to sell high-yield, high-risk junk bonds to finance the transaction flopped and had to be restructured.  Bloomingdale's management, led by its chairman and longtime top executive, Marvin Traub, may attempt to organize a leveraged buy-out, according to reports circulating in the New York retailing community.  Top executives of Bloomingdale's were said to have been huddled in meetings for the past few days.  Trading in Campeau stock was halted yesterday after a sharp price rise amid widespread rumors that some retailing assets such as Blomingdale's might be sold.  At Campeau's annual meeting in July, chairman and controlling shareholder Robert Campeau said Bloomingdale's is valued at more than $2 billion, but he added that the company didn't have plans to sell the chain.  Another observer said a sale could generate proceeds of more than $1 billion for the company.  A spokeswoman for Campeau said the company didn't expect to make a statement yesterday regarding the stock action.  Other Campeau officials weren't available for comment.  But several people said they expected an announcement next week of any sale plan.  One investment banker said Campeau has a loan of about $400 million left over from the Federated acquisition that converts into exchange notes plus warrants for 7% of Federated on Sept. 15.  Some observers say that date may be stimulating consideration of some transaction.  The same banker said Campeau might sell a big equity stake in its entire department-store group.  The Toronto Stock Exchange halted trading in Campeau stock and asked the company for comment after its share price jumped 1.75 Canadian dollars (US$1.48) to C$22 each on volume of 39,050 shares.  National over-the-counter trading was halted later at $18 a share, pending news.  The stock didn't resume trading.  Campeau's rally began at the beginning of August when the stock was languishing at C$16.875 in trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange.  Analysts speculated that Campeau's silence on the trading halt could mean something is afoot.  Although selling Bloomingdale's would add significantly to Campeau's fortunes -- about $12 a share fully diluted, said Don Tigert of Burns Fry Ltd. -- analysts yesterday expressed surprise that Campeau would put the prestigious store group on the block.  "Why sell your crown jewel when there's no need to reduce debt?" said Ross Cowan, of investment dealer Levesque Beaubien Inc.  ---  Jeffrey A. Trachtenberg contributed to this article.  Genentech Inc., South San Francisco, Calif., said it agreed to collaborate on a commercial space-research project with the National Aeronautics and Space Administration and Penn State's Center for Cell Research.  The project will include experiments on the ground and in the Space Shuttle, the company said.  The group will seek to expand earlier findings by researchers that microgravity accelerates reduction in bone calcium, body mass and immune-cell function, it said.  The Space Shuttle experiments will begin in 1990.  The group could identify important compounds that would give Genentech a advantage in the international marketplace and enhance the U.S. position as a leader in biotechnology, a NASA statement said.  The group expects the experiments' findings to help in treatment of human bone diseases, organ regeneration and transplantation, and skeletal muscle cell deficiency, NASA said.  Fujisawa Pharmaceutical Co. of Japan launched its $31.87-a-share tender offer for the 70% of Lyphomed Inc. it doesn't own.  The board of the Rosemont, Ill., maker of generic drugs had earlier accepted the buy-out proposal.  The offer, made in an advertisement in today's editions of The Wall Street Journal, is subject to Fujisawa receiving tenders for enough shares to boost its stake to 66.7% on a fully diluted basis.  Lyphomed Chairman John N. Kapoor has agreed to sell his roughly 14% stake to Fujisawa.  The offer expires at 12:01 a.m. EDT Oct. 6.  The California Public Utilities Commission said it won't reconsider the decision it issued in February disallowing more than $28 million in past electricity charges by San Diego Gas & Electric Co.  In denying the rehearing of the case, the commission maintained that some legal error in its decision must be demonstrated, "and no legal error was shown."  The decision backed an earlier recommendation by an administrative law judge concerning power transmitted over the Southwest Powerlink between 1984 and 1986.  Officials for San Diego Gas & Electric couldn't be reached for comment.  Soybean futures prices were whipsawed by speculation that the Soviet Union is interested in buying large amounts of U.S. soybean oil and butter.  Prices rose sharply at the start of trading yesterday amid reports that a Soviet trade representative had arrived in the U.S. Traders were especially interested in the development because of widespread speculation that the U.S. Agriculture Department has been wooing the Soviets with an offer to subsidize a major shipment of U.S. soybean oil.  Many soybean futures contracts gave up some of their gains, however, late in the session when a Soviet official at a Washington, D.C., press conference confirmed the country's interest.  Traders were disappointed that the Soviet official gave no details on the size of potential purchases.  In trading at the Chicago Board of Trade, the price of the soybean contract for September delivery settled at $5.9675, up nine cents a bushel.  The Soviet announcement, albeit vague, was unusual because that country rarely discusses its grain-buying plans.  Some analysts speculated yesterday that the Soviet Union is trying to build anticipation in the U.S. that it might be a major soybean client at the right price.  Traders expect such posturing as the two countries prepare for negotiations slated for December on a new long-term grain pact.  Such a pact would likely set minimum amounts of corn, wheat and soybeans that the Soviet Union would buy annually from the U.S.  Soybean futures prices were also supported yesterday by reports that U.S. exporters are shipping 150,000 metric tons of soybeans to Spain and 50,000 metric tons of soybeans to Japan.  In addition, the Agriculture Department announced that it is offering about 150,000 metric tons of soybean oil to Pakistan under a food aid program.  Wheat futures prices closed mixed.  Some analysts are speculating the Agriculture Department is leaning toward easing its planting restrictions on wheat farmers enrolled in its price-support program.  Such a move would increase wheat production, which was trimmed by a drought last spring in winter wheat states such as Kansas.  While that would tend to depress prices, analysts expect the government to also boost its spending on export subsidies for U.S. wheat.  Under a program designed to increase overseas sales, the Agriculture Department compensates exporters that sell wheat to certain nations at a discount.  Corn futures prices closed mixed.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  ENERGY: Prices rose modestly with gasoline pulling crude contracts along.  It appears gasoline demand remains strong, with American Petroleum Institute data showing a larger than expected decline in inventories.  "Refineries are chugging it out as fast as they can and it's being bought," one trader said.  "Products are showing lots of strength."  On the New York Mercantile Exchange, gasoline for October delivery settled at 55.63 cents, up 0.52 cent after rising more than a penny a gallon on Wednesday.  Crude oil futures closed higher for the sixth straight session.  Trading has picked up in recent days from its sluggish August pace.  October West Texas Intermediate ended at $19.41 a barrel, up 13 cents.  COPPER: Futures prices rebounded after three consecutive days of losses.  The December contract rose 3.25 cents a pound to $1.2480.  Michael Frawley, a metals broker for PaineWebber Inc. in New York, said the market reaction resulted from a combination of being oversold and continued strong fundamentals.  "Demand remains excellent and supplies of good quality copper are tight," he said.  The negative labor situation, which had been either ignored or regarded more positively in recent days, was a contributing factor to the market's recovery, an analyst said.  Workers at the Chilean El Salvador mine are going to vote Friday on the company's offer.  A company official was reported as saying he didn't expect the company's proposal to be accepted by the employees, according to the analyst.  He also said that demand for copper from Japan and from merchants firmed prices in London.  John Gross, president of J.E. Gross Associates, metals industry consultants in New City, N.Y., said technical considerations were a strong factor in buying of futures.  "The fact that the {September contract} held at around $1.25 on the decline attracted renewed demand," he said.  Also, he noted, the Chilean strike may cut into supplies less than expected.  "After 30 days the company can bring in other workers," he said.  "In view of how the Peruvian miners' strike faded out, there's some question how long the Chilean walkout might last."  PRECIOUS METALS: Futures prices were mixed, with silver rising slightly and gold and platinum declining.  December delivery gold was down $1.40 an ounce at $366.00.  December silver advanced 1.30 cents an ounce to $5.23.  October platinum declined $4.30 an ounce to $476.50.  Sharon Ziemian, vice president, Citibank N.Y., said the market was generally quiet.  Precious metals, which usually move contrary to the dollar, are apparently separating themselves somewhat from that relationship, she said.  "While the strong dollar is creating a downward tug on precious metals, traders are becoming more conscious of price-supporting factors, such as lower unemployment and higher personal spending.  This is leading to an indecisiveness in the market's action," Ms. Ziemian said.  Another analyst said platinum, which tends to be sensitive to South African developments, fell back from Wednesday's gains because unrest in that country hasn't significantly affected platinum production.  "There has been some absenteeism {at mines} but that's about it," he said.  SUGAR: Futures prices rose.  The October contract advanced 0.33 cent a pound to 13.61 cents.  That was close to the high of the day, 13.65 cents, and represented a sharp recovery from the session's low of 13.13 cents reached in early trading.  One analyst said strong demand appeared as the October price came close to the 13-cent-a-pound level.  A dealer in physical sugar said there was a rumor that Algeria had bought between 100,000 tons and 150,000 tons of sugar, which may have touched off some buying of contracts by traders who'd previously sold short in anticipation that prices would go lower.  Prices of most contracts had declined for three sessions in a row, he noted.  The rumor, however, was very vague, without any specifics as to whether it was refined or raw sugar and when it would be shipped, he said.  Also, the dealer said, there was a tendency to question the report because the quantity was uncharacteristically large for Algeria.  "Usually, Algeria buys in small amounts," he said.  Wickes Cos., a Santa Monica, Calif.-based unit of WCI Holdings Corp., said its board authorized additional spending of as much as $250 million for the repurchase from time to time of its publicly traded debt at prevailing market prices.  Wickes, which makes automotive and industrial products, wall coverings and decorative fabrics and operates a chain of home-improvement retail stores, announced last month that its board approved the repurchase of as much as $50 million of its $1.6 billion of publicly traded debt.  In addition, Wickes announced that it will hold a meeting for its bondholders Sept. 27 for a review of the company's progress since its acquisition by Blackstone Capital Partners L.P. and Wasserstein Perella Partners L.P. in December 1988.  The exact place and time of the meeting, which will be in New York, will be announced later, Wickes said.  Occidental Petroleum Corp. said a unit signed an agreement with China National Offshore Oil Corp. to explore for oil on 1.6 million acres in the South China Sea.  Terms of Occidental Eastern Inc.'s pact weren't disclosed.  The exploration area is contiguous to a 357,000-acre contract area in which Occidental earlier this year tested an appraisal well, Lufeng 22-1-2, at a rate of 11,233 barrels of oil a day using a submersible electric pump.  Occidental said seismic exploration of the new block is expected to begin in the middle of next year.  Exploration interests in the acreage are Occidental, with 65%; and Ampol Exploration Ltd. and AGL Petroleum, with 17.5% each.  Great Lakes Chemical Corp. said its board adopted a rights plan "designed to protect the long-term and short-term interests" of stockholders.  Under the plan, Great Lakes shareholders were issued rights that would allow them to buy Great Lakes shares half price if an outside party acquires a 15% stake or makes a tender offer for 15% of the company's common shares outstanding.  The company said the board isn't aware of any takeover activity, but called adoption of the plan "appropriate given the current takeover environment, and the company's excellent prospects."  POLAND'S PREMIER COMPLETED formation of a four-party coalition.  Mazowiecki unveiled nominees for his 22-member cabinet before a closed meeting of Solidarity's parliamentary deputies, and it appeared that the union would take less than half the portfolios.  The Peasants Party would get four cabinet posts, and the Democrats two.  The Communist Party will retain the defense and interior ministries, but apparently lost its bid for the Foreign Ministry.  Parliament is expected to vote on confirmation next week.  Poland's Catholic bishops have offered new talks with Jewish leaders on moving a disputed convent from the former Nazi death camp at Auschwitz.  ---  A COLOMBIAN SUSPECT FACED drug-related charges in a U.S. court.  Eduardo Martinez Romero, who is accused of helping the Medellin cocaine cartel launder at least $15 million, declined to answer the charges, telling a federal court in Atlanta through an interpreter that he speaks only Spanish and doesn't fully understand the allegations.  The judge postponed the arraignment until Monday and ordered the 36-year-old Martinez, who was extradited Wednesday to the U.S. from Bogota, held without bail until then.  Bennett said Bush's anti-drug plan would cost the states "several billion dollars" more in the coming year.  He didn't give a more precise estimate.  ---  South Africa's government pledged political changes after the ruling National Party sustained losses in Wednesday's parliamentary elections.  Violence during the polling reportedly killed as many as 25 people.  The party lost nearly a quarter of its seats to an anti-apartheid party and to rightist candidates.  ---  East-West talks resumed in Vienna on an accord to reduce conventional weapons in Europe by next year.  But a dispute within NATO delayed a proposal to advance the negotiations with the Warsaw Pact.  Greece, apparently because of concerns about Turkey, expressed objections to NATO plans to propose limits on military maneuvers.  ---  Energy Secretary Watkins said production of a radioactive gas used to make nuclear warheads, suspended for more than a year because of safety problems at tritium-producing plants, would resume in the fall of 1990.  He said low-power testing of the government's Savannah River complex in South Carolina would start next summer.  ---  The Navy formally presented its report on the April 19 explosion aboard the USS Iowa, and said that gunner's mate Clayton Hartwig "most likely" caused the blast by placing a detonator between gunpowder bags in one of the battleship's guns.  Hartwig was among the 47 sailors killed.  The Navy said much data was "circumstantial."  ---  A Senate panel approved a permanent ban on smoking on all domestic airline flights.  The prohibition cleared by the Appropriations Committee, part of a $26.5 billion transportation spending bill for the year beginning Oct. 1, would significantly expand the current ban on smoking on flights of two hours or less.  ---  Budapest indicated that thousands of East German refugees could leave Hungary within days in a mass exodus to the West.  The signal came despite West Germany's announcement that talks with East Berlin officials failed to break an impasse on the refugee issue.  There are about 6,000 East Germans awaiting passage from Hungary.  ---  Ethiopia and Eritrean rebels opened talks in Atlanta in an effort to end the civil war that began in 1961, Africa's longest-running conflict.  Former President Carter, acting as an observer to the closed-door peace negotiations, expressed hope that the two sides would allow free passage of food to Ethiopia's war-torn northern province.  ---  Cuba announced that it would begin withdrawing its troops from Ethiopia tomorrow.  The soldiers were first sent into the African nation in 1977 to help the Marxist government in its war with Somalia.  Havana didn't disclose how many troops would leave.  ---  The Bush administration intends to continue consultations with other nations to try to end the civil war in Lebanon, despite Wednesday's pullout of all U.S. diplomats from the embassy in Beirut.  In Lebanon, Christian army commander Aoun, blamed for prompting the evacuation, called the U.S. move "biased and shortsighted."  ---  Attackers in Jordan fired several rockets into Israel for the first time in about 20 years.  The Soviet-made rockets, which didn't cause any injuries or damage, landed in the Jordan Valley.  In Jerusalem, Israeli Premier Shamir said it was Amman's responsibility to prevent such attacks.  ---  A strike in Azerbaijan appeared to be gaining strength after a nationalist demonstration in Baku by at least 200,000 people demanding more autonomy for the Soviet republic.  The railway strike in Azerbaijan, as well as a separate rail strike in Moldavia, have put pressure on the oil industry, which has turned to sea transport.  UNITED AIR'S MACHINISTS union said it has been contacted by Texas investor Robert Bass, the buy-out firm Kohlberg Kravis and "other investors" about a possible bid for parent UAL.  The overtures suggest a $6.75 billion offer by UAL's pilots' union and management may face unexpected competition.  UAL's stock fell $5.125, to $281.75, on rumors Marvin Davis is selling his shares.  ---  Campeau plans to put its Bloomingdale's chain up for sale, a source said.  The company has valued the stores at more than $2 billion.  ---  RJR Nabisco expects to sell its Del Monte canned-foods business for $1.48 billion to a group led by Citicorp Venture Capital, sources said.  ---  Italy's biggest bank, BNL, had its chairman and its general manager resign amid a growing scandal over $2.64 billion in unauthorized credits extended by BNL's Atlanta branch.  ---  A group of top executives from major discount retailers, drug chains and consumer marketers has met privately for two years to discuss "common industry problems."  ---  The stock-loan inquiry is looking into possible theft, money laundering and kickbacks in the stock-loan departments of major brokerage firms during the 1980s, sources said.  ---  U.S. businesses have boosted plans for spending on new plant and equipment this year, signaling optimism about the economy.  Capital outlays are now expected to rise 7.7%.  ---  Ashland Oil agreed to pay $325 million to Iran's national oil company to settle a 10-year-old dispute over crude oil purchased from the country.  ---  A 9.4% stake in Saatchi & Saatchi was acquired by a U.S. investment management firm, renewing speculation about a possible bid for the world's biggest advertising group.  ---  British Petroleum tapped Robert Horton as its next chairman.  Horton is expected to seek a multibillion-dollar acquisition in the U.S. soon after he takes control next March.  ---  The FDIC may have acted illegally in seizing some of MCorp's banks, a federal judge indicated.  The preliminary ruling eventually may force the FDIC to pay damages to many banks.  ---  Australian regulators began a formal inquiry into Alan Bond's business activities.  Also, a rival entrepreneur spelled out plans that could lead to the breakup of Bond's empire.  ---  Tiffany's stock surged $6.125, to $60.375, on speculative interest after news that investor Donald Trump had won clearance to buy over $15 million of the jewelry-store chain's shares.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 160,160,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2706.88, off 12.91; transportation 1480.97, off 27.74; utilities 214.66, off 0.25.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3316.11, off 3.33.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 130.85, up 1.08; spot index 129.37, up 0.17.  Dollar: 146.63 yen, up 0.48; 1.9800 marks, up 0.0045.  John G. Graham, chief financial officer, was promoted to senior vice president of this utilities holding company, from vice president.  F. Allen Donofrio, comptroller, and Michael P. Morrell, treasurer, were elected vice presidents.  Varitronic Systems Inc. said it is in preliminary talks to acquire Kroy Inc., a closely held Scottsdale, Ariz., maker of lettering systems and related supplies, for about $50 million.  The company said there can be no assurance that an agreement will be reached, or any transaction will be completed.  Varitronic Systems makes graphic lettering systems.  OSHAWA GROUP Ltd., Toronto, said it agreed to sell 3.5 million stock-purchase warrants for about 103.3 million Canadian dollars (US$87.5 million) to securities dealers for distribution through private placements.  The retailing and food wholesaling company said the warrants will be priced at C$29.50 each and exchangeable into Class A shares with no additional payment.  Oshawa Class A shares closed yesterday at C$29.625, down 12.5 Canadian cents, in trading on the Toronto Stock Exchange.  Oshawa's treasurer, Leonard Eisen, said the company chose to offer warrants instead of shares because of the delay involved in filing a prospectus for a new share issue.  The company said the transaction is expected to close Sept. 28 and a prospectus for the additional shares will be issued soon afterward.  The company has about 31.5 million Class A shares outstanding.  Mr. Eisen said proceeds from the warrants will be used for general corporate purposes.  He didn't elaborate.  Yesterday's editorial on President Bush's drug strategy misattributed a quotation regarding the need for accompanying tax increases to Rep. John Dingell.  The speaker was Rep. Charles Rangel.  (See: "Review & Outlook (editorial): The Policy Drug" -- WSJ Sept. 7, 1989)  An August 16 editorial stated incorrectly that Senator Donald Riegle of Michigan was one of five Senators who demanded a meeting with regulators regarding Lincoln Savings & Loan.  Mr. Riegle, the chairman of the Banking Committee, participated at the request of other Senators who attended the meeting.  {See: "REVIEW & OOUTLOOK (Editorial) -- World's Greatest: Hostile Bid for SEC" -- WSJ Aug. 16, 1989}  Alan Bond's corporate fortunes took another turn for the worse as Australian regulators launched a formal investigation into his business activities and a rival Australian entrepreneur elaborated on a plan that could lead to the breakup of Mr. Bond's empire.  The National Companies and Securities Commission said that after preliminary investigation, it has "reason to suspect that offenses may have been committed by directors and officers of Bond Corp. Holdings," which is Mr. Bond's flagship company, "and/or directors and officers of Bell Resources Ltd.," a 58%-controlled unit of Bond Corp.  The commission said its inquiry centers on transactions involving a brewery site in Perth; the proposed sale of Bond Corp.'s international brewing operations to its Bell Resources unit; and certain transactions involving shares of Bond International Gold Ltd., which is controlled by Mr. Bond's family company, Dallhold Investments Pty.  It didn't elaborate.  Bond Corp. said it welcomed the probe as an "opportunity once and for all to clear up any uncertainties."  Separately, John Elliott, chairman of the Australian conglomerate Elders IXL Ltd., described in a television interview his plan for what he called a "rescue" of Bond Corp.  The proposal from Elders, a brewing, resources, financial-services and agri-business concern, would effectively break up Bond Corp. Mr. Bond said he wouldn't call the plan a "rescue," but he acknowledged that "we have to be supported."  Analysts said the Elliott plan may be aimed in part at strengthening Elders's competitive position in Australia.  Amid the day's events, Mr. Bond conceded in a radio interview that "we've got a number of problems which we're dealing with, and I'm sure we'll have more problems that we'll have to deal with."  He added: "But we have the determination and we have the solutions."  As reported, signs have emerged in recent months that Bond Corp. is caught in a cash squeeze.  That, in turn, has caused the company's stock to plunge.  Bond Corp. shares closed yesterday at 43 Australian cents (32 U.S. cents), down from 1.80 Australian dollars at the start of the year and unchanged from Wednesday.  Mr. Bond's company already has sold some of its assets and has others on the market.  Officials at Bond Corp. said directors are considering an array of proposals to restructure the company and slash its debt.  The brewing, resources, property and media concern won't disclose its current borrowings, but analysts estimate its total debt at A$6 billion.  Mr. Elliott said the Elders proposal, which is being designed by its financial-services arm, has been under discussion by both sides for six weeks.  Analysts said it could involve the acquisition by Elders of Bond Corp.'s Swan brewery in Western Australia, subject to approval from antitrust regulators.  Some analysts think Mr. Elliott's plan is partly designed to head off the threat that would arise if a strong foreign brewer bought a significant stake in Bond Corp.'s brewing operations.  In the TV interview, Mr. Elliott said that whether his idea "comes about is still in the lap of the gods."  He wouldn't go into the plan's specifics, but he did say that besides some of Bond's Australian brewing operations, Elders might be interested in some of its resources assets.  In addition to the investigation by the corporate regulators, the Australian Stock Exchange asked Bond Corp. yesterday to disclose the timetable for completion of a previously proposed sale of all of its brewing assets to Bell Resources for A$3.5 billion and to provide information on any transactions involving options over Bond Corp. assets.  If the exchange officials establish that breaches have occurred, they could suspend trading in the shares of the companies involved.  The latest regulatory inquiries come less than three months after broadcasting regulators declared Mr. Bond unfit to operate TV and radio stations.  Then, in August, the premier of the state of Western Australia, Peter Dowding, alleged that Mr. Bond threatened to help "destroy" the state government if it didn't agree to certain business transactions favorable to Bond Corp.  The alleged threat was referred to the state's Corruption Commission by the opposition Liberal Party.  Also yesterday, Bond Corp. repeated previous statements that it doesn't plan to sell its controlling stake in Bond Media Ltd., which operates one of Australia's national commercial TV networks.  The Securities and Exchange Commission charged a 23-year-old Atlanta man with making "false and misleading statements" in proposals to acquire Fieldcrest Cannon Inc. and Kellwood Co.  The complaint alleged that in July, Frederick J. Ball Jr. mailed a 47-page acquisition offer to officers and directors of Fieldcrest and Kellwood.  Fieldcrest is a textile company based in Eden, N.C., while Kellwood, based in St. Louis, makes apparel and camping goods among other things.  In his offer, Mr. Ball proposed that each share outstanding of the companies be exchanged for a share of a "proposed holding company" to be formed by Mr. Ball, the SEC said.  In addition, Mr. Ball sent a three-page news release to a St. Louis wire service in an effort to get media coverage of his offers, the commission said.  Without admitting or denying the allegations, Mr. Ball has agreed to be enjoined from violating securities laws.  He consented to consult an attorney before making further moves in the offers.  According to the SEC, Mr. Ball isn't quite the high-roller that the offers and the release said he is.  For example, Mr. Ball described himself as a "strategic private investor" who controls "various and smaller holdings in some Fortune 500 companies," the SEC said.  Not true, said the commission.  "Other than a minor purchase through an employee benefit plan, Ball has never purchased securities in any Fortune 500 or privately held corporate entity."  Moreover, despite Mr. Ball's claims that several parties are associated with the proposed holding company that would acquire the two companies, Mr. Ball is working alone, the SEC said.  Fieldcrest and Kellwood currently are valued at about a total of $680 million, based on the Big Board prices of their shares.  Reached in Atlanta, Mr. Ball called the charges "technicalities.  All I can say is it's just a fiasco," he said.  While he wouldn't say whether he is interested in acquiring either company, he said, "I'm not a Milken or a Boesky or anything.  I'm not bilking people out of their money.  If there were violations in the documents, they were just unintentional."  He added that he doesn't "personally" own shares in either company.  The SEC's move is unusual because the agency didn't allege that Mr. Ball has actually violated a securities law.  In this case, "instead of waiting for Mr. Ball to make another statement," said Harry Weiss, the SEC's assistant director for enforcement, "we wanted to prevent him from making further statements."  In St. Louis, Kellwood said in a statement that the company was "pleased with the prompt enforcement action of the SEC."  The statement said, "Mr.  Ball's purported proposal was not worthy of any response by Kellwood.  It was garbled, and without merit or substance, and there never were any discussions or negotiations."  Fieldcrest declined to comment on the SEC's action.  This is Mr. Ball's second scrape with securities regulators in less than a year, according to the SEC. Last September, the Georgia secretary of state ordered Mr. Ball to stop violating the state's securities act in connection with Oxford Industries Inc. of Atlanta.  And it's the latest in a series of tender offer cases that the SEC has been forced to grapple with in the past two years.  In 1987, a financial analyst, P. David Herrlinger, made a bogus bid for Dayton Hudson Corp. Last year, Vipin Sahgal was charged by the commission with making "false and misleading" statements in announcing an offer for Superior Industries International Inc.  Both of those "bids" were carried over the Dow Jones News Service, and moved the stocks of the companies.  No major wire service carried Mr. Ball's release, and the stocks didn't move much.  Dornier Medizintechnik G.m.b.H., a unit of West German conglomerate Daimler Benz AG, said it purchased a 50% stake in Acoustic Imaging Technologies Corp., a small Tempe, Ariz., company specializing in ultrasonic-scanning equipment.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The Daimler-Benz unit said the move will allow it to expand the range of its ultrasonic-diagnostics products.  The company plans at some point to increase its stake in Acoustic Imaging, which has 250 employees.  Pier 1 Imports Inc., Fort Worth, Texas, said its August sales rose 33%, bolstered by an improved consumer outlook.  The home furnishings retailer said it had August sales of $44.2 million, up from $33.3 million in August 1988.  Sales at stores open more than a year rose 15% from August 1988.  Robert G. Herndon, chief financial officer, said some of the gains are because "the consumer . . . feels more comfortable with the economy and the future."  He also said that the company's advertising campaign, which included new television ads in major markets, also contributed to the increase.  Mr. Herndon said Pier 1 expects to post second-quarter net of 19 cents to 20 cents a share.  In late July, it expected net to about equal the year-earlier $7.2 million, or 24 cents a share, reported on fewer shares outstanding.  The company blamed the flat earnings on cooler-than-usual weather.  For the second quarter, Pier 1 said it had sales of $134.9 million, up 25% from the year-earlier $107.8 million.  Sales at stores open more than a year rose 7%.  A General Accounting Office report argues that Commodity Futures Trading Commission proposals designed to curb trading abuses on commodity exchanges aren't strong enough.  Late last month, the CFTC unveiled a package of surveillance and record-keeping rules intended to combat what appear to be widespread trading abuses in the Chicago futures markets.  Those rules would require the exchanges to collect trading cards every 30 minutes to try to prevent brokers from altering trades and inserting fictitious ones.  The requirement would eventually be tightened to every 15 minutes.  But the GAO report contends that "even if these rules are implemented, floor participants will still be relied on to provide accurate trading records."  Moreover, it says, "trade times will not be exact, and complete information on trades will not be available."  The GAO recommends that the CFTC order the exchanges to "independently, precisely and completely time each trade" and says the timing should be independent of other trading data supplied by floor traders and brokers.  The information should include "the precise time the broker receives and records as executed each order, as well as the precise execution times of non-customer trades," the report says.  The GAO report, the CFTC proposals and trading abuses will be the focus of hearings today before the Senate Agriculture Committee.  The GAO report is likely to fuel the debate over hand-held computers that would record the trades of floor participants.  In last month's proposals, the CFTC didn't mandate use of such recording devices.  A CFTC spokeswoman declined to discuss details of the GAO proposals but said, "I think the commissioners would agree that what we recommended last month in the audit trail is not the last recommendation."  She added that the hand-held computer terminals wouldn't have uncovered the specific abuses that the Federal Bureau of Investigation says its own inquiry discovered this year, though the devices might have pointed out more general misdeeds.  Sen. Patrick Leahy (D., Vt.), chairman of the Agriculture panel, said: "The public is not being adequately protected.  Audit trails are the backbone of floor policing systems; they must be improved substantially before we can guarantee the integrity of the trading pits."  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Rockwell International Corp. -- $300 million of 8 7/8% notes, due Sept. 15, 1999, priced at 99.41 to yield 8.965%.  The noncallable notes were priced at a yield spread of 80 basis points above the 10-year Treasury note.  Rated double-A-2 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and double-A by Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Morgan Stanley & Co.  Bank of Nova Scotia -- $200 million of 9% subordinated notes, due Oct. 1, 1999, via competitive bidding by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets, priced at 99.697 to yield 9.047%.  The issue is priced at a yield spread of 90 basis points over the Treasury's 10-year note.  The non-callable issue is rated double-A-3 by Moody's and Single-A-plus by S&P.  @ MUNCIPALS  California -- $384.6 million of general obligation veterans bonds in two parts.  One part, $339 million of series AY (alternative minimum tax) bonds due 1994-2008, 2013 and 2019, priced via a Citicorp group.  The bonds, rated double-A by Moody's and triple-A by S&P, were priced at par to yield from 6.65% in 1994 to 7.375% in 2019.  The other part, $45.6 million of bonds, due 1995, 2007, 2011 and 2016, priced via a Bank of America group.  The bonds, rated double-A by Moody's and triple-A by S&P, were priced at par to yield from 6.10% in 1994 to 7% in 2016.  @ MORTGAGES Ryland Mortgage Securities Corp. -- $120 million of collateralized mortgage obligations, offered in four classes by First Boston Corp.  The offering, Series 1989-5, and backed by "jumbo" whole loans, which are too large to be purchased by federal agencies, has been priced to yield from 9.80% to 10.47%.  The collateral consists of recently originated 15-year and 30-year whole loans with a weighted average coupon rate of 11.125%.  The issue is rated triple-A by both Moody's and S&P.  @ EUROBONDS  J. Sainsbury PLC (U.K.) -- $150 million of 9 1/8% bonds due Oct. 2, 1996, priced at 101 3/8 to yield 9.23% after full fees, via J.P. Morgan Securities Ltd. Fees 1 7/8.  Alliance & Leicester Building Society (U.K.) -- #125 million of 11 1/2% bonds due Oct. 4, 1999, priced at 101.60 to yield 11.57% less full fees, via Chase Investment Bank.  Fees 2.  Kredietbank International Finance NV (Belgian parent) -- 75 million Canadian dollars of 10 3/4% bonds due Oct. 12, 1992, priced at 101.45 to yield 10.72% after full fees, via Banque Paribas Capital Markets Ltd. Guaranteed by Kredietbank NV. Fees 1 3/8.  Norsk Hydro A.S. (Norway) -- 250 million Deutsche marks of 7 1/4% bonds due Oct. 5, 1999, priced at 101 3/4 to yield 7%, via Deutsche Bank.  Fees 2 1/2.  Tayca Corp. (Japan) -- 100 million Swiss francs of privately placed notes in two parts via Credit Suisse.  First part is 50 million francs in convertible notes due Sept. 30, 1993 with a fixed coupon of 1/2% at par.  Put option Sept. 30, 1991 at a fixed 106 3/8 to yield 3.59%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note convertible from Oct. 9, 1989 to Sept. 17, 1993 at a 5% premium over closing share price Sept. 13, when terms are scheduled to be fixed.  Second part is 50 million Swiss francs of notes due Sept. 28, 1993, with equity-purchase warrants, and a fixed 2 1/4% coupon at par.  Guarantee by Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank.  Exercise period for warrants from Oct. 9, 1989 to Sept. 17, 1993.  Fixing Sept. 13.  Atsugi Nylon Industrial Shogi Co. (Japan) -- 60 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due Nov. 30, 1994, with a 1/4% indicated coupon via lead manager Swiss Bank Corp. Put option Nov. 30, 1991 at indicated 108 5/8 to yield 4.12%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note convertible from Oct. 25, 1989 to Nov. 18, 1994 at 5% premium over closing share price Sept. 18, when terms are scheduled to be fixed.  A federal judge issued a preliminary ruling indicating that the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. may have acted illegally in seizing some of MCorp's banks.  The preliminary decision by Judge Robert W. Porter faulted the regulatory agency's freezing of funds owed to a healthy MCorp bank by a failed affiliate.  Although limited in scope, the judge's opinion strikes at the heart of the FDIC's controversial practice of failing otherwise solvent banks by refusing to pay back funds lent to insolvent affiliates.  If upheld and applied in several similar cases, the decision could force the FDIC to pay millions of dollars in damages to the former owners of dozens of banks closed in Texas during the past year, including MCorp, First RepublicBank Corp., and Texas American Bancshares Inc.  "The legal theory upon which the FDIC relied in each of those cases to create the insolvency of otherwise solvent banks has been flatly rejected by this court," said Howard Cayne, a partner with the Washington law firm Arnold & Porter, which is representing MCorp.  An FDIC official declined to comment, other than to note that the judge's decision isn't yet final.  Among other things, the judge still wants to consider the impact of the new savings-and-loan law, which explicitly grants the FDIC the authority to engineer such transactions.  It isn't yet clear whether the new law can be applied retroactively.  FDIC lawyers are expected to argue that the thrift bill merely clarified existing law, rather than rewriting it.  The lawsuit in question was brought by MCorp's New Braunfels, Texas, bank, which survived the March 28 seizure of 20 of the Dallas holding company's 25 banks.  After the takeover, the FDIC refused to repay $17.1 million in federal funds that the New Braunfels bank had lent the company's lead Dallas bank.  The bank now wants that money back.  Judge Porter's order, filed Aug. 29 and first reported in the American Banker, rejects the New Braunfels bank's request for a preliminary injunction requiring the FDIC to set aside the money needed for repayment.  But the judge, citing a 100-year-old Supreme Court decision requiring all creditors be treated alike in a bank closing, indicated that he expects to rule in the plaintiff's favor.  The judge's logic appears to apply also to 12 former MCorp banks that allegedly failed only because the FDIC froze the funds they had lent to the Dallas bank.  Regulators paid off creditors that weren't affiliated with MCorp.  A similar, regulator-inspired "chain reaction" led to the failure of dozens of otherwise solvent First RepublicBank Corp. banks last year, and to 14 of Texas American's 24 failed banks in July, according to lawsuits filed on behalf of those holding companies.  First RepublicBank's former units are currently owned by NCNB Corp., Charlotte, N.C. First RepublicBank hasn't any connection with First Republic Bancorp of San Francisco.  Regulators are in the process of selling Texas American's failed banks to Dallas-based Deposit Guaranty Bank.  MCorp's 20 failed banks were sold to Banc One Corp., Columbus, Ohio.  It is unclear what relief the former owners would receive if the FDIC is held to have acted illegally in all those instances.  In the most extreme case, the government could be forced to return to the holding companies all those banks in which it "manufactured" the insolvencies.  But most analysts doubt that would occur.  "If the FDIC is wrong they can't say 'we're sorry, we'll give you the banks back,"' says Robert Rieke, an analyst with Rauscher Pierce Refsnes, Dallas.  "The fair response is that the fair value of the banks would revert back" to the former holding companies.  MCorp, for example, has asserted in a lawsuit similar to the New Braunfels complaint, that the allegedly unlawfully seized banks were worth a total of $70 million.  MCorp was particularly cheered by the New Braunfels decision, because its lawsuit is being heard by the same judge.  A House-Senate conference approved an estimated $18.5 billion energy and water bill that would sharply increase spending to clean up nuclear-weapon plants and provide the first construction funds for the superconducting supercollider.  Negotiators allocated more than $1.31 billion for defense waste and environmental accounts, a 33% increase above the Bush administration's request and nearly double current spending in the fiscal year ending Sept. 30.  The increases help push total funding for atomic-energy defense activities to nearly $9.66 billion and, for the first time, these accounts would represent more than half of a bill once dominated by traditional public works.  The $225 million provided for the supercollider is small by comparison, but the annual costs are expected to more than triple as construction proceeds on the massive atom-smashing research facility in Texas.  Among other major science programs, an estimated $330 million was provided for magnetic fusion research after deep House cuts were restored, and a new initiative by the Energy Department to study global warming was funded at nearly $24 million.  Construction funding for the Army Corps of Engineers would be held at $1.1 billion.  But within these limits, influential members used their positions to add to the Bush administration's budget.  An estimated $26 million for two projects in Iowa and Washington state was preserved by the House.  Among the major additions won by the Senate is a more than doubling of the $25 million first requested by the president for a flood-control project in West Virginia -- home of Senate Appropriations Committee Chairman Robert Byrd.  Republicans aren't immune from the same politics.  The compromise allocates $15 million for a controversial payment by the Bureau of Reclamation to Utah water users as compensation for land to which the U.S. already holds title.  A General Accounting Office report, released yesterday, says the funds "substantially exceed" the value of the users' current rights to the property, and the agreement could yet be challenged on the House or Senate floor.  Sen. Jake Garn (R., Utah), the chief sponsor, again defended the payment yesterday.  But, in an unusual exchange, the chairman of the Senate negotiators, Sen. Bennett Johnston, said he wouldn't support the funding if the issue is forced to a recorded vote.  "I'm troubled by the estimate," said the Louisiana Democrat.  "If we had a record vote, I would not vote for it."  With the fiscal year ending in a few weeks, the conference agreement is the first to be reached on any of the major spending bills for fiscal 1990.  It comes as the Senate is struggling to complete even initial action on the bulk of appropriations for next year.  The process is further strained by the pressure to meet spending targets set by the president's new anti-drug initiative.  And a relatively small bill funding the operations of the Capitol and Congress set off prolonged debate over efforts to cut funds for free mail, or franking, privileges enjoyed by lawmakers.  The $1.9 billion measure won approval last night on a 81-9 roll call, but only after senators had a chance to go on record in favor of doing away with unsolicited mass mailings to constituents and transferring $45 million of the savings to programs for the treatment and prevention of drug use among addicted mothers.  The House, whose members rely more heavily on the mail privilege, is sure to oppose the move.  But in the current atmosphere, only eight senators opposed the amendment, which cast proponents as self-sacrificing and "enlistees" in the war against drugs.  The drug issue is again a factor in a pending transportation bill that would bring total Coast Guard funding to $3.25 billion in the new fiscal year.  A portion of the cost is anticipated to be covered by $300 million to be transferred from the Pentagon, but the final commitment fully funds the administration's request of $567 million for Coast Guard drug-interdiction efforts -- a 15% increase from the current year.  As approved by the Senate Appropriations Committee yesterday, the transportation measure provides major increases as well for the Federal Aviation Administration, while rejecting cuts sought by the administration in mass transit and rail programs.  An estimated $1.78 billion is provided for FAA facilities and equipment accounts, a more than 28% increase over current funding that includes $50 million rejected by the House for Denver's ambitious new airport.  While striking favorite highway projects inserted by House appropriators, senators were quick to substitute their own, including at least $42 million for Mr. Byrd's West Virginia and $37.3 million for two projects in New Jersey and New York -- home states of the ranking Democrat and Republican on the subcommittee that drafted the bill.  The same preference for subcommittee members was seen in the energy and water conference earlier in the day, where at least $28.5 million was allocated for university research projects of interest to influential lawmakers.  Local officials of the Environmental Protection Agency are recommending that USX Corp.'s Gary, Ind., steel mill be barred from government contracts because of repeated violations of pollution-control regulations.  Region 5 of the EPA said it proposed that the Gary Works be placed on the EPA's list of violating facilities, which would bar any federal agency for one year from entering into, renewing or extending any contract with it.  USX has until Sept. 28 to request a conference with EPA officials in Washington who compile the list.  USX, a steel and oil and gas concern, said it is continuing to try to resolve the matter and is "optimistic" a settlement will be reached that avoids placing the plant on the list of violating facilities.  The EPA filed a civil complaint in federal court in Hammond, Ind., last October against the Gary Works, charging violations of the federal Clean Water Act.  That case is still pending, the EPA said.  The EPA said it seeks to bar the Gary Works from government contracts because some of the violations cited in the lawsuit continue.  For instance, the facility continues to illegally bypass its blast-furnace waste-water treatment system and make direct discharges into the Grand Calumet River and Lake Michigan, the EPA said.  USX said it has committed more than $160 million to water-treatment facilities at the works and that more than 95% of all process water at the plant is recycled.  The company said it has maintained more than 99% compliance with the permit requirements while the treatment facilities are being improved.  At this point, only one company is on the EPA list of concerns barred from government business, and that is a paving concern in Puerto Rico, the EPA said.  Members of the United Steelworkers ratified a four-year contract with Parsippany, N.J.-based Armco Inc. covering 4,700 workers at plants in Ashland, Ky., Kansas City, Mo., and Baltimore, the union said.  The contract calls for wage increases at all three plants and a $500 signing bonus for each worker.  Pay increases at Baltimore and Kansas City would average 35 cents an hour on Aug. 1, 1991, and 40 cents an hour on Aug. 1, 1992.  Ashland workers will receive average increases of $1 an hour on Jan. 1, 1991, 25 cents on Jan. 1, 1992, and 25 cents on Jan. 1, 1993.  In addition, workers at Baltimore and Kansas City will receive restoration of previous wage cuts averaging $1 an hour, and restoration of fringe benefits, including vacations, holidays, premium pay and shift differential pay.  Ashland workers will receive repayment of their investment in the $22.5 million continuous caster, which is still under construction, and an end to additional contributions, which have been averaging 65 cents an hour, the union said.  Frederick C. Flynn Jr. was elected vice president and treasurer, succeeding Franklyn A. Caine, who became senior vice president of human resources and organization in June.  United Technologies has interests in aerospace, heating and air conditioning, automotive parts and defense systems.  John L. Lesher was named a partner in the financial services practice of this executive search firm.  Until 1985 he was president of management consultant Booz, Allen & Hamilton and most recently was a vice president in the financial industries practice of Cresap, McCormick & Paget, another consultant.  W. James McNerney Jr. was named executive vice president of GE Capital Corp., a financial services subsidiary with assets exceeding $52.7 billion.  He succeeds James H. Ozanne, who recently joined U S West Inc. as president of its new Capital Assets Group.  Mr. McNerney had been president of GE Information Services, another subsidiary.  GE also has interests in broadcasting, lighting products, jet engines, appliances and plastics, among other businesses.  John F. Cowell was named managing director and director of marketing at this investment banking firm, 44.5% owned by Swiss-based Credit Suisse-Zurich.  The position is newly created for Mr. Cowell, who had been president and creative director of Albert Frank-Guenther Law, a financial advertising and public relations firm.  Thomas S. Shattan, 39 years old, was named managing director and head of the new private equity group of this securities firm.  He had been a vice president in the investment banking division of Goldman, Sachs & Co., in charge of the private equity business.  Separately, Tamara A. Baum, 36, was named a vice president in Kidder's investment banking group.  A health-care specialist, Ms. Baum had been a director in a corporate finance department of Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., a subsidiary of Prudential Insurance Co. of America.  Kidder is 80%-held by General Electric Co.  M.J. Closs plans to retire as president and chief executive of this Chrysler Corp. unit at the end of this year, Chrysler Canada said.  No successor has been named yet for Mr. Closs, 61 years old, who has held the positions since 1980.  Peter H. Chang, 48 years old, was named president and chief executive officer of this diagnostic medical-products manufacturer.  Mr. Chang, who has spent 19 years in the medical-products field, was previously executive vice president and chief operating officer of Circadian.  Those posts, which were created when Mr. Chang was hired, won't be filled, the company said.  Mr. Chang succeeds Brian O. Hampton, who will remain a director.  Elwyn Eilledge, 54 years old, was named a non-executive director of this U.K. telecommunications and computer company.  Mr. Eilledge is a senior partner in the accounting firm Ernst & Young.  James W. Bortmess, vice president of natural gas sales and marketing, has been named to the additional position of vice president, U.S. onshore and natural gas, of this energy company.  Mr. Bortmess succeeds M.H. Vaughn, who retired.  CONSECO Inc. said that on Oct. 23 it is redeeming 870,550 shares of its $1.875 Series A convertible preferred at $26.575 a share.  The Carmel, Ind., insurance holding company said this represents one-half of the 1,741,100 Series A preferred shares currently outstanding.  Conseco said the redemption price includes 11.5 cents a share of dividends that will accrue from Oct. 1 to the redemption date.  The redemption won't affect payment of the previously announced quarterly cash dividend on the preferred shares, the company said.  The record date for determining shares to be redeemed will be Sept. 18.  All conversion rights on shares called for redemption will terminate on Oct. 16.  Until that time, the company said the preferred shares remain convertible into common stock at a rate of 1.429 shares of common stock per share of preferred.  Canada's official monetary reserves rose US$504.4 million in August to total a record $16.68 billion at month's end, the Canadian Finance Department said.  The reserves include holdings of gold, foreign currencies and other monetary assets.  Robust economic expansion continued to fuel sales of imported cars, trucks and buses last month in Japan.  Vehicle sales surged 39% in August from a year earlier to 14,008 units, setting a record for the month, the Japan Automobile Importers Association said.  Sales of imported motor vehicles have shown year-to-year gains for 68 consecutive months, since January 1984.  A joint venture by Japanese and U.S. construction firms has been hired by NWA Inc.'s Northwest Airlines Inc. for a $100 million hotel expansion project in Japan, said a Japanese company official.  It was the first such order from a U.S. company to a Japanese-U.S. construction venture for a project in Japan, said Nishimatsu Construction Co., partner in the venture with Austin Industries Inc., a Dallas general construction firm.  Nishimatsu said the companies will expand a 215-room hotel operated by Northwest Airlines near Tokyo International Airport at Narita, 40 miles northeast of Tokyo.  The project to expand the hotel to 512 rooms is to be completed December 1992.  American Recreation Products Inc., a unit of Kellwood Co., said it completed the acquisition of Slumberjack Inc., a Los Angeles-based maker of sleeping bags and camping accessories.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Kellwood is an apparel and home fashions concern based in Chesterfield, Mo.  West Germany's capital account deficit shrank in July to 11.37 billion marks ($5.72 billion) from a revised 13.73 billion marks in June, the central bank said.  The June capital account deficit was originally reported at 9.97 billion marks.  The central bank also said West Germany's long-term capital account surplus fell to 69 million marks in July from 1.698 billion marks in June.  The latter amount was slightly revised from 1.669 billion marks reported originally.  FirsTier Financial Inc. said it agreed to acquire closely held Scottsbluff National Corp. of Scottsbluff, Neb., in a stock exchange.  The bank-holding company said it will issue a maximum of 736,752 shares of its common stock in the transaction.  In national over-the-counter trading, FirsTier closed yesterday at $50.50 a share, up 25 cents.  Scottsbluff National had assets of $234 million as of Dec. 31, 1988.  Raw-steel production by the nation's mills increased 1.0% last week to 1,706,000 tons from 1,689,000 tons the previous week, the American Iron and Steel Institute said.  Last week's output fell 10.6% from the 1,908,000 tons produced a year earlier.  The industry used 76.8% of its capability last week, compared with 76.0% the previous week and 89.5% a year ago.  The American Iron and Steel Institute reported:  @ Net tons Capability  @ produced utilization  @ Week to Sept. 2 .......... 1,706,000 76.8%  @ Week to Aug. 26 .......... 1,689,000 76.0%  @ Year to date ............. 67,545,000 86.8%  @ Year earlier to date ..... 67,361,000 89.5%  The capability utilization rate is a calculation designed to indicate at what percent of its production capability the industry is operating in a given week.  Samsung Aerospace Industrial Co., Seoul, South Korea, will export $100 million in aircraft parts to Boeing Co.'s Boeing Commercial Airplane Co. and Northrop Corp.'s Aircraft Division, said a Samsung spokesman.  He said the Samsung Business Group unit will ship various parts, such as crown frames, for 800 Boeing 747 or 757 jets.  Earlier this year, Samsung received orders from U.S. airplane makers for $200 million in airplane parts, said the spokesman.  Last week, another South Korean company, Daewoo Corp.'s Daewoo Heavy Industries Ltd., said it signed a $100 million contract with Lockheed Corp.'s Lockheed Aeronautical Systems Co. to supply outerwing parts.  Alaska Airlines and Horizon Air, both units of Alaska Air Group Inc., reported increased traffic in August.  Alaska Airlines said its traffic rose 12% to 468.2 million revenue passenger miles from 416.5 million a year ago.  A revenue passenger mile is a paying passenger flown a mile.  The company said August's load factor, the percentage of available seats occupied by paying passengers, was 66%, compared with 67% a year ago.  For the first eight months of 1989, the airline's traffic rose 6% to 2.69 billion revenue passenger miles from 2.54 a year earlier.  Load factor was unchanged at 56%.  Horizon Air's August traffic increased 17% to 31 million passenger miles from the 26.6 million miles flown a year earlier, and its load factor rose to 57% from 52%.  For the eight months, traffic was up 6.8% to 206.9 million revenue passenger miles from 193.7 million a year earlier.  The load factor increased to 53% from 50%.  Midway Airlines Inc. said its August traffic rose 26%.  Revenue passenger miles rose to 361.9 million from 287.7 million a year earlier.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  Load factor, or the percentage of seats sold, rose to 65.9% from 60.4%.  For the first eight months of 1989, traffic rose 14% to 2.4 billion revenue passenger miles from 2.1 billion in 1988.  Load factor rose to 57.9% from 56.9%.  Video Jukebox Network Inc. said it entered into option agreements to buy four low-power TV stations in the Southeast.  Terms weren't disclosed.  At the company's annual meeting, Chairman Andrew H. Orgel said the stations are in Louisville, Ky.; Durham, N.C.; Savannah, Ga.; and Columbia, S.C.  Video Jukebox operates viewer-selected music video TV channels.  UAL Corp. said August traffic at its United Airlines unit increased 3.8% to 7.15 billion revenue passenger miles from 6.89 billion.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  United's load factor, or percentage of seats filled, eased to 77.3% from 77.7%.  For the year to date, United traffic was essentially flat at 47.15 billion revenue passenger miles, compared with 47.08 billion a year ago.  Load factor slipped to 67.6% from 69.2%.  Saint Mark's Bookshop said it has arranged interim financing allowing it to continue operations temporarily, and is negotiating permanent new financing.  The store's financial problems were the subject of a recent Wall Street Journal article.  A prominent publishing figure has established an escrow account to guarantee payment for new inventory, Robert Contant, a Saint Mark's partner, said.  Negotiations with the publisher for a "substantial" long-term investment could be completed within the next few weeks, he added.  The Canadian government auctioned 750 million Canadian dollars (US$635.3 million) of bonds maturing Dec. 1, 1999.  The average accepted yield bid was 9.453% for a price equivalent of 98.665.  The coupon rate was set at 9.25%.  Proceeds of the sale will be used for general government purposes.  Neoax Inc. completed the sale of its nuclear automation business to Precision Defense Services Inc. for $26 million.  Neoax said in July it would receive $25 million for the business, but the price was increased because the net assets appreciated in value.  Precision Defense is a company newly organized by the investment bank Oppenheimer & Co.  Neoax said it expects a $7 million gain in the third quarter as a result of the sale.  The company has remaining interests in environment-related services.  Immunex Corp. said it reacquired the rights to sell in the U.S. drugs based on a gene it cloned and licensed away in 1984 to a subsidiary of Syntex Corp., Palo Alto, Calif.  Immunex said it signed an agreement with Syntex (U.S.A.) Inc. giving Immunex exclusive rights to develop and sell in the U.S. products based on Interleukin-1 alpha, or IL-1 alpha.  The biotechnology firm hopes to market IL-1 alpha, a protein that occurs naturally in the human body, as a means of restoring immune systems to cancer patients after radiation and chemotherapy.  The move represents a strategic turnabout for Immunex, which hopes to build a portfolio of drugs that it will manufacture and sell.  Until recently, it sold the rights to most of the products it developed.  The reacquisition "signals the first step in a very identifiable shift in strategy," said Stephen Duzan, Immunex's chairman and chief executive.  Immunex sold the IL-1 alpha license to Syntex when Immunex was too small to make or sell its own products, Mr. Duzan said.  But now the company is looking to reacquire licenses to other products it designed, as well as products developed by smaller biotechnology companies, Mr. Duzan added.  Under the agreement, Syntex will retain the rights to market the drug outside the U.S. and Immunex will manufacture the drug for both companies.  The companies will exchange unspecified royalties as part of the agreement and Syntex will have access to Immunex's data regarding development of IL-1 alpha.  Warner-Lambert Co., a health-care and consumer products company, said its common stock began trading on the Tokyo Stock Exchange.  Nomura Securities Co. is the sponsoring securities firm.  Warner-Lambert said its Japanese affiliate, Warner-Lambert KK, is its largest operation outside of the U.S.  ABB Asea Brown Boveri AG, a Swedish-Swiss electrical machinery and engineering group, said it will make an offer to buy or exchange shares for the 24% stake it doesn't own of its West German unit, Asea Brown Boveri AG of Mannheim.  Details of the offer, which will be made today, weren't available, but ABB said the offer would be "above the current market rate" of the West German company's shares, according to a prepared statement.  It will also include an offer to purchase the company's participation certificates.  Trading in shares of Asea Brown Boveri of Mannheim was suspended yesterday on West German stock exchanges, pending announcement of the offer, ABB said.  Last spring, Trade and Industry Minister Han Seung Soo convinced the U.S. that Korea was liberalizing trade sufficiently to warrant its exclusion from the Bush administration list of nations practicing unfair trade.  The British-trained former economics professor was an articulate spokesman for Korean economic planners who believed their nation had to stop playing the export-is-everything trade game.  But now, Mr. Han is advocating a huge new export push and a depreciation of Korea's currency against the dollar, the opposite of what U.S. trade officials wanted.  The change in Mr. Han's public views reflects the strains in Korea's trade policy-making circles.  Business leaders and conservative politicians are urging the government to backtrack from the technocrats' prescriptions because they think the economy is stalling.  Thus, Korea's commitment to trade liberalization is wavering as many of its best advocates, the Western-educated technocrats, find their opinions challenged and their influence waning.  The impact of policy debate is far-reaching:  -- Korea has launched an export drive, with President Roh Tae Woo exhorting his compatriots in a recent radio address to "turn our eyes to exports."  Government aid may be given to certain kinds of exporters.  Korea has dispatched six missions around the world to sell Korean products and invited 10 buying missions from abroad, twice the scheduled number.  -- Korea, which has never welcomed imports of manufactured goods, is beginning to discourage them.  The Trade Ministry is reconsidering plans to cut excise taxes on certain products, such as large cars or golf clubs, and is shelving plans to aid import businesses.  The American Chamber of Commerce complains customs officials are obstructing U.S. goods. -- Korean businessmen are urging the government to depreciate the won against the dollar, reversing a trend, to make exported Korea goods cheaper in the U.S.  They also want lower interest rates.  The Bank of Korea and Ministry of Finance oppose both proposals as inflationary.  The timing of the policy dispute couldn't be worse.  Korea's trade practices will come under scrutiny this month and next as the U.S. secretary of commerce and the U.S. trade representative, both trade hard-liners, travel to Korea, and as Korea's President Roh visits the U.S.  "It is a serious problem," says Kim Chung Soo, a trade economist with the Korea Institute for Economics and Technology.  "I think the trade policy is in chaos and it could head in any direction."  Many Koreans say action is needed to counter the deterioration of the country's trade performance.  With exports up only 5% but imports climbing 19%, Korea's trade balance swung into a deficit for the first eight months of this year.  Imports of consumer products are up more than 30% over last year and some "luxury" items, such as electronic home appliances, have recorded triple-digit increases.  Technocrats argue it isn't all that bad.  Domestic demand is leading the economy, and economic growth will be 7.5% this year and next, down from the 12% -- plus annual growth of the past three years but robust compared with rates in most of the industrialized world.  "It's a problem, not a crisis," says a top official at the Economic Planning Board.  Adds Koo Bon Ho, president of the Korea Development Institute: "We should be cautious, but we shouldn't be in a panic.  The important role of the technocrat is to hang on to his beliefs."  But Korea has little patience these days.  Strikes have disrupted production and raised labor costs 60% in three years.  The won has appreciated 30% in the same period, squeezing exporters even more.  Korea's move toward democracy complicates matters.  In authoritarian times, the leaders could make decisions with less concern about how it plays in Pusan.  But the government has less stability than it wants because the president's party doesn't control the National Assembly, because workers are angry and because students and dissidents are constantly testing the government's patience.  "We are treading on a very delicate tightrope," says a presidential adviser.  President Roh wants a robust economy, hoping good times will quell unrest by insuring jobs for graduating students, adequate raises for workers and optimism for the middle class.  His heightened sensitivity to political pressures is giving business interests the upper hand over the technocrats for the time being, despite the latter's stellar track record at managing the Korean economy.  Many economic planners say politics is why Trade Minister Han is advocating views that seem at odds with those of formerly like-minded technocrats, such as Deputy Prime Minister Cho Soon, who trained at the University of California at Berkeley and taught economics at Seoul National University with Mr. Han.  In fact, just last April, Mr. Han said of himself and Mr. Cho, who also runs the Economic Planning Board, "Without seeing him I know what he is thinking and he knows what I am thinking."  Says a top government official who puts himself in the pro-liberalization camp, "Dr.  Han is still dedicated to those principles.  But at this moment, he can't argue for liberalization when he represents business.  I can understand what he did."  Adds Mr. Kim of the Korea Institute for Economics and Technology, "They seemed to have the same voice because all the economic signs were good.  They could afford to have the same voice."  Marathon Oil Co., a unit of USX Corp., said it is discussing with Ireland's Energy Department the possible development of the Ballycotton gas field in the Celtic Sea off the Irish coast.  Marathon said preliminary indications are that the Ballycotton reservoir will support a subsea development, with pipelines tied to the existing Kinsale Head gas field platforms.  Ballycotton is nine miles north of the Kinsale Head field.  The preliminary schedule calls for the Ballycotton field to begin production in the latter part of 1991, Marathon said.  The Societe des Bourses Francaises said it has approved a sweetened bid by Cie.  Financiere de Suez for Cie.  Industrielle and its insurance unit Cie.  Financiere du Groupe Victoire.  The regulatory body in Paris also said it has extended the close of the tender offer to Sept. 25 from Sept. 18.  The approval and the extension of the 27.2 billion French franc ($4.06 billion) offer bring Suez one step closer to final victory in France's biggest takeover.  The sweetened Suez bid offers 14,800 francs for each Cie.  Industrielle share plus 2,276 francs a share for Victoire's common stock and 1,138 francs a share for its nonvoting stock.  The previous bid, which was criticized by the target company's management as too low, offered 13,000 francs a share for Cie.  Industrielle, 2,000 francs a share for Victoire common stock, and 1,000 francs a share for its nonvoting stock.  Cie.  Industrielle's president, Jean-Marc Vernes, has said he will tender a 25.5% stake to the revised Suez offer, almost guaranteeing that the financial holding company's bid will succeed.  Wolohan Lumber Co. reported August sales of $27.2 million, a 9.4% increase from $24.9 million in the like period a year ago.  Comparable-store sales rose 8.5%.  Sales for the first seven months of the year were $181.9 million, up 7.8% from $168.7 million in the year-earlier period.  Comparable-store sales were up 4.1%.  Wolohan is a lumber and building materials retailer operating 46 stores in Illinois, Indiana, Kentucky, Michigan, Ohio and Wisconsin.  Cabot Corp. completed the sale of all of the shares outstanding of Haynes International Inc. for about $76 million.  The shares were sold to a company formed by Morgan Lewis Githens & Ahn Inc., a New York investment group, and Haynes management.  Haynes, a Kokomo, Ind., maker of metal alloys, was a wholly-owned unit of Cabot until July 1987.  At that time Cabot recapitalized the unit and sold a minority equity interest in Haynes to Prudential Insurance Co. of America and Haynes management.  Cabot is a specialty chemicals and energy concern.  Farmers and movie directors, fearful of American inroads in domestic markets, staged protests against U.S. imports.  Hundreds of police were deployed at a downtown hotel to prevent violence as the first major U.S. food fair in South Korea opened.  Under pressure from Washington, Seoul agreed to allow 243 agricultural, marine and forestry products.  The move has angered Korean farmers, who see U.S. imports as a threat to their livelihood.  Film directors, in a similar protest, stopped filming yesterday and began a hunger strike to protest the arrest of two colleagues charged with releasing snakes inside theaters showing U.S. movies.  For the past year, snakes have been set loose and liquid ammonia spilled in theaters showing films directly distributed in Korea by MCA Inc.'s Universal International Pictures unit.  South Korea agreed to open its movie market four years ago, ending the monopolized distribution of U.S. films by Korean middlemen.  Korean film workers maintain the monopoly should have been continued to give local production companies more time to grow.  Brambles Industries Ltd. said fiscal 1989 after-tax operating profit rose 35% to $170.2 million Australian (US$129 million), aided by an Australian corporate tax rate cut.  The Sydney transportation company said per-share earnings in the year ended June 30 were A$1, up from 79.3 cents, or a total of A$126.1 million a year ago.  The per-share dividend was raised to 42 cents from 32 cents.  After extraordinary items, overall profit rose 39% to A$177.3 million from A$127.3 million.  Sales gained 15% to A$1.56 billion from A$1.36 billion.  Brambles earnings don't include its share of results from associated companies.  The company said Australian operations lifted earnings.  The European rail and container business achieved "satisfactory" overall growth, despite a strengthening of the Australian dollar.  The company said earnings so far this fiscal year have risen, and are in line with the company's budget, despite a softening in transportation volumes in Australia.  West German Economics Minister Helmut Haussmann appears set to approve the planned takeover by Daimler-Benz AG of Messerschmitt-Boelkow-Blohm G.m.b.H., bringing to a controversial end more than two years of haggling over one of the biggest-ever corporate mergers in West German history.  Government sources confirmed that Mr. Haussmann, at a news conference Friday, will approve the merger, broadly along lines that have already been sketched in various German news reports.  A spokeswoman for Daimler-Benz, which said two weeks ago that it wanted the merger to go ahead without changes in the original plans, said yesterday the company's chief executive, Edzard Reuter, would comment on the matter at a news conference Monday.  Mr. Haussmann told the Bundestag, West Germany's parliament, yesterday that, in his decision, he would take into account the concerns of midsized companies, the need to reduce subsidies and the recommendations of the Monopoly Commission, an advisory body that last month gave a qualified approval for the transaction.  The Japanese space agency yesterday successfully launched a weather satellite.  The launch was originally scheduled for last month, but was delayed by a rocket engine failure.  The breakdown, the first since 1975, was considered an embarrassment for the National Space Development Agency.  Japan is behind the other developed countries in space technology, and has been pushing hard to catch up.  A spokeswoman said the agency replaced two engines, and launched the H1 rocket without any problems early yesterday morning.  The agency also reported it had received a signal from the satellite.  Du Pont Co. said it will spend $140 million to expand production of Kapton, a polymer film used widely in the electronics, automotive and aerospace industries.  The program, designed to double Kapton capacity by 1995, includes construction of major manufacturing plants in the U.S. and Europe.  Du Pont, which has interests in chemicals, plastics, fibers and energy, said it expects to invest about $60 million in the new U.S. plant.  No site has been chosen.  The company declined to say how much it will spend in Europe.  Several existing Du Pont sites in Europe are being evaluated.  The European plant is expected to add 500,000 pounds of annual capacity, beginning in 1992.  Du Pont said the program also calls for an investment of $25 million to improve its Kapton plant in Circleville, Ohio, and an expansion of unspecified cost for its plant in Pasadena, Texas.  Early in 1990, Du Pont will begin to benefit from a separate expansion program already under way in Japan, where its joint venture with Toray Industries Inc. is boosting annual Kapton capacity to about 1.3 million pounds.  Kapton is a strong, thermally resistant polyimide film used in flexible printed circuits, insulation for jet aircraft wiring and coil insulation for large motors.  The government raised its estimate of American worker productivity in the second quarter to show a larger rebound from the first period, when the hourly output of workers declined.  Productivity outside the farm sector increased at an annual rate of 0.7% in the latest period after declining at a 1.3% rate in the first quarter, the Labor Department said.  In a preliminary report last month the department put the second-quarter productivity increase at a 0.2% rate.  While the rise is still meager, it is also heartening.  With the civilian unemployment rate at a low 5.2%, growth in worker productivity is increasingly vital to the country's economic expansion, which has continued for nearly seven years.  Manufacturing productivity showed a particularly healthy gain -- a 2.9% annual rate instead of the 2.4% rate originally estimated -- which bodes well for American competitiveness abroad.  Nevertheless, the report contained some disturbing figures.  The productivity of American businesses outside of the financial sector continued to slip in the second quarter, falling at a 0.2% annual rate after plunging at a 1.8% rate in the first quarter.  This was the government's first estimate of productivity in that sector, which excludes such financial businesses as insurance companies, stock and commodity brokers and banks.  And the report contained evidence that inflation is still rooted in the economy.  Hourly wages for workers outside the farm sector grew in the second quarter at a slightly faster rate than the department initially calculated: 5.6% instead of 5.5%.  And that is far more rapid than the 4.8% rate of growth in the first quarter.  The escalation in labor costs means businesses may be inclined to raise their prices.  At the same time, the wage increases weren't raising the living standards of American workers.  After adjusting for inflation, wages actually fell at a 0.7% annual rate.  There was some slowing in the rise of labor costs per unit of production, however, but this figure still climbed at a hefty 4.9% annual rate.  That was less than the original second-quarter estimate of 5.2% and below the 6.2% rate of the first quarter.  Canadian production of newsprint dropped 1.6% in July compared with a year earlier as the industry operated at 94% of capacity.  The Canadian Pulp and Paper Association, an industry group, said Canadian mills produced 814,000 metric tons of newsprint in July compared with 827,000 metric tons a year earlier.  The July 94% operating rate was down from 95% in June and 96% a year ago.  Total shipments in July were 775,000 metric tons compared with 794,000 metric tons a year earlier.  Shipments to the U.S. and Canada declined while shipments to other markets increased.  In the first seven months of this year, output was down 2.1% to 5,699,000 metric tons from 5,822,000 metric tons a year ago.The association said U.S. consumer stocks at the end of July were 1,316,000 metric tons, representing a 40-day supply, compared with 1,300,000 metric tons at the end of June, a 42-day supply.  U.S. consumer stocks at the end of July 1988 were 1,559,000 metric tons, a 47-day supply.  Canadian mills' stocks at the end of July were 451,000 metric tons compared with 412,000 tons at the end of June and 343,000 tons at the end of July 1988.  Total U.S. consumption of newsprint declined 1.5% in July to 954,000 metric tons from 968,000 metric tons a year earlier.  There were five Sundays in July this year and last year.  Citizens & Southern Corp. said it is reorganizing top management in the wake of a senior executive's planned departure.  The bank holding company said Henry T. Collinsworth, 58 years old, will retire at the end of the year.  Mr. Collinsworth is currently vice chairman for trust and corporate operations, as well as for human resources.  Citizens said Robert V. Royall Jr., 54, will become a vice chairman and will head the company's new C&S Banking Group, which oversees banks in Georgia, South Carolina and Florida.  Mr. Royall will remain as chairman and chief executive officer of C&S National Bank of South Carolina.  John W. McIntyre, 58, currently vice chairman of the board and chairman of the Citizens' Georgia subsidiary, becomes the company's senior corporate relationship officer, working with major domestic and international corporate accounts.  He retains his other positions.  Willard A. Alexander, 57, currently a vice chairman and the company's chief credit officer, will also oversee a new Specialized Financial Services group that includes C&S Trust Co., C&S Investment Advisors Inc. and the human resources division.  James D. Dixon, 46, currently senior executive vice president and chief financial officer, will assume additional responsibilities in administration, including oversight of operations and corporate systems.  Bennett A. Brown, Citizens' chairman and chief executive officer, said the changes were designed to streamline and strengthen top management.  John J. Mason, a banking analyst in Atlanta, described the moves as "evolutionary, not revolutionary."  Mr. Collinsworth's retirement, said Mr. Mason, means other senior executives "are getting their responsibilities beefed up."  Gibbons Green van Amerongen, a leveraged buy-out firm, said it sold American Bank Stationery Co. for $300 million, three years after buying the company for $99.5 million.  The buyer of American Bank, a major check printer, is MB America Inc., a Westport, Conn., unit of MB Group PLC, a Reading, England, financial printer.  The acquisition more than doubles MB America's bank check printing business.  Four years ago, MB America purchased Clarke Checks Inc.  Last year, American Bank Stationery, Baltimore, had profit before interest and taxes of $20.4 million on revenue of $148.6 million.  For its most recent fiscal year, Clarke Checks, San Antonio, Texas, reported sales of $109.5 million.  MB America said that a new holding company, Clarke American Holdings Inc., would oversee the two companies.  Peter J. Hewett, chairman and president of MB America; James E. Coln, president of Clarke Checks, and Edward R. Heiser, American Bank Stationery president, will serve as chairman, chief executive officer and president, respectively, of the new company.  Combining the operations of Clarke and American Bank Stationery will create a network of 56 printing plants, covering most major U.S. markets, Mr. Hewett said.  In 1986, Gibbons Green and the management of the printing company formed a group to acquire American Bank Stationery from American Standard Inc., using $21 million in equity, $58 million in senior debt and $21 million in subordinated debt.  During its ownership, Gibbons Green van Amerongen said $23 million was invested in new equipment, and the subordinated debt was paid.  "This was an unusual buy-out," said Lewis van Amerongen, one of the firm's partners.  "We didn't sell off operations.  It wasn't a bust-up like you always read about.  It was a classic case of finding the right formula and the right chemistry of people.  The operating income of the company tripled in the three years that we owned the company.  We are confident that there will be further operational improvements."  Investors in the buy-out included Gibbons Green von Amerongen's own investor fund, American Bank management, Prudential Life Insurance Co. of America, Equitable Life Assurance Society of the U.S. and Northwestern Mutual Life Insurance Co.  H.J. Heinz Co. directors voted a 2-for-1 stock split and increased the cash dividend 17%.  The additional shares will be distributed Oct. 23 to stockholders of record Sept. 27, Heinz said.  The food company's directors declared a quarterly dividend of 42 cents on current shares, an increase from the 36 cents paid for the past four quarters, payable Oct. 10, record Sept. 21.  Heinz said it has increased the dividend every year since 1967.  Members of the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers in New Jersey are scheduled to vote today on a new three-year agreement with Bell Atlantic Corp. that could end a month-long strike.  Negotiators for the company and the union reached a tentative agreement late Tuesday.  IBEW members won't return to work until the new labor pact is ratified, but union officials agreed to stop picketing Bell Atlantic facilities where the Communications Workers of America represents some or all union employees.  CWA members began returning to work yesterday, according to a spokesman for the Philadelphia-based regional telephone company.  The CWA had reached agreement with Bell Atlantic more than a week ago, but most CWA members at Bell Atlantic's New Jersey Bell telephone unit had refused to cross IBEW picket lines.  The IBEW represents some 9,000 workers at New Jersey Bell while the CWA represents about 5,400.  Meanwhile, the strike continued at New York-based Nynex Corp. Negotiators for the company met yesterday with bargainers for the CWA, which represents 40,000 Nynex employees, and talks continued with the IBEW, which represents about 20,000.  Meetings with both unions are scheduled for today.  The most contentious issue is a plan to shift some health-care costs to employees.  The Federal Reserve Bank of New York sold a record $11.92 billion in May, June and July to blunt the dollar's advance.  The sales were the Fed's largest intervention in a three-month period since the central bank began its quarterly tallies in 1973.  The previous largest intervention occurred from November 1978 through January 1979, when the bank bought just under $6.8 billion to arrest the dollar's free fall.  The previous record for dollar sales was $3.2 billion in August-October 1985.  The extraordinary amount of dollar sales in the latest period reflects intense upward pressure on the U.S. unit, rather than any change in Fed policy, said Sam Y. Cross, executive vice president of the New York Fed.  "The period showed we were prepared to do a substantial amount of intervention . . . to respond to market pressures {for a higher dollar}," Mr. Cross said.  The bulk of the sales took place in May and June, when the Fed bought yen for $7.24 billion and bought West German marks for $4.68 billion.  In the February-April period, the Fed's dollar sales totaled around $2.2 billion.  Fed officials cited several factors for the dollar's bull run during May and June.  The currency's relatively solid showing in the early part of 1989, buoyed by investment and commercial demand, persuaded many investors to increase the share of dollar assets in their portfolios and quelled moves to hedge against the possibility of weakness in the U.S. unit.  This, occurring despite narrowing interest-rate differentials, added a decidedly pro-dollar flavor to the market.  The dollar's advance intensified after mid-May, when the government reported a smaller-than-expected jump in U.S. consumer prices for April and a bullish report on the U.S. trade deficit for March.  Concerned with the dollar's climb, the White House warned on May 22 that the dollar's sustained appreciation could upset international trade balances.  But, by May's end the upward pressure on the dollar had abated somewhat in the face of aggressive central-bank intervention and signs that the pace of the U.S. economy was slowing.  The dollar, however, resumed its ascent in early June as Asian investors sought a safe-haven currency following the Chinese government's crackdown on pro-democracy demonstrators.  By late June, the market shifted its focus back to the U.S. economy and monetary policy, casting a cautious patina over the market.  The dollar closed the three-month period virtually unchanged, as measured by a trade-weighted basis against a basket of currencies.  During the period, the U.S. currency rose 3% against the yen, 0.75% against the mark and 1.25% against the British pound.  Regarding persistent market talk that the Fed has adopted more secretive intervention techniques, Mr. Cross said, "At times we may operate more visibly in the market. . . .  At other times we may think it's more effective to operate less openly."  The Fed and the U.S. Treasury, through the Exchange Stabilization Fund, participated equally in the quarter's interventions.  Stadium Stance  I've never read about a game  (And don't expect to, truly)  At which some sports reporter has  Described the crowd as ruly.  --Dick Emmons.  ---  Magic Mounting  Hats are accessories  That I hate:  With the slightest breeze  They levitate.  -- E.B. de Vito.  ---  Daffynition  Film tycoon's residence: mogul home.  --Rodney Stevens.  There has not been a full-scale war, using all available weapons and techniques, since the end of World War II.  In the intervening years, technology has advanced by quantum leaps.  But the raw materiel of war -- the enlisted men and the officers who command them -- is essentially the same.  In today's military, technology has dictated that to avoid unacceptable losses, men must be kept in very small groups, widely separated and moving frequently to avoid a single strike taking out a whole platoon or company.  These factors are the opposite of those employed since men first went to war.  In the past, peer pressure helped ensure a high level of performance in the face of the enemy.  If a soldier's companions were within sight and sound, it was unacceptable for him not to fight as well as he could.  He did not want to let down the team.  On today's field of conflict, those peer pressures are frequently absent; a soldier is often alone with his thoughts as the enemy rolls toward him.  How much easier it is to lie low and not engage the enemy if nobody can see you.  To these pressures must be added the fear of the unknown.  Many U.S. troops and all other NATO soldiers have loved ones in what would be the war zone of Western Europe.  Could a soldier call down a fire mission on his hometown not knowing if his girlfriend or grandmother had managed to flee before the enemy rolled in?  Because of the NATO commitment to fight a defensive war, this is not a dilemma Warsaw pact forces will ever face.  Battlefield stress has been recognized since World War I, but the sheer terror that must be overcome to operate some of today's complex weapons has not been sufficiently tested.  This is because it simply is not possible in a civilized society to subject individuals to the ordeal that would be required.  Imagine the following scenario, which may allow a civilian to understand this level of stress:  You are driving along the highway and look up to see a truck on your side of the road.  You jam on the brakes and start to slide sideways.  The truck clips your fender and you spin to a stop.  The car is damaged, but you are unhurt.  Your friend beside you is screaming, and the adrenalin rush has made your legs weak, your heart races and your hands shake.  You now have seven seconds to change the batteries in the flashlight you keep in the car, turn it on and point it at the truck, or it will hit you again -- and this time it will kill you.  This is very similar to having a tank fire on your foxhole and miss.  Changing the batteries in a flashlight, turning it on and pointing it are similar actions to loading and firing one of the least sophisticated of today's light anti-tank weapons.  Seven seconds is about the time it would take a tank to reload its main gun and fire.  The simple task of changing flashlight batteries is one that most people have done dozens of times under normal conditions.  But to do it under the circumstances just described would be beyond most people.  Pity the poor soldier.  On a modern battlefield an infantryman can expect to be the target of the whole panoply of weaponry -- from the simple rifle to main battle tanks and helicopter gunships -- all of which he will feel are aimed solely at him.  He may not be able to use his radio, because of electronic countermeasures; he may not be able to see another member of his own side because of distance or smoke or attrition, and he will feel as if he has been in a succession of malevolent car wrecks aimed solely at destroying him.  During all this he will be expected to maintain and deploy weapons it took the West's finest scientists and designers many years and billions of dollars to perfect under ideal conditions.  Armies do not deploy supermen to operate these weapons.  The average enlisted soldier is a lot less like Rambo than like a plumber or the gardener that you see every month.  Indeed, in Europe the high proportion of reservists that will be called to war means that many plumbers and gardeners will be on the front lines.  Trained technicians sitting in air-conditioned computer rooms during peacetime make plenty of mistakes.  Imagine a reservist, under fire from a battery of self-propelled guns, trying to operate a "smart" weapon that he has not seen for months or perhaps years.  The senior officers who command him will never be able to understand what he is going through.  Almost by definition, senior officers are never alone.  They have to have staff and enlisted men around them to manage the command process.  And while they will be in danger from the enemy, they will not be facing that danger alone, or very nearly so.  Until the advent of modern communications, generals experienced the stress and conditions under which their men were fighting.  They had to be within sight of their own troops and the enemy to control the action.  Now even a regimental commander may be miles from the forward edge of the battle.  The problem today is not whether sophisticated technological weapons will work.  The challenge facing manufacturers and commanders is whether an average 19-year-old kid from the inner city or his reservist uncle can remember enough of his training and summon up enough courage to use effectively the weapons he has been given.  Smart weapons and competitive strategies do not win wars; smart men and combative officers do.  ---  Mr. Cheeseman, a free-lance writer, is a former editor in chief of Computer News, a British weekly, and a former enlisted infantry officer.  Money-market fund yields continued to slide while yields on most consumer-oriented certificates of deposit edged higher, according to separate surveys released yesterday.  The average seven-day compounded yield on a money fund fell to 8.58% from 8.64%, Donoghue's Money Fund Report said in its survey of funds for the week ended Tuesday.  Walter Frank, chief economist of the Holliston, Mass., newsletter organization, said the fund moves weren't unexpected and were little more than normal weekly "flux."  Donoghue's maintains that fund yields will be flat over the next six to eight weeks, he said.  Average maturity, a measure of how long fund managers hold investment products in their portfolios, continued to fall, a sign that professionals expect interest rates to creep up.  Maturity declined by one day to 37.  "They want to stay short to get the new {higher yielding} paper as it comes out," Mr. Frank said of the maturity drop.  The managers' moves are a "continuation of what we have been seeing for the last few weeks."  Maturity was as high as 42 days in early August.  Rates on commercial paper offered by Citicorp, a major issuer, increased through August but slipped back at the sale on Tuesday.  At the weekly auction of U.S. Treasury bills, held this week on Tuesday because of the Labor Day holiday, yields were also lower.  The average six-month bill yield was 8.31%, down from 8.32% the previous Monday.  Funds invest in each of these types of securities, as well as CDs and other instruments.  Banxquote Money Markets said the average yield on a three-month CD aimed at consumers slipped 0.02 percentage point to 7.93% in the week ended yesterday.  But every other average maturity in the savings-type CD market increased in the period.  The average six-month issue was offered at 8.01%, up 0.02 point, and the average one-year certificate added 0.05 point to 8%.  Five-year CDs, on average, also stand at 8%, up 0.07 point in the week.  Most CDs sold through networks of brokers and dealers slipped because of the lower Treasury bill yields.  Jumbo, or large-denomination, CDs were offered with higher yields on issues that mature in less than a year, while lower yields were posted for issues over a year.  Recently, the big California banks have offered the strongest yields in some maturities of savings-type CDs.  Earlier this year, West Coast banks offered what were among the lowest payouts of the nation's major banks.  Six-month CD yields in California, on average, were unchanged at 8.36%, Banxquote said.  Banxquote said the average bank money-market account currently yields 6.99%, down from 7% a week earlier.  Total assets of the 387 money funds tracked by Donoghue's increased $354.2 million to a record $336.03 billion.  The average 30-day compounded yield on funds fell to 8.65% from 8.67%.  Compound yields assume reinvestment of dividends.  Donoghue's said the average seven-day simple yield fell to 8.24% from 8.29%, while the average 30-day simple yield declined to 8.30% from 8.32%.  If Merv Griffin can get involved in casinos, then Donald Trump can have a game show.  That, anyway, appears to be Mr. Trump's thinking.  But so far even the news conference to announce "Trump Card," the new television show, has had to be postponed because of glitches.  Pessimists might take that as a sign that Mr. Trump will have the bad luck in game shows that Mr. Griffin has had in the gambling business.  Mr. Trump, whose name is emblazoned on airplanes, hotels, a bicycle race and two casinos in Atlantic City, N.J., was engaged in a takeover battle last year with Mr. Griffin over Resorts International Inc., a hotel-casino company.  Mr. Griffin, who made millions by creating the game shows "Jeopardy" and "Wheel of Fortune," paid $365 million for Resorts, which has been a money-losing headache ever since.  Lorimar Television, a unit of Time-Warner Inc., says it has been negotiating with Mr. Trump to attach his name to a syndicated game show.  It isn't clear yet whether Mr. Trump would put any money into the show or get a fee from it.  The program was to be unveiled this morning in the glitzy Atrium at New York's Trump Tower, but late yesterday an embarrassed publicity director for Lorimar postponed the news conference; it hasn't been rescheduled.  The Lorimar spokesman said "some contractual points are still unresolved," but declined to specify them.  He wouldn't say whether Mr. Trump would be likely to appear on the show or whether it would be related to "Trump: The Game," a board game introduced early this year.  Warner Bros. would distribute the show, scheduled to premiere next fall if enough TV stations sign up for it.  Mr. Trump couldn't be reached for comment, but game-show veteran Mark Goodson -- who was involved in creating, among others, "The Price Is Right," "What's My Line?" and "To Tell the Truth" -- warns that the odds of success in the field aren't much better than the odds in most casinos. "'Trump Card' is a terrific title, but a title is only 3% of what makes a game show," Mr. Goodson says.  "I think Donald Trump is a genius, but what I'd say to him is, remember what happened to Merv Griffin when he tried your business."  Democratic Party Treasurer Robert Farmer, in an interview with the political news service Hotline (Aug. 7), on why he supports large campaign donors getting ambassadorships:  The job of ambassador is to serve as an American representative but secondly to promote business interests of America there.  Generally big contributors have had successful business backgrounds and that's why they are able to donate a lot of money.  The second thing is that the host country, when they have a big problem, would probably much prefer an ambassador who can pick up the phone and call the president of the United States.  Now no career diplomat is probably going to feel that comfortable picking up the phone. . . .  Somebody who is his personal friend is going to call him without a moment's thought.  The drug dealers who've murdered nearly 300 Colombian judges and their staff now threaten to kill many more if any cartel member is extradited.  Maybe they don't have be so scared of U.S. courts.  Last week, three federal appeals judges raised criminal rights to a new level of absurdity by throwing out the convictions of four Colombian drug runners because of comments the trial judge made after the jury had convicted.  President Bush wants tougher law enforcement, but with judges like these all we can say is, Good luck, Mr. President.  The case of U.S. v.  Luis Edwardo-Franco, Rocio Gallego aka "Mariela Florez," Jorge Lopez and Sergio Castro-Munoz perfectly illustrates how the trivializing of our legal system contributes to the drug crisis.  Two years ago the police became suspicious of residents of a house in Jericho, Long Island.  The cops followed two of them delivering a plastic bag from Long Island to a Harlem tenement.  The bag contained more than two pounds of cocaine.  A search of the house found 33 more pounds of coke (which as crack would fetch more than $2 million), weapons and notebooks documenting the drug traffic.  A jury had no difficulty convicting the four on drugs and weapons charges.  Then came the sentencing hearing before Federal Judge Mark Constantino.  The defense lawyer asked for leniency on the grounds that the defendants would be deported back to Colombia after they served their time in jail.  Judge Constantino was not impressed.  "They don't have too much regard for judges," he said, noting that Colombian drug lords had "killed 32 chief judges in that nation. . . .  Nobody's going to shoot me."  Then the lawyer said that as immigrants they "suffer a tremendous pressure moneywise."  Judge Constantino replied that "nobody tells them to come and get involved in cocaine."  This rugged individualism was too much for Federal Appeals Judges Ellsworth Van Graafeiland, James Oakes and George Pratt.  They threw out the convictions by detecting an anti-Colombian bias in Judge Constantino's comments about the fate of judges in Colombia.  They said that Judge Constantino's "ethnic prejudice somehow had infected the judicial process."  Despite the usual difficulty proving judicial bias, the appeals court here found bias without pointing to anything specific: "Our conclusion in this regard should not be interpreted to mean that the district judge in fact was guilty of such prejudice; it means that he appeared to be."  They somersaulted from the supposed appearance of bias to infer that the entire trial must have been tainted.  They cited trivial points that would never stand on their own, such as that Judge Constantino had twice found a defense lawyer in contempt.  The appeals judges even cast doubt on the evidence of any crime, despite the inconvenient fact that a defense lawyer had admitted the defendants were "mules" who kept drug records and made deliveries, arguing only that they didn't get the "big profits."  The appeals judges' behavior may have something to do with the surprise they expressed that Judge Constantino would give 30-year-terms to these first-time offenders.  This punishment may sound reasonable to you and to us, but judges are more used to seeing first-timers plea bargain down to probation.  For his part, Judge Constantino tells us, "I have never been known as a judge with a fear of expressing an opinion.  That's what I get paid for."  He denies any "ethnic prejudice" -- or any appearance thereof.  This judicial effort to free criminals is a perfect example of our "Miranda"-style justice.  Courtrooms are now reduced to gaming parlors in which clever lawyers devise new ways to suppress truth-finding evidence and reverse reasonable sentences.  We are "at war" against drugs because our more civilized method of attack -- the legal system -- has fallen apart.  Campbell Soup Co. reported a fourth-quarter loss of $194.7 million and a sharp earnings drop for the fiscal year, reflecting $343 million in pre-tax charges for a major restructuring.  In the year-earlier quarter, the company had a profit of $72.2 million, or 56 cents a share.  Sales in the quarter rose to $1.3 billion from $1.15 billion.  The company said earnings for the fiscal year ended July 30 fell to $13.1 million, or 10 cents a share, from $274.1 million, or $2.12 a share, in fiscal 1988.  The year-earlier results included a benefit of $32.5 million, or 25 cents a share, from an accounting adjustment.  Excluding the restructuring charges, Campbell's fiscal 1989 earnings were essentially flat.  Sales for the year rose 16% to $5.67 billion from $4.87 billion.  The company said strong growth in operating earnings, particularly in domestic operations, was offset by high costs at several foreign units, interest payments associated with the acquisition of a British frozen-food concern, and management incentives linked to the company's unexpectedly high stock price, reflecting takeover speculation.  Campbell U.S.A., the company's largest division, reported a 15% improvement in operating profit for the year, excluding the restructuring charges.  The division's 9% sales growth was paced by such brands as V8 vegetable juice, Prego spaghetti sauces and Swanson and Le Menu frozen foods.  Sales of Pepperidge Farm baked goods rose 11%.  Most of the company's international sales growth was attributed to acquisitions.  Campbell officials expressed optimism that the restructuring program, announced last month, will improve operating margins and long-term profitability.  "We don't plan for earnings to remain flat," a company spokesman said.  Under the restructuring, Campbell is closing at least nine plants world-wide and eliminating about 2,800 jobs in the U.S. alone.  The company also is writing off good will in Argentina and replacing top managers at its operations in Britain and Italy.  The moves are widely seen as an attempt to slow Campbell's expansion and improve the margins and productivity of existing operations.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Campbell shares closed at $50.125, down 25 cents.  Since the company announced the restructuring Aug. 24, its stock has slipped from $53 a share.  "They have so much on their table that they have a case of indigestion," said John M. McMillin of Prudential-Bache Securities.  But he predicted the restructuring will produce a sharper focus for the company.  "They finally realized they don't need to be this big," he said.  First Chicago Corp. agreed to sell its money management subsidiary to the unit's management for cash and securities valued at about $115 million.  Gary P. Brinson, president and chief executive officer of the unit, First Chicago Investment Advisors, which manages more than $12 billion, has for about two years been trying to buy the unit from the bank holding company.  He plans to rename the unit Brinson Partners Inc.  Putting majority ownership of the unit in the hands of the money managers themselves is viewed as crucial in keeping those people at the firm.  "We made it clear we were not interested in a third party sale," Mr. Brinson said.  Several big banking concerns have sold their institutional money management units in recent years, including Citicorp, Manufacturers Hanover Corp. and Bank of Boston Corp.  The business is profitable, but doesn't necessarily generate any customer loyalty among pension fund and other customers that the banks can seize on to sell additional services.  The potential for such so-called "synergy" among various financial services operations has been the reason many banks originally diversified.  "If this had been a critical element in our overall relationship with customers," First Chicago's president, Richard L. Thomas, said in an interview, "we would have thought quite differently about (selling) it."  First Chicago said it expects a pretax gain of $60 million to $65 million, or about 60 to 65 cents a share after tax, when the sale is completed, which it expects by Sept. 30. (First Chicago earned $259.1 million, or $3.83 a share, in the first half this year.) Terms call for Mr. Brinson's group to pay $70 million cash.  First Chicago would also get a $15 million subordinated note, 10% of the firm's common stock, and be paid a $17 million dividend.  The cash portion will come from a New York bank Mr. Brinson wouldn't identify, the San Francisco investment banking firm Hellman & Friedman, and from Mr. Brinson and about 70 other managers.  The managers will own about 75%, First Chicago 10% and the remainder will go to Hellman & Friedman and perhaps to the bank lender, Mr. Brinson said.  Mr. Brinson said cash flow that previously went to First Chicago will be sufficient to cover payments on the acquisition debt.  First Chicago has no plans to sell other units, Mr. Thomas said.  The company stock has over the past 18 months largely caught up to the breakup value of its various businesses.  First Chicago closed yesterday at $48, unchanged, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Mr. Brinson said he plans no change in the way the firm manages money for clients.  First Chicago will continue to use Mr. Brinson to manage its employee benefit funds.  Analysts expect ownership changes among large money managers to continue.  "There will be a couple more of the $100 million variety between now and the end of the year," said Jeffrey D. Lovell, a partner of Putnam Lovell Inc., a Manhattan Beach, Calif., investment banking firm specializing in money-management firms.  First Chicago Investment Advisors is well regarded in the money management business.  In addition to stocks and bonds, the firm uses venture capital, real estate and leveraged buy-outs, as well as international securities.  Mr. Brinson's strategies make heavy use of computers.  "He's both an administrator and a thinker, and that's a pretty good combination," said Dean LeBaron, trustee of Boston-based Batterymarch Financial Management, a competitor.  U.S. Ambassador to Lebanon John McCarthy and his staff were airlifted out of Beirut yesterday after a threatening crowd gathered outside the American Embassy.  The threat was not from Soviet-backed Syrians or PLO guerrillas, but from Christian Arabs, whose interests the U.S. has tried to protect, off and on.  The Christians apparently had mulled over a well-worn question and made up their minds.  The question: Is it better to have the United States as a friend or as an enemy?  It is a newspaper war with a difference.  Using equipment fit to stock a printer's museum, the until-recently outlawed Solidarity movement and the Polish Communist Party now fight their war of words each night, cheek by jowl.  In one corner of a dirty printshop in a quiet Warsaw neighborhood is the cramped production room of the Gazeta Wyborcza, a daily newspaper born of seven years of underground struggle, whose illegal predecessors were published clandestinely at more than 15 secret sites scattered around the country.  Editors moved from spot to spot, often one step ahead of the secret police.  Several wound up in jail.  But accords reached last April that legalized Solidarity also legitimized its newspapers, and on May 1 the Gazeta production staff (the writers work out of a different office) moved into the same building as its Communist rival, the Trybuna Ludu, or People's Tribune, to start publishing in time for the June elections.  The shared printers work in a big space in the center of the building, on ancient typesetting machines that form molten lead into lines of print and headlines.  These are then assembled in wooden blocks to form the pages.  Both papers suffer when, frequently, the machines break, or an operator retires.  Spare parts, and trained typesetters, are scarce.  But the accords that brought the newspapers physically together didn't say they had to work the same way.  The differences are crucial to understanding the changes bubbling through Poland.  The moribund Communist structure, starting with its information organs, long ago lost credibility.  The truth, whether published out of somebody's attic or from an "official" building, is prized.  Solidarity, for that reason, has made taming the Communist Party-dominated media here a top priority.  New Prime Minister Tadeusz Mazowiecki, who was the editor of a Solidarity weekly paper, says "pluralism," and freedom of expression, is the only way he can speak to his constituents, or they to him.  The Solidarity editors here played a major role in Mr. Mazowiecki's election last month as Poland's first non-Communist premier in 43 years.  Editor-in-chief Adam Michnik, a key Solidarity strategist, suggested in a front-page story a few weeks ago that Solidarity take the gamble of running the government while leaving the Communist President Wojciech Jaruzelski in charge of the army and the police.  "Your President, Our Prime Minister," the Gazeta's headline, became a popular slogan.  On a recent evening the Solidarity cubicle hums with last-minute activity before the midnight deadline.  An editor clacks out a last-minute editorial on what looks like the first typewriter ever made.  The foreign editor finishes a roundup of foreign reaction to Mr. Mazowiecki's election.  The art director fusses over a couple of headlines.  Deputy editor Helen Luczywo fusses over everything.  Meanwhile, a glance out the open Solidarity room, across a corner of the printshop, shows a sharply different scene.  A few late-middle-age ladies who look like they should be serving tea leisurely proofread some page proofs.  Though deadline approaches, nobody hurries, no voices are raised, no cigarettes are hastily puffed.  This is the production office of Trybuna Ludu, the official Communist Party newspaper.  Mrs. Luczywo looks over with bemused disgust.  "They don't run any news, so why should they hurry?" she asks.  "Look."  She points to a copy of yesterday's paper.  "We had a story on how young Communists wanted to change the rules of their party at the next Congress.  We scooped the Communist paper on their own news] We had the news about the new prime minister three days before they did.  One day, okay -- he was one of us.  But three days]" She marvels at it.  Then she confides: "But it's not so surprising.  They all want to work for us because we pay three times as much."  Mrs. Luczywo is careful to distinguish between the production employees and the editors of the Communist paper.  The workers are just regular folks; the editors are all loyal party hacks, she explains.  "They {the editors} hate us."  Peering at a proof of the next day's Trybuna Ludu -- there are no secrets in this print shop -- Mrs. Luczywo finds a front-page piece about an article in the previous day's Gazeta.  She reads it with wonder.  "Now they seem to be reprinting what we write, only making fun of it a little," she says.  "They've gone completely mad."  So far, the intimate competition with the Gazeta doesn't seem to have affected the staid, generally unreadable Trybuna.  It continues to churn out propaganda, and continues to rely on a distribution near-monopoly for its stated circulation of 1.5 million copies a day at 50 zlotys a copy.  The Gazeta says it sells 500,000 copies a day at 60 zlotys each. (At the current legal black-market rate of 8,000 zlotys to the dollar, either paper is a bargain.)  As for the Solidarity paper, one of its problems looks likely to be its own success.  Already new underground papers have sprung up because some journalists say the once-dissident Solidarity journalists have joined the establishment.  As part of the legitimizing agreement, the Gazeta is submitted to government censorship each night, though under the new government this might ease.  Isn't it fair to call the Gazeta Wyborcza the official government paper, now that Solidarity runs the show?  "Nooooo," Mrs. Luczywo replies in mock horror.  She rushes over to a box of lead type being assembled into the next day's page three.  On it Mr. Michnik has written a piece warning Mr. Mazowiecki, the Solidarity prime minister elected the day before, that he doesn't have much time to produce results before Poles will get uneasy.  "We're going to give the new government as much trouble as we gave the old one," Mrs. Luczywo predicts.  Colin F. Kaiser was named president and chief executive officer of this gold producer, succeeding Mike Muzylowski, who resigned.  Mr. Kaiser was a senior executive with M.I.M. Holdings Ltd., an Australia mining concern that acquired a 32.3% stake in Granges earlier this year.  Granges said its chief financial officer, Doug McRae, also resigned.  Messrs.  Muzylowski and McRae, who simultaneously resigned their posts as directors, agreed to continue as consultants to Granges, the company said.  A Granges spokesman wouldn't elaborate on the executive changes.  Henry G. Cisneros and W. Thomas Stephens were elected to the board of this architectural and construction services concern, expanding the board to 11.  Mr. Cisneros, formerly mayor of San Antonio, Texas, is chairman of Cisneros Asset Management Co., an investment management concern in that city.  Mr. Stephens is president and chief executive officer of Manville Corp., a Denver, Colo., building, construction and paper products concern.  Hai Y. Lee has been named a director, succeeding Robert H. Klugman who resigned.  Mr. Klugman continues as counsel for the company which designs, engineers and markets audio-visual products and instructional programs.  The North Hollywood-based company said Mr. Lee holds a doctorate in electronics and has expertise in electronics design and liquid crystal display panel services.  The company said Mr. Lee's appointment will help it expand into LCD projectors and similar products.  IF DRUG MONEY helped the economy boom, what if the drug war succeeds?  Inadvertent profiteers in luxury markets -- autos, jewelry, real estate -- would be first to feel any economic withdrawal.  "It's almost undeniable that drug traffic, regretably, has been a big stimulant to the economy in the '80s," says Lawrence Kudlow, Bear Stearns economist.  Since drug dollars now operate "underground," redirecting them above ground by curbing drug sales "could be healthy for the banking system," says Alan Reynolds, Polyconomics president.  The overall economy might not flinch if drug money dries up, but regional and inner city areas would, economists add.  Just how much drug money exists is debatable.  Estimates of the size of the entire underground economy hover around 10% to 15% of GNP, but that includes everyone who works off the books.  David Resler of Nomura Securities says clues can be found in currency figures.  Government data say cash per capita was $979.69 at March 31.  "I don't know people who carry $200 in their pocket.  There are a lot of suitcases out there," notes the economist.  He figures about half the latest per-capita currency is in $100 bills.  Economist Samuel Kahan: "Money has no morality.  You can use it for the most noble or most craven purposes."  MOTHERS WHO WORK get less sleep than working dads.  Women long have suspected as much.  Now, an analysis by two Michigan State economists quantifies the premise that working moms are shortchanged on shuteye -- 45 minutes a night.  Jeff Biddle and Daniel Hamermesh find that each extra hour of work cuts sleep time by 10 minutes and free time by 50 minutes daily for both sexes.  But women with children under three already lose 20 minutes a day to the kids; an hour of overtime cuts 25 minutes more.  The economists' working paper uses some outlandishly complex formulas and anecdotal evidence.  Women "are forced to do relatively more of the housework than men," says Mr. Hamermesh.  With a greater store of free time, men seem more able to get back those lost winks.  But women can be left "dragging" in the workplace by mid-afternoon.  "It's an argument for some kind of child-care policy," Mr. Hamermesh says.  A NEED TO SEE AND BE SEEN sends more top executives to trade shows.  More than twice as many CEOs and presidents show up at the company booth (and the competition's) than in 1984, says Incomm International.  The reason: "It's a matter of team-building and staying in touch with the marketplace," says President Allen Konopacki.  Most improved industries: chemicals, medical instruments, construction.  Serious negotiating with customers -- often in the shadow of a rival supplier's booth -- takes over where "bathing beauties" and "savvy salesmen" left off, he adds.  Gone, too, are the days of wandering aimlessly in an exhibit hall: 76% of show-goers arrive with an agenda.  Their top concern: Whether the featured company will be around in five years.  Meanwhile, the trade-show industry expects its biggest growth from smaller, regional events.  Trade-show Week says 65 million people attended shows in 1988, each spending an average $866.49.  Says Reebok head Paul Fireman: "A leader should stand beside his troops at one major event, at least, each year."  ARTHRITIS SUFFERERS: Today, the Arthritis Foundation assembles medical experts and staff to answer questions about aspirin and other treatments for the 37 million Americans with arthritis.  The "Dial-ogue" is available by calling 1-800-283-7800.  "THE SHADOW KNOWS" but kids don't.  So, the Museum of Broadcasting offers Saturday morning workshops to acquaint children with the world of radio.  Among other things, the children create sound effects for galloping horses and mysterious footsteps.  MARK SEPT. 15 AND 29: This month has two Fridays when weekly, biweekly and bimonthly pay periods converge for 90 million workers.  So National Automated Clearing House promotes direct deposit.  Only 12% of U.S. workers use it, vs. 95% of West Germans and 70% of Britons.  BANK BORROWING becomes more complicated for small business.  A decade ago, a small company would have all its funding needs met by its local bank.  "There are now so many lenders that a small company can spin its wheels seeking a loan and come up empty," says Frank Gori, a director of accountants Ernst & Young.  Express America couldn't get a $1 million-plus line of credit at four banks.  So Mr. Gori led the truck-line services firm to a bank that makes asset-based loans.  "The bank later even bought 17 1/2% of our company," says President Richard Francis.  Mindy Kaplan of Ernst & Young says loan sources include big banks, smaller commercial banks, commercial-finance companies and asset-based lenders.  "There are more niches and getting advice helps," she says.  Chicken Enterprises Ltd., a California fast-food franchise company, needed $7.5 million to expand in-state and in Nevada.  "Two local banks just didn't understand our business," says Michael Kassan, head of the company.  "So we finally got the loan from Wells Fargo Bank, which did."  Some companies avoid banks.  Peat Marwick partner Jeffrey Sands helped a borrower get a loan from a supplier.  BRIEFS: Ben & Jerry's dishes up a new ice cream flavor, Rainforest Crunch, and will dish out to preserve Brazil's trees. . . .  As accountants merge, the Big Eight Review newsletter changes its name to Emerson's Professional Services Review.  Jerry Esbin, senior executive vice president and chief operating officer of Loews Theatre Management Corp., was named to the additional post of president.  Loews, a unit of Columbia, which also has operations in motion pictures and television, operates over 850 screens.  Mr. Esbin succeeds Bernard Myerson, who remains chairman and chief executive of Loews.  Time Warner Inc., hoping to grab a piece of the lucrative market for books aimed at busy readers, is test-marketing a series of condensed books from fiction and non-fiction bestseller lists.  Time Warner's move would make it the first major hard-cover competitor to Reader's Digest Association Inc., the closely held magazine and book publishing company based in Pleasantville, N.Y. Reader's Digest, which is currently in preregistration for an initial public offering of nonvoting shares of company stock, would not release sales figures.  However, industry sources say annual revenue from Reader's Digest Condensed Books is about $400 million.  According to BP Reports, a book publishing industry newsletter, Reader's Digest Condensed Books in 1988 sold about 20 million books world-wide, of which about 10 million were sold in the U.S.  Although many publishers scoff at such books, one volume typically sells an average of 1.5 million copies, far more than even most hard-cover bestsellers.  The first volume of the Time Warner series, called Time-Life Book Digest, was offered to about one million readers in a direct-mail piece sent in late June.  The volume, which collects abridged versions of four bestsellers in one hard-cover book, is being sold through Time Inc. Books Direct.  It looks remarkably similar to the books marketed by Reader's Digest and is being sold on the strength of the lucrative direct-mailing lists of Book-of-the-Month Club and Time-Life Books.  "Reader's Digest has the only position in this area, but with a mailing list of Time-Life Books, they could make a lot of money from condensed books," says BP Reports Editor James Milliot.  "Reader's Digest is facing their first competitor and they should be concerned."  Barbara Morgan, editor in chief of Reader's Digest Condensed Books, said she welcomed the competition.  "We are delighted to see others share our view that the printed word is thriving and that reading is still a very popular pastime," she said.  "That's great for the industry and the readers."  Readers who subscribe to Time Warner's Book Digest series have been sent volume one, which includes the abridged versions of Michael Korda's "The Fortune," Jack Higgins's "A Season In Hell," Andrew Rooney's "Not That You Asked," and Eileen Goudge's "Garden of Lies."  Reader's Digest sells its Condensed Books for $12.98 per volume; Time Warner's Book Digest sells for $11.95 a volume.  Although none of the books in the first volume of Book Digest come out of Time Warner companies, some industry observers questioned whether Book Digest might be used to push books from Little, Brown and Warner Books, the two trade-book publishing companies joined in the merger of Time Inc. and Warner Communications Inc.  "Just as we don't give special preference when we make Book-of-the-Month Club selections, we wouldn't do it here," said Neal Goff, vice president of new business development, Time Inc. Books Direct.  "We are just looking for the best books to sell."  Mr. Goff said that while the company has done only one mailing, and has no specific number of subscribers in mind, "the results have been encouraging."  He added that about two more test mailings are planned before a national rollout.  "We would be happy to reach the scale Reader's Digest has, but that will take years," he said.  The Time Warner series will include both fiction and non-fiction.  Reader's Digest has traditionally been only abridged fiction, though it recently launched volume one of its "Today's Best Non-Fiction," a series of only contemporary non-fiction condensed books.  Talks are scheduled to begin today in Atlanta between the Ethiopian government and guerrilla insurgents.  The discussions, which will deal with procedural issues preliminary to the main negotiations, were proposed and will be mediated by former president Jimmy Carter.  Don't laugh.  Both the government and the guerrillas are burnt out from many years of fighting.  Mr. Carter, a well-meaning man with a proven knack for handling complicated negotiations between sworn enemies, could yet atone for the naivety of his earlier approach toward Ethiopia.  Last February, Eritrean and Tigrean guerrillas destroyed three government divisions, killing and capturing 10,000 of Mr. Mengistu's troops, a debacle that led to the desertion of 20,000 more.  Newsweek reported that Mr. Mengistu's army may have suffered more casualties since early 1988 than America did in Vietnam.  In May, Mr. Mengistu's own generals attempted a coup against him.  If one of the plotters had not at the last moment tipped off Mr. Mengistu, President Bush would have had a lucky foreign policy break early in his term.  Mr. Mengistu punished the generals in characteristic fashion: The headless body of one of the conspirators was reportedly dragged through the streets of Addis Ababa.  The others were tortured and killed.  Then Mr. Mengistu proceeded to adopt their program.  He indicated a willingness to make reforms and to negotiate unconditionally with the guerrillas.  And it was here that Mr. Carter seized the opportunity to make amends for one of the first of his foreign policy blunders.  In 1977, the Amhara-dominated empire of Ethiopia teetered on the verge of collapse.  Soviet-supported Eritrean and Tigrean insurgents were overrunning one government position after another in the north of the country.  The Somali army, also Soviet-supported, was poised to invade from the southeast.  Mr. Mengistu, a former army captain who had butchered his way up from a dusty supply office to head the ruling Dergue (military "committee"), was murdering his rivals while frantically searching for arms to fend off the Eritreans, the Tigreans and the Somalis.  And then the thought occurred to the Soviets: Why be satisfied with making a satellite of Somalia and its 3 million people, when the larger country next door was up for grabs?  It was up for grabs because Mr. Carter, appalled at Mr. Mengistu's human rights abuses, had refused to continue Henry Kissinger's Ethiopia policy.  Mr. Kissinger, secretary of state under President Ford, had closed his eyes to Mr. Mengistu's pathological killing, evidently on the assumption that a Soviet-controlled Mengistu would be even worse.  Mr. Kissinger turned out to have been right.  The result of the Carter arms embargo was a massive airlift of Soviet weapons to Ethiopia, the arrival of East German security police, some of them former Nazis, in Addis Ababa, and a "Red Terror," in which thousands of Ethiopian teen-agers were gunned down in the streets of the capital.  Mr. Carter's options in Ethiopia were, of course, unenviable.  But even if he felt morally obliged to turn away from one East African client, there was no justification for failing to arm the Somalis in order to retain some leverage over the regime in Addis Ababa.  But Mr. Carter also decided to leave the Somali army, beaten by the Soviet-supplied and Cuban- and East German-advised Ethiopians, stranded deep in the Ogaden desert without the U.S. arms for which the Somalis were begging.  In this vacuum, the Soviets did more than merely establish their influence in Ethiopia.  By engineering Mr. Mengistu's military victory over their former Somali satellite, the Soviets were able to completely take over in Addis Ababa.  The years rolled on.  The Somalis were crushed, but the guerrillas in the north fought on.  Mr. Mengistu's tactic was to burn recalcitrant Eritrean and Tigrean peasant farmers out of their homes.  By the fall of 1984, famine had ensued.  An ignorant world ascribed it to drought.  The first liberal reaction to the famine was to blame President Reagan for "letting Ethiopian kids starve because the regime was communist."  That was nonsense.  The Reagan administration had refused to aid Ethiopia throughout the early 1980s because Mr. Mengistu was prosecuting a war and a scorched-earth policy in the very region threatened by famine.  The Reagan administration had followed an anti-famine policy: It had urged the Ethiopian regime to abandon tactics that would inevitably cause mass starvation.  When that approach failed, the Reagan administration informed the United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees about satellite photographs, which showed the beginning of the mass exodus of Eritrean and Tigrean peasant farmers to neighboring Sudan.  This was 1983, a year before the famine emergency.  UNHCR took no action: It was reluctant to interfere in Ethiopia's "internal affairs."  That's why there were few provisions set up for the hundreds of thousands of refugees who turned up at the Sudanese border in 1984.  When the Reagan administration was eventually persuaded to provide hundreds of millions of dollars worth of emergency food relief to Ethiopia, liberals rejoiced that the assistance would wean Mr. Mengistu away from the Soviets.  They were wrong again: The aid won the U.S. absolutely no influence within the regime.  The aid did, however, save the government from collapsing, while leading to a purge of "moderates" in the Marxist Dergue and indirectly allowing for the forced resettlement and "villagization" of enemy ethnic groups, in which at least 100,000 peasants previously unaffected by the famine were reportedly killed.  Conservatives and others opined that, in terms of Ethiopia's domestic politics, the famine was caused not by drought, but by deliberate state policy.  Only when the Eritreans and Tigreans did better on the battlefield would Mr. Mengistu be forced to moderate his policies in the agricultural field.  Their liberal opponents denounced this focus on the war as mean-spirited and cynical.  "Kids are starving, who cares about the war?"  But even liberals learn.  By 1987, as it became clear that the regime's agricultural policies had gone even further toward Stalinism, the U.S. cut off virtually all aid to Ethiopia.  There wasn't a peep of protest.  Ethiopia's structural food deficit actually increased during the years of emergency aid, indicating the probable emergence of an even greater famine in the 1990s.  Conservatives can declare total victory in the debate over the causes of the Ethiopian famine: Collectivization of agriculture and the conflict between the central government and the insurgents was to blame.  Ethiopia's only hope lies in the Atlanta talks.  If they succeed, Mr. Carter will have redeemed himself for at least one of his administration's mistakes.  ---  Mr. Kaplan is the author of "Surrender or Starve: The Wars Behind the Famine" (Westview Press, 1988).  This is a truncated version of a column by Mr. Friedman in Newsweek's May 1, 1972, issue, as President Nixon was undertaking an earlier "drug war":  "The reign of tears is over.  The slums will soon be only a memory.  We will turn our prisons into factories and our jails into storehouses and corncribs.  Men will walk upright now, women will smile, and the children will laugh.  Hell will be forever for rent."  That is how Billy Sunday, the noted evangelist and leading crusader against Demon Rum, greeted the onset of Prohibition in early 1920.  We know now how tragically his hopes were doomed.  Prohibition is an attempted cure that makes matters worse -- for both the addict and the rest of us.  Consider first the addict.  Legalizing drugs might increase the number of addicts, but it is not clear that it would.  Forbidden fruit is attractive, particularly to the young.  More important, many drug addicts are deliberately made by pushers, who give likely prospects that first few doses free.  It pays the pusher to do so because, once hooked, the addict is a captive customer.  If drugs were legally available, any possible profit from such inhumane activity would disappear, since the addict could buy from the cheapest source.  Whatever happens to the number of addicts, the individual addict would clearly be far better off if drugs were legal.  Addicts are driven to associate with criminals to get the drugs, become criminals themselves to finance the habit, and risk constant danger of death and disease.  Consider next the rest of us.  The harm to us from the addiction of others arises almost wholly from the fact that drugs are illegal.  It is estimated that addicts commit one third to one half of all street crime in the U.S.  Legalize drugs, and street crime would drop dramatically.  Moreover, addicts and pushers are not the only ones corrupted.  Immense sums are at stake.  It is inevitable that some relatively low-paid police and other government officials -- and some high-paid ones as well -- will succumb to the temptation to pick up easy money.  Legalizing drugs would simultaneously reduce the amount of crime and raise the quality of law enforcement.  Can you conceive of any other measure that would accomplish so much to promote law and order?  In drugs, as in other areas, persuasion and example are likely to be far more effective than the use of force to shape others in our image.  (See related story: "An Open Letter to Bill Bennett" -- WSJ Sept. 7, 1989)  After watching President Bush and Senator Biden speak about drugs Tuesday night, it occurred to us that some future chronicler of late 20th-century political life is going to write a book simply titled "Drug."  The thesis of "Drug" will be that just as many drugs were discovered to magically cure real diseases, public officials in the U.S. came to believe that what they produced -- public policy -- was itself a kind of drug that would cure all the ills of society.  Judging from most of the commentary on Mr. Bush's proposal, the U.S. need only formulate the right mix of public-policy therapeutics (add rehab clinics, subtract prison cells) to "treat" cocaine, crack and all their attendant scourges.  Much of the reaction from Democrats to Mr. Bush's drug strategy, however, makes clear that faith in the curative powers of public policy involves more than just a can-do attitude.  It also involves the policy makers' willingness to commit "enough resources" -- two words with a familiar echo: "Raise taxes."  Certainly, the Democrats sent forth to comment on the Bush plan made their instincts and intentions plain enough.  Ways and Means Chairman Dan Rostenkowski: "Unless the President supports the tax increases that will be necessary to fight this war, the drug dealers are going to win."  John Dingell, another committee chairman: "There's nothing to prohibit us from coming up with a $2 billion tax bill and slapping it right on top of the Bennett proposals, and I'm prepared to do just that."  Rep. Charles Rangel: "We should not have to go hat in hand to pick up a lousy $2 billion."  We guess sentiments to that effect were spoken by other Democrats some 25 years ago when another policy, the War on Poverty, was announced.  Revenues were raised, public policies mixed, and all these resources committed as therapy for America's problems.  Now the war on drugs is going to take place in the same drug-ravaged neighborhoods that the War on Poverty was supposed to save.  We are not persuaded when the same people who gave these neighborhoods such "solutions" as crime-infested public-housing projects say that Mr. Bush's $7.9 billion drug strategy isn't going to do "enough."  President Bush's address to the nation in fact pushed this subject in the right direction: "We need your help.  If people you know are users, help them get off drugs.  If you are a parent, talk to your children about drugs tonight."  In short, take some personal responsibility for the problem.  "Pitch in," Mr. Bush said.  To a lot of people, talk about "pitching in" sounds Pollyannish.  But it makes a lot more intuitive sense to us than the policy message of the past, which was essentially, Sit back.  Sit back, while the politicians send in the social workers, the welfare workers, the psychologists, the educators, the mental-health clinics and the parole officers.  The most destructive effect of turning over drug abuse and other social pathologies to the policy professionals was that it let everyone else, both the users and us the witnesses to this collapse, off the hook of responsibility.  Somehow, someone else was always expected to put Humpty Dumpty back together again.  And of course they'd do it with a new "policy."  Mr. Bush is instead suggesting that each of us has to participate in restoring the personal and social integrity of our families and neighborhoods.  In a democracy, the public's elected officials surely do bear a duty to act in the face of the kind of massive assault that drugs pose.  We would emphasize one area of that responsibility that has been allowed to lose its social function: the criminal justice system.  This implies something more, however, than swift and certain punishment for life-destroying crime.  It involves restoring a truer understanding of a much-abused notion, namely justice.  The recognition of what is just or unjust dissolves in a neighborhood in which the youngest members see that the people who sell the crack that destroys their brothers and sisters are driving BMWs and the like, and are driving them before they are arrested and after they are arrested.  President Bush's drug program changes the course of federal drug policy.  It recognizes that social pathologies can be addressed only by restoring communities that have, and are willing to enforce, social standards.  In such communities, drug dealers are not folk heroes and users are not objects of sympathy.  The damage inflicted on inner cities by the "social welfare" policies of 25 years will not be repaired overnight, but at least the turn is in the right direction.  Language in the new savings-and-loan bailout law is so contradictory that thrift and banking officials can't agree on the law's intent even in its most critical change: the capital that S&Ls must maintain.  The cornerstone of the legislation, signed into law last month, is a provision forcing thrifts to increase their capital.  The reasoning was that by placing more private capital at risk, thrifts would be less likely to engage in imprudent practices that have depleted the thrift-insurance fund and will cost $166 billion over 10 years to remedy.  But in the rush to complete the emergency bill that delves into arcane areas of finance, the House and Senate versions employed a variety of banking terms open to differing interpretations, especially in areas related to capital standards.  The final law scrambles the terms in a way that has regulators at a loss to write consistent regulations.  Depending on the interpretation, the final regulations could result in 500 additional thrifts failing to meet the new standards.  "Everyone is coming up with different interpretations," said Darrell Dochow, an official of the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, which will become an arm of the Treasury in a matter of weeks.  "We're getting input from gobs of sources."  All banks and thrifts will soon be subject to regulations that link the capital a thrift must maintain to the amount of risk in its lending.  Generally, the required capital will average 8% of assets.  But aside from that, all thrifts, even those with the least risky loans, will have to meet a standard that the House called "core capital" and the Senate called the "leverage ratio."  Most industry officials believe Congress intended a 3% minimum.  But some industry attorneys are interpreting the specific language to mean 5% or 6%, according to Mr. Dochow, based on the banking industry's use of the term "leverage ratio," which the industry is still struggling to define.  In the real world, the difference between the interpretations is huge.  Nearly 900 S&Ls, with $500 billion in assets, would fail the 3% capital test; nearly 1,400 institutions, with nearly $1 trillion in assets, would fail a 6% test.  Thrift regulators are tentative because the law says regulations for thrifts may be no less stringent than those for banks.  But banking regulators won't finish their capital rules until the end of 1990; thrift regulators must complete their rules by Nov. 7.  Such confusion also has thrift executives and their advisers at a loss.  The law allows banks to acquire healthy thrifts for the first time, but buyers are leery of jumping in before the specifics are understood.  Moreover, many thrifts are considering the sale of branches, stock offerings or mergers to raise capital but are uncertain how much they need to raise.  "We only know one thing for sure right now," said Herman Sandler of Sandler O'Neill & Partners, a thrift investment-banking firm.  "The guy with 6% tangible capital is in good shape."  Even beyond capital questions, thrift officials are wrestling with ambiguities in the law that will affect billions of dollars in potential transactions and industry restructuring.  For example, once the capital standards are clarified, it's not clear what happens to thrifts that flunk the test.  Growth would be restricted for such thrifts, but how much time will they be given to meet the standards?  What would the thrift's regulatory rating be if it complies with its business plan but is out of compliance with capital standards?  The answers will affect a thrift's stock price and ability to raise cash.  "As Congress got near the end of the process, they just threw up their hands," said Danny Wall, director of the Bank Board.  Genetic Engineering  Yields Viral Insecticide  TEXAS A&M University entomologists say they have engineered a moth-killing virus.  The researchers say the virus, into which they engineered the insects' own water-regulating genes, infects only moths.  Under normal conditions, these genes produce hormones that regulate the level of water in the insects' body.  But infection with the altered virus causes overproduction of these hormones, killing the insects in about a week.  Larry Keeley, one of the researchers, says the group is experimenting with two water-regulating genes.  One governs the insects' ability to eliminate water, and the other controls water retention.  Depending upon the gene, the virus can be used either to dehydrate the insects or to "drown" them.  Mr. Keeley says gene-carrying viruses could be used to attack at least two dozen critical physiological processes in insects that are regulated by hormones.  He says viral insecticides can be formulated into liquids and sprayed on crops, targeting such pests as the cotton bollworm, corn earworm and tobacco budworm.  But, he adds, commercialization may be five to 10 years away.  Mysterious PQQ May Be  An Essential Vitamin  RESEARCHERS at the University of California at Davis have identified a possible new vitamin that may enhance development of skin, blood vessels and ligaments.  The compound known as pyrroloquinoline quinone, or PQQ, is part of a mammalian enzyme that facilitates growth of animal and human connective tissue.  The vitamin-like compound, found in major organs, also occurs in fruits and vegetables.  PQQ was discovered in 1979 as an "enzyme-helper" for a number of enzymes in bacteria.  But it hasn't been clear whether this compound is produced by an animal cell or acquired from an external source.  The new evidence suggests it may be the latter.  The researchers fed pregnant mice and rats a PQQ-deficient diet and found that 20% to 30% of their offspring lacked the compound.  Moreover, they had poor skin texture, hair loss and hunched posture.  The symptoms were corrected when PQQ was restored to their diet.  Robert Rucker, one of the researchers, says the experiment indicates that PQQ might be a vitamin, a nutrient that the body can't synthesize and for which it depends on external sources.  "What we have demonstrated is the nutritional importance of the compound," he says.  He says humans don't run the risk of PQQ deficiency because almost all foods they consume have the compound.  But understanding the compound could lead to "drugs that would be able to control the rate of wound healing," he says.  "There are situations where you want the wound to heal quickly, and some where you want to slow it down to minimize scar formation."  He says PQQ's presence in high concentrations in adrenal glands also "suggests its involvement in synthesis and regulation of adrenal hormones" and the possibility that the compound has additional applications.  Recycling Garbage  Into Garbage Bags  POTATO PEELS and other food wastes are grist for biodegradable plastic, according to scientists at Argonne National Laboratory.  Environmental problems have spurred development of plastics that disintegrate in sunlight or on exposure to moisture in soil.  A majority of such plastics have involved bonding corn starch molecules to petroleum-based polymers.  But such bonds aren't strong, and the final product generally is too weak for such uses as garbage and shopping bags.  Now, Argonne researchers say they have overcome the weakness problem by using lactic acid, derived from vegetable mass.  Researcher Robert Coleman says degradable plastic can be made entirely with lactic acid, or by combining 90% to 95% lactic acid with petroleum-based polymers.  He says researchers extracted starch from potato peels, converted it into glucose and fermented glucose into lactic acid.  The lactic acid was then condensed into polylactic acid, which produced the physical properties needed to make plastic products of various shapes.  Sensitive Home Alarm  Can 'Hear' Burglars  RENSSELAER Polytechnic Institute researchers have developed computerized home alarms that can recognize certain sounds and ignore others.  These devices, 10 inches long and four inches wide, have high-speed microprocessors and are "trained" by large computers to pick, say, the sound of breaking glass out of a jumble of interfering sounds.  Once installed, the small processors fine-tune themselves.  They store additional signals from the environment that they want to recognize or ignore, much as humans develop recognition patterns, says Michael Savic, associate professor of electrical engineering, who heads the research group.  As a result, he says, the devices learn to recognize the breaking sound of specific types of glass they're monitoring.  Programming computers to pick up well-defined sounds, such as the sound of an engine or heart beat, has been an easier task.  But it's difficult to program the computer for such fuzzy sounds as the crushing of glass or wood.  Mr. Savic says the software the group has developed has other noise-detecting applications, such as recognizing the opening of a safe, detecting types of heart disease and diagnosing the cause of a malfunctioning engine.  Continental Airlines reported flat traffic for August while Braniff Inc. said its traffic increased slightly.  Continental, a unit of Texas Air Corp., said it flew 4.1 billion revenue passenger miles, down from 4.13 billion miles flown in August 1988.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  Load factor, or percentage of seats filled, increased to 71.5% from 69.7%.  For the year to date, Continental's traffic declined 4.8% to 26.58 billion miles from 27.93 billion miles flown last year.  But load factor increased to 61.9% from 61.6%.  Braniff, a unit of BIA-COR Holdings Inc., said its traffic increased 2.2% to 465.5 million miles from 455.5 million miles a year ago.  The airline said its load factor was little changed at 68.4%, down from 69.1% last year.  Braniff's year-to-date traffic increased 3.4% to 3.24 billion revenue passenger miles from 3.13 billion last year.  Load factor declined to 64.2% from 67%.  Money Market Deposits-a 6.26%  Super-NOW Accounts-a 5.05%  Six-month Certificates-a 8.04%  One-year Certificates-a 8.05%  Thirty-month Accounts-a 7.97%  Five-Year Certificates-a 7.96%  U.S. Savings Bonds-b 7.81%  a-Average rate paid yesterday by 100 large banks and thrifts in the 10 largest metropolitan areas as compiled by Bank Rate Monitor.  b-Current annual yield.  Guaranteed minimum 6%.  Khalil J. Ghattas, president of Gatoil S.A., was extradited to West Germany to face charges of fraud in an alleged illegal oil-trading scheme, a spokesman for the Swiss Justice Ministry said.  Mr. Ghattas, 58 years old, is accused of leading an illegal oil-trading scheme that cost West Germany's Kloeckner & Co. 600 million marks ($302 million at current exchange rates).  He had been held in Geneva since his arrest in March.  The Swiss Supreme Court turned down Mr. Ghattas's appeal of the extradition request on Aug. 25.  The U.S. sales arm of Japan's Mazda Motor Corp. has set up a task force to study the feasibility of establishing a second dealer network in the U.S.  Mazda currently sells a line of imported and U.S.-made cars and trucks through 844 dealers nationwide.  Toyota Motor Corp., Nissan Motor Co. and Honda Motor Co. all have or will have separate luxury car divisions here by year-end.  Mazda executives have said in the past they were considering such a move, but yesterday's announcement was the first indication of any official action.  Richard Colliver, 50 years old, formerly senior vice president of Mazda's western area operations, was named to head the task force, which will report to Yoshi Taura, president of Mazda Motor of America, Inc.  A Mazda spokesman said there isn't any timetable for a decision on the network.  The U.S. subsidiary also announced an internal reorganization "to improve its responsiveness to Mazda dealers and customers."  As part of the reorganization, George McCabe, 48, has been promoted to group vice president of operations.  He will head a newly formed operations group with responsibility for Mazda's five U.S. regional offices, sales operations, dealer development and advertising.  Mr. McCabe was most recently deputy general manager and group vice president for sales and marketing.  BELGIUM'S gross domestic product in 1988 was 5.61 trillion Belgian francs ($135.34 billion), according to the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development.  The figure was misstated in yesterday's edition.  (See: "International: Belgium Joins 'Front Runners'" -- WSJ Sept. 6, 1989)  Wal-Mart Stores Inc. said it will acquire Cullum Cos.' share of the two companies' Hypermart USA joint venture on Oct. 1.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Wal-Mart, a giant discount retailer based in Bentonville, Ark., and Cullum, a regional grocery and drugstore chain, agreed three years ago to build the European-style hypermarket stores in the Dallas area to test the market for a mammoth grocery and discount-goods store.  The companies opened a store in Garland, Texas, in late 1987 and a store in Arlington, Texas, in mid-1988.  At the time, the companies said Cullum would bring expertise in grocery-store management and Wal-Mart would bring general-merchandise experience to the joint venture.  But last year, Cullum went private in a $380 million leveraged buy-out, and it has been trying to sell some assets to reduce its debt, which was $443 million at April 1.  Cullum also said it wants to focus its efforts on expanding its Tom Thumb grocery stores and its Page Drug outlets.  The company, which has sold about nine of its stores since the leveraged buy-out, said it will use the proceeds from its share of the joint venture to repay debt.  Wal-Mart, meanwhile, has expanded the hypermart concept on its own, opening a Hypermart USA store in Topeka, Kan., last year, and it is preparing to open a Kansas City, Mo., store in early 1990.  It also has opened Wal-Mart Supercenters, which combine a grocery store with a WalMart discount store.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Wal-Mart shares closed at $41.125, down 87.5 cents.  In your Aug. 22 editorial "The Brownshirt Image" you speculate that even "liberal opinion . . . must wonder how it came to side with aggressive prosecutors against individuals in the first place."  I do not wonder, nor am I so sanguine about the direction of what is misnamed "liberal opinion."  For every Murray Kempton or Los Angeles Times editorial that may be quoted, there is undoubtedly a "critical legal studies" advocate on a law-school faculty, or clerking for a federal judge, or working on the staff of a U.S. district attorney.  When a politician like Rudolph Giuliani, essentially more concerned with self-promotion than with philosophical principle (Lenin called such people "useful idiots"), embraces RICO, people who want to bash capitalism applaud.  It is a sad truth that although behind the Iron Curtain socialism is bereft of support except from those who depend upon it as a source of personal power, here in the capitalist world socialism has plenty of votaries.  They seize with eagerness any stick with which to beat business, be it environmentalism, labor regulation, the tax code or RICO.  In the process, they have added confusion to legitimate concerns in these areas by muddying definitions.  "White collar crime" once meant clearly quantifiable victimization of identifiable victims, as in embezzlement or the sale of fraudulent securities.  As it is now applied, this term takes in violators of nebulous regulations such as those on insider trading, compounded by RICO, and identifies as criminals people who would formerly have been considered to have been engaged in ordinary business activity.  Socialist countries had and still have laws against "economic crimes" that penalize ordinary business activity.  It is ironic that just as those countries are beginning to sense that their economic distress is the result of laws that stifle incentive and penalize ordinary business activity, and that the way to escape economic distress is to rescind such laws, we in this "free" country move further down the road both to economic distress and totalitarianism by accepting laws that define new classes of "economic crimes" and give government sweeping discretionary powers of regulation and enforcement.  Michael S. Swisher  Stillwater, Minn. ---  Your Aug. 21 editorial "Guns of August" and your "Brownshirt" editorial border on the hysterical.  Not only is your vendetta against Mr. Giuliani misplaced, the supporting evidence and sources are reason enough to doubt the strength of your position.  Imagine the peals of laughter emanating from the ACLU, Los Angeles Times and the "tabloid New York Post" as they contemplate the irony of The Wall Street Journal hustling to stand with them, especially in light of the way you have lambasted the ACLU in the past.  The example in "Guns of August" of the armed robber and embezzler each stealing $5,000 and the writer's subsequent acquiescence of "majority rule" sentencing is silly because you imply the embezzler is not a real felon.  The logic that a thief (or trader) should be rewarded (given a lesser sentence) because he or she is more sophisticated and has discovered an easier way to rob is absurd.  Those stealing money in the markets are "real felons" and if RICO is what it takes to restore the confidence of the public, then RICO it should be.  American judicial history is filled with concepts stretched and used for purposes not originally intended (most creatively by defense attorneys) and the courts have determined which of those were valid just as they are now doing with the RICO statutes.  It is naive to believe only a "few" traders or Wall Streeters have been breaking the law.  Fear of RICO may very well serve us by bringing many of the unnamed and unknown felons to their senses.  Philip T. Hart  San Rafael, Calif.  COOPER INDUSTRIES Inc. and Insilco Corp. have ended talks over the possible acquisition by Cooper of Insilco's Dual-Lite unit.  In yesterday's edition the proposed roles of Cooper and Dual-Lite were mistakenly reversed.  (See: "Cooper, Insilco End Talks" -- WSJ Sept. 6, 1989)  In regard to your Aug. 1 Marketplace article on pollution and toxic waste: I applaud your writing about the problems facing those companies found guilty of polluting and about the insurance companies' responsibilities.  What I cannot applaud is the tasteless sketch used with the article -- the 55-gallon steel drum with a skull and crossbones to represent pollution and/or toxic waste.  The steel drum has been depicted as the miscreant in almost all cases of pollution, toxic sites or hazardous waste spills.  The manufacturers of the 55-gallon steel drum are crusaders in promoting "Responsible Container Management" to the industrial users of hazardous materials.  The steel drum does not pollute or cause a hazardous-waste site requiring a Superfund cleanup.  Any container holding materials that would contribute to a Superfund site, if misused by irresponsible individuals or companies, can be erroneously shown as the cause of the problem.  We in the steel-drum industry are getting fed up with the incessant use of the steel drum as the single "generic symbol" for all industrial, toxic or hazardous waste problems.  James P. Heffernan  Astro Container Group  Cincinnati  ---  Steel drums handle regulated materials not only routinely but also in extraordinary cases.  An example is the widely used salvage overpack steel drum, which is specifically authorized by Department of Transportation rules for transporting toxic and hazardous materials.  They are widely used in site remediation programs.  Also, new steel drums actually help in the EPA-mandated attempts to minimize solid waste: The containers can be crushed and recycled as stock for the nation's steel mills or they can be reconditioned for reuse.  And, finally, they're biodegradable.  Arthur J. Schultz Jr.  President  Steel Shipping Container Institute  Union, N.J.  Low-level U.S. officials plan to meet with representatives of China's government here next week to discuss issues related to Beijing's desire to join the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade, State Department and White House trade office officials said.  The U.S. officials stressed that the meeting would be "at the working level" and wouldn't violate President Bush's ban on high-level contacts between the two governments.  Mr. Bush ordered the ban in June in the wake of the Chinese government's crackdown on pro-democracy demonstrators, in which many hundreds of people reportedly were killed.  The U.S. officials said next week's meeting would be part of a process that has been going on since mid-1986, when China began seeking membership in the GATT, the Geneva-based international organization committed to removing barriers to trade.  The time for next week's meeting hasn't been fixed, and the discussions won't be negotiations, U.S. officials said.  "Chinese officials asked to visit the U.S as part of a longer trip that would take them to Europe to discuss similar issues with the European Community," a State Department spokesman said.  "The U.S. has agreed to meet at the working level with officials from China's Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations and Trade to discuss issues related to China's interest in becoming a member of the GATT.  The meeting will provide an opportunity to exchange views but isn't in any sense a negotiation."  The Chinese delegation, which will stop here on its way to Brussels, will include Wang Shichun, a mid-level Chinese official, according to Cecilia Klein, a White House trade office official who handles matters related to countries' membership in the GATT.  Before the June massacre of pro-democracy demonstrators by the Chinese government, the political climate for Chinese accession to the GATT was very favorable, U.S. officials said.  But now that process has slowed.  While Washington formerly would conduct high-level bilateral meetings with the Chinese, the U.S. and other nations now are prepared to meet only at low levels to exchange views, said U.S. officials.  China rapidly increased its exports and economic growth in recent years.  But this year, rising inflation and economic disruptions that accompanied the repression of the pro-democracy movement have slowed economic growth.  Moreover, the Chinese government has moved to reduce what it perceives as foreign influences.  All this means it is likely to take much longer for China to integrate itself into the international economic community by joining institutions such as the GATT.  Historical reflection should give Attorney General Dick Thornburgh pause as he rushes to put the blame on the U.S. for the illegal Colombia-U.S. drug trade.  Britain exacted all sorts of reparations from China after the Opium War (1839-42).  If the British had thought it the least bit proper to blame China for having provided Her Majesty's opium growers and traders with a market, that fault would have been mentioned and redressed in the peace treaty, or certainly in the subsequent U.S.-China treaty, inasmuch as Chinese users diverted our commerce, too.  Jeffrey C. Kinkley  Associate Professor of History  St. John's University  Jamaica, N.Y.  "O giorno di gioia]" Imagine the happy thoughts of readers to see Pulitzer Prize winner Manuela Hoelterhoff's pen back on the pages of Leisure & Arts (Aug. 23).  Imagine also the horror of the couch-shaped divas and ill-costumed tenors who have winced at her on-the-mark comments during the past decade or so.  Please don't relegate Ms. Hoelterhoff to a metamorphic life as a books editor.  "Ma perche mai discendere scortesia?" ("Why be so rude and unkind?" -- as uttered by Adriana in Cilea's "Adriana Lecouvreur.") Keep her at orchestra-side.  Bobby J. Ward  Raleigh, N.C.  ---  In her Aug. 23 opera review, Ms. Hoelterhoff asks us to "think of Faust, struggling to titrate a homunculus from the alembics and retorts."  No wonder a deal was made with the devil; he could not understand a word of the contract.  Albert A. Blum  Professor  College of Business Administration and Economics  New Mexico State University  Las Cruces, N.M.  Steven Jobs finally has the computer he says the world is waiting for.  Next Inc., Mr. Jobs's closely held company, has finished the first version of its operating-system software, marking the completion of a computer it unveiled eleven months ago.  "This is going to make Next look good again," said Ron Johnson, associate vice president for computing and communications at the University of Washington.  The completion of the operating-system software, which controls the computer's basic functions, represents an important milestone for Next.  The company plans to rely heavily on sales to universities, so it was considered critical that Next have a finished product ready this month when students and faculty begin a new academic year.  Next has been shipping its computer since the spring with a test version of the operating system, but many universities have advised students and faculty not to buy the machine until the software was completed.  Completing the operating system also may quiet critics who claim the computer -- dubbed "Eventually" by some skeptics -- hadn't lived up to expectations.  Mr. Jobs, a co-founder of Apple Computer Inc., has already made good on his promise to build a computer that blends together advanced graphics, sound and other "hardware" technologies.  While these novel devices captured much attention, Mr. Jobs acknowledged that creating the computer's basic software posed a greater challenge.  Next's software has many of the same general features -- icons, pull-down menus, windows and desktop imagery -- that are credited with fueling the popularity of Apple's Macintosh computer, whose design Mr. Jobs oversaw in the early 1980s.  Next's software, however, is written in a variant of Unix, a computer language widely used by engineers and scientists.  While Unix is more powerful than DOS, the standard language for personal-computer programs, it is more complex and doesn't yet offer many applications popular with users of personal computers, such as spreadsheets and databases.  A delay of several months in completing the system software increased the pressure on Next; those who used the test versions of the software complained that the machine was slow and that it frequently "crashed" because of programming glitches.  Mr. Jobs himself even crashed the computer during a public demonstration this summer.  It is common for new software to contain errors, or "bugs," and many companies fall months behind in making the needed repairs.  When they are satisfied with the way a new piece of software works, designers "freeze" the code, designating it version 1.0.  In the future, new versions of the software may be released to repair hidden bugs or include new features.  Next plans to begin shipping its finished system software by the week of Sept. 18, a spokeswoman said.  She added, however, that Next was still running final tests on version 1.0 and could not rule out the possibility of uncovering serious bugs.  That might delay the release of the software, she said.  Next already has begun distributing the operating system to outside software developers and others.  Users say the completed version is a vast improvement over earlier test versions.  "We've been pounding on it since last week, and so far there haven't been any bugs," said Bill Edwards, a group leader at Frame Technology Corp., a San Jose software company that has developed a desktop publishing application for Next's computer.  Mr. Edwards said version 1.0 incorporates a variety of repairs to earlier test software that together substantially increase the computer's speed.  It solves, for instance, one vexing problem: When unconnected to other computers, Next's computer sometimes acted as if these connections existed, needlessly slowing the machine down.  The completion of Next's software gives the company a chance to unleash a fresh assault on its competition.  In anticipation of this, Mr. Jobs took over direct control of the company's marketing efforts in July and this fall plans to highlight his computer's capacity to produce print-shop-quality documents.  "You'll see a big emphasis on workstation publishing," said Tom Clements, national sales manager for Businessland Inc., which is selling Next computers to non-university buyers.  Mr. Clements said a new program by Frame Technologies "makes the benefits of Next really reach up out at you."  Part of the reason Next will put its emphasis on publishing is that until outsiders write more software for the machine there are few other general uses for it.  One obvious need: a spreadsheet.  Even professors, who have bought the machine for applications ranging from music to medical imaging to mathematics, "would like a spreadsheet," said the University of Washington's Mr. Johnson, "so they could work on their budgets."  Despite the lack of applications software, Businessland reports that interest in Next's computer among big computer buyers is brisk.  "Most have already taken the first step of buying evaluation units and are looking at how this will mesh with their existing computers," Mr. Clements said.  Businessland sells the Next machine for $10,000.  The price through a university is about $6,500.  Both prices include eight megabytes of internal memory, a 17-inch monitor, Motorola Inc.'s 68030 central processor and word-processing software.  A well-known analyst's warning to clients prompted a stock market sell-off even though bonds rallied modestly.  The dollar retreated after Tuesday's big gains.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average tumbled 24.89 points to 2719.79 in moderate trading after Barton M. Biggs, chief investment strategist at Morgan Stanley & Co., advised institutional clients to sell 10% of the stocks in their portfolios.  Among the stocks he targeted for selling were those of airlines, which have been bid up sharply with the takeover of NWA and the proposed takeover of UAL, parent of United Airlines.  Airline stocks retreated yesterday, bringing the Dow Jones Transportation Average down to 1508.71, off 23.30 points from its record 1532.01 set on Tuesday.  The bond market shook off worries about possible Federal Reserve tightening as investors bid long-term bond prices higher.  And the dollar, which had rallied sharply Tuesday at least in part on speculation that the U.S. economy is robust enough to prompt further Fed tightening, retreated yesterday amidst modest intervention and some jawboning by Japanese officials.  Although Mr. Biggs's sell recommendations apparently touched off some institutional selling as well as several rounds of stock index arbitrage selling yesterday, other analysts argued that the retreat wasn't justified.  "There's nothing fundamentally wrong with the market," said Peter Canelo, chief portfolio strategist at Bear, Stearns & Co.  "The stock market's move was just a bad case of the jitters.  We had one in July that lasted all of a week and a half and this probably won't be any more serious than that."  Mr. Canelo said the economic environment remains favorable for stocks.  "We've got a strong dollar, the bond market has probably bottomed out after a 5% correction in the past month and a half, and short-term interest rates are stable," he said.  "From an equity point of view, that's all just fine."  Some analysts were cheered that stock prices bounced back somewhat from their lows of the day.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average was off about 40 points around noon.  And they noted that trading volume was only moderate, not representative of any panic selling.  Action was muted in the bond market.  With little in the way of economic data due out this week, traders said it will likely be next week before there's any reason for the pace to speed up.  That's when the government reports on the August producer-price index, a key measure of inflation.  But if the inflation index shows only modest wholesale price increases, as it has in the past few months, it probably will have little effect on the market.  Currency traders said the dollar's retreat after its sharp rally Tuesday was caused by a combination of profit taking as well as threats from Japanese officials warning against a continued rise in the dollar.  A Japanese official was quoted as saying the Bank of Japan is prepared "to do anything anytime" when necessary to achieve stability in the exchange markets.  In major market activity:  Stock prices fell in moderate trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 161.8 million shares.  Declining issues on the Big Board were ahead of gainers 1,091 to 433.  Bond prices gained.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year issue gained more than one-quarter of a point, or more than $2.50 for each $1,000 of face amount.  The yield on the issue slipped to 8.10%.  The dollar retreated.  In late New York trading the currency was quoted at 1.9755 marks and 146.15 yen compared to 1.9883 marks and 146.84 yen late Tuesday.  In regard to Julie Salamon's Aug. 10 review of "The Abyss" ("Deep Boat: Drowning in B-Movie Cliches"): While I do usually read and value your reviews, I must say I was disappointed in Ms. Salamon's views on "The Abyss," especially in the Journal, which should reflect the film's technical and pro-scientific accomplishments, which are so supportive of the national need to encourage science literacy in young people.  The film creates with astonishing verisimilitude an underwater environment with real physical and physiological challenges.  It's practically a course in underwater physiology.  The characters do not simply act out of the needs of their narcissistic identities or settle all interactions by greater might, bashing or blowing up the adversary.  In this film the players are consistently asked to think and solve problems that have trapped them.  There is a real cooperation and bonding and professionalism that is assumed despite the "woman on a tin can" quips.  Even courage is assumed, and the film goes beyond the usual sacrifice situation in the "I'll drown" sequence.  Granted the dialogue was not deathless prose -- "keep your pantyhose on" doubtless having now earned a permanent place in the lexicon -- but the film's physical intelligence and scientific planning are at a high level.  It's a superb film for adolescents, and science fiction is an adolescent genre.  I took two 16-year-old boys, who both gave it a full "wow" afterward and were determined to see it again to get every detail down; both longed for real-life exploration in submersibles afterward.  David V. Forrest M.D.  Associate Professor  of Clinical Psychiatry  Columbia University  College of Physicians and Surgeons  New York  Craig Blanchette, macho athlete and 1988 Olympic bronze medalist, is one of the latest stars of Nike's "Just do it" ad campaign.  In gritty television commercials, he pumps iron, shoots baskets, and talks tough about working out.  Not until the last scene does the camera pull back to show that Mr. Blanchette is missing both legs.  He won his medal in the exhibition sport of wheelchair racing, in which he holds two world records.  Nike tapped Mr. Blanchette for the campaign because "he's a great athlete, which ties in with our usual strategy . . . and he's a really motivating guy to be around," says Thomas Clarke, Nike's vice president of marketing.  "The fact that he was handicapped was secondary."  But the fact is, the ad industry is becoming increasingly enchanted with the disabled -- and is bringing token handicapped actors into ads in much the same way it once gingerly introduced black faces.  Nike will pour some 20% of its estimated $20 million to $25 million fall ad budget into the Blanchette commercial alone.  The National Organization on Disability, a nonprofit group whose vice chairman is former Reagan press secretary James Brady, estimates that about 30 other advertisers recently have featured disabled people in their general ad campaigns.  Levi Strauss was one of the first, showing a blue jeans-clad paraplegic.  More recently, McDonald's ads have featured deaf teenagers and a paraplegic girl; Apple computer has aired a commercial showing disabled people using its computers; and International Business Machines, Citicorp, Du Pont and AT&T, among others, have featured disabled people in their ads.  In Hollywood, Media Access Office Inc., which acts as a liason between the disabled and the California entertainment business, says demand for handicapped actors -- although never strong -- is on the rise.  "It's really only come into its own this last year or two," says Clifford Crase, editor and publisher of Sports 'n Spokes and Paraplegia News magazines in Phoenix, Ariz.  But Mr. Crase, a paraplegic himself, hastens to add: "I think there's a lot of room for improvement.  More companies could at least consider using disabled people" in their ads.  If it sounds like that crass bastion of capitalism, Madison Avenue, is developing a social conscience, think again.  Times are tough for everyone -- from car salesmen to shampoo hawkers -- and marketers are catching on that there are about 37 million disabled people in the country.  Their combined spending power, estimates the National Multiple Sclerosis Society, is a not-to-be-sneezed-at $40 billion.  "They eat.  They use toothpaste.  They raise children.  They don't want to be ignored," says Arney Rosenblat, the society's public affairs director.  The group recently spearheaded a letter-writing campaign to 500 consumer companies to remind them that the disabled are "out there and you should take them into account."  It also just created a public service TV ad campaign featuring, among others, a quadriplegic marine biologist and a paraplegic model.  McDonald's, which several groups credit for using handicapped actors realistically in commercials, is among those taking a pragmatic approach.  "Our commercials are slice-of-life, and people who are physically or mentally challenged are part of life," a spokesman says.  "All those folks are our customers, and we're happy to have them."  Still, ads with handicapped people remain relatively few and far between.  And most of them use robust-looking types in wheelchairs, even though people in wheelchairs are only a fraction of the disabled.  "It would be nice to have a severely disabled person depicted instead of your superjock 'crip,'" says David Lewis, a quadriplegic who is community relations coordinator for the Center for Independent Living, a nonprofit support group for the disabled based in Berkeley, Calif.  "Usually disabled people in commercials look like able-bodied people in wheelchairs."  "At least it's happening," Mr. Lewis adds.  "That's the way you make it in America as a minority.  If you start to be integrated in commercials, it means you're moving in the right direction."  High-technology companies are among the most agressive in featuring disabled actors in ads because their products are among the most useful for handicapped people.  A Pacific Telesis commercial suggests the future of video conferencing by showing a man in a wheelchair examining museum paintings via video.  An Apple computer commercial also makes much of paraplegics using computers.  But advertisers aren't exactly leading the pack in bringing the disabled into mainstream popular culture -- they are following the lead of TV shows.  Michael Landon's long-running series "Highway to Heaven" regularly used disabled actors, and "LA Law" has a retarded character.  This season, the new ABC series, "Life Goes On," stars a young actor with Down's syndrome.  Disabled groups are also hopeful that the Americans with Disabilities Act now being considered by Congress will be passed; the bill would largely ban discrimination against the disabled by the private sector.  If the bill passes -- and if TV shows featuring disabled actors score high ratings -- more commercials starring the disabled are likely to follow.  "Organizations aren't looking at this from a kindness issue," says Judy Brotman, special assistant to the President's Committee on Employment of People with Disabilities, an independent federal agency.  "Rather, it's just good business."  ---  Angotti, Thomas Stake  Angotti, Thomas, Hedge, a small New York ad agency, said it agreed in principle to buy back a minority stake in it held by Omnicom Group.  Terms weren't disclosed.  But executives familiar with both agencies said Omnicom owns 25% of Angotti Thomas, and that Angotti Thomas will pay less than $1 million to buy those shares back.  Omnicom owns the Angotti Thomas stake as a result of its recent purchase of Boase Massimi Pollitt, which held the 25% stake in Angotti Thomas as well as a 37.5% stake in San Francisco's Goodby, Berlin & Silverstein.  Boase Massimi also owned all of Ammirati & Puris, the medium-sized agency known for its glossy BMW and Club Med advertising.  Goodby Berlin is currently in discussions with Omnicom about buying back part or all of its stake.  Meanwhile, Omnicom's discussions with Ammirati & Puris, which wants badly to buy itself back because of client conflicts, have stalled.  Industry executives said the two sides remain far apart on price.  Martin Puris said: "It's going more slowly than I had hoped it would go.  We hope to have the thing completed by the end of September."  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   LOWE GROUP: Lowe Howard-Spink & Bell PLC said it agreed to sell five of six businesses within its Lowe Bell Communications unit to a group of Lowe Bell senior managers for #7.6 million ($11.7 million).  Lowe Howard-Spink & Bell, which said it is changing its name to Lowe Group PLC, will pay #1 million in return for a 24.5% stake in Lowe Bell's newly formed holding company.  RESIGNATION: Ed Eskandarian, 52 years old, resigned from Della Femina McNamee WCRS, Boston.  Mr. Eskandarian was edged out as the top executive when his agency, HBM/Creamer, merged with Della Femina.  Mr. Eskandarian, who said he didn't have any immediate plans, most recently was chairman and chief executive of the diversified communications group of WCRS North America.  NEW ACCOUNT: Playtex Inc., Stamford, Conn., named Saatchi & Saatchi's Backer Spielvogel Bates unit, New York, agency of record for its Jhirmack hair care products account.  According to Leading National Advertisers, Playtex spent $12.6 million promoting Jhirmack in 1988.  The account had previously been handled by Rosenfeld, Sirowitz, Humphrey & Strauss, New York.  Getting fired as Avis Inc.'s vice president for sales wasn't what irked Robert Ohanian.  It was the way he was treated: No severance pay, not even his promised pension.  So like a growing number of white-collar executives booted from their jobs, Mr. Ohanian didn't just get mad.  He got even.  In 1985, a federal jury in New York found Avis had breached a verbal agreement securing Mr. Ohanian's job.  When the appeals were over, Mr. Ohanian and his lawyer walked away with $365,000.  "The money was terrific, but I wanted to clear my name," says Mr. Ohanian, now executive vice president of Ask Mr. Foster Travel Agency in New York.  Over the past decade, courts nationwide have become increasingly receptive to wrongful discharge claims.  And many fired managers and executives are no longer satisfied with winning only back pay and promised bonuses.  Many now press for punitive damages as well.  "White-collar workers have always been victims of wrongful discharge," says Paul Tobias, founder and chairman of the Plaintiff Employment Lawyers Association in Cincinnati.  The difference now is the eagerness of former managers to sue and a new willingness by courts in many states to apply traditional causes of action -- like defamation, fraud, intentional infliction of emotional distress and invasion of privacy -- in the area of employment law.  As a result, we have "a new era of employer-employee relationships," says Andrew M. Kramer, a management labor lawyer in Washington, D.C. Companies must rely more on lawyers in hiring and firing decisions.  Some are offering fired employees handsome severance packages in return for written releases from future liability; others hope to avoid litigation by setting up internal arbitration programs.  For some companies, there may be some relief in sight.  In January, the California Supreme Court ruled that a worker fired without just cause can usually sue for reinstatement and back pay but not punitive damages.  And in July, the Montana Supreme Court upheld a new state law that protects workers against arbitrary dismissal while limiting the damages they can win.  But no one expects the surge of wrongful discharge suits to abate soon.  Some two million workers who aren't covered by employment contracts or labor pacts are fired annually, and that doesn't include large-scale layoffs.  Jack Steiber, a professor of law at Michigan State University, estimates that 150,000 of these workers are fired without just cause.  More than 25,000 wrongful discharge cases are pending in state and federal courts, according to a study for the Bureau of National Affairs, a private information service, that was released in February.  The study estimates that wrongful discharge cases more than doubled between 1982 and 1987.  And the law firm of Jackson, Lewis, Schnitzler & Krupman found that half of 1,014 industrial-relations executives said in a survey that terminating an employee in the past year resulted in some form of legal action.  "All kinds of white-collar workers are filing these suits, whether they're making $30,000 or $300,000 a year," says James N. Dertouzos, a senior economist with Rand Corp.'s Institute for Civil Justice.  Money is a big reason.  With high salaries, lucrative stock options, hefty bonus plans and retirement packages on the line, white-collar workers have more to lose by being fired and more resources with which to pay lawyers.  A Rand study released last year surveyed 120 wrongful discharge cases that went to trial in California between 1980 and 1986.  The average salary of fired employees was $36,254.  Plaintiffs won 67.5% of their cases and were awarded an average of $646,855.  About 40% of the awards were for punitive damages.  An even bigger factor in the increase of cases is the growing willingness of courts to chip away at the old notion that companies can fire employees arbitrarily -- the so-called "employment at will" doctrine.  Among the exceptions that are now generally recognized: instances when employees have received assurances, sometimes in employee handbooks, that they will be fired only for "just cause"; cases in which employers have acted in particularly bad faith; and situations where employees have been fired for performing a public duty, such as serving on a jury or refusing to break the law.  And now courts in many states -- notably California, Illinois, Massachusetts, Michigan, Minnesota and New York -- have gone further by permitting punitive damages in certain instances.  Take the case of Ian J. Dowie.  The former office products executive for IBM-Canada was lured to Exxon in 1979 with promises of a division presidency, an eventual $100,000-a-year salary, hefty bonuses and a lucrative profit-sharing plan.  When none of the promises were honored and Mr. Dowie complained, he was fired in February 1983.  He subsequently sued for breach of contract and fraud under New York law, and in July 1986 a federal jury awarded him $10.1 million in damages, $9 million of which was to punish Exxon. (Later, after Exxon appealed, the case was settled out of court, but the parties agreed not to disclose the terms.)  John O'Brien, a former area supervisor at Papa Gino's of America Inc., sued when he was fired in 1982 after being questioned about drug use.  He argued that his privacy had been invaded because he was questioned with a lie detector about his use of drugs before he started working at the fast-food chain.  A jury agreed and awarded him $448,200 in compensatory and punitive damages, and an appeals court upheld the award three years ago.  The most lucrative damage awards in wrongful discharge cases have been for defamation, perhaps because judges in most states are already familiar with it as a cause of action in other kinds of cases.  According to the Bureau of National Affairs study, plaintiffs recovered damages in 78.9% of all defamation claims filed against former employers.  After insurance executive Larry W. Buck was fired from his $80,000-a-year job with Frank B. Hall & Co. in Houston, he found no one would consider him for another job.  He became suspicious and hired a private detective to find out what his former associates were saying about him.  "A classical sociopath . . . a zero," Mr. Buck's former office manager told the detective.  "A real Jekyll and Hyde personality."  The manager made similar remarks to at least one prospective employer.  Mr. Buck sued for defamation, on top of breach of contract, and won $1.9 million in punitive and compensatory damages, a decision an appeals court upheld in 1984.  In some states, courts have ruled against employers that made defamatory statements to employees they were firing.  When six claims approvers for Equitable Life Assurance Society of the U.S. refused company demands to change their expense accounts after a business trip, they were fired for "gross insubordination."  Equitable never repeated the phrase to anyone; the six former employees did.  They contended that they had no choice when questioned by prospective employers about why they had left.  In 1986, the Minnesota Supreme Court agreed, and appeals courts in Michigan and California have made similar rulings.  Because of the risks, many companies no longer give meaningful evaluations of former employees to outsiders.  But Georgia-Pacific Corp. still ran into trouble.  When it fired William Benassi, a former general manager in Portland, Ore., several years ago, his successor gathered the staff together to explain why.  Among the reasons cited was drinking on a business trip, charges that Mr. Benassi successfully refuted when he sued Georgia-Pacific for defamation and won $350,000 in damages.  Mr. Kramer, the management labor lawyer, recommends that employers protect themselves against suits by avoiding promises that can be construed as a contract.  He adds that employee handbooks should maintain the company's right to fire employees at will.  A worker suspected of lying shouldn't be accused of dishonesty, says Gloria J. Shanor, senior counsel for labor and employment at Georgia-Pacific.  Rather, she says, the company should indicate it has lost confidence in the employee's credibility.  "There are ways to get the point across without stepping into a defamation cow pie," she adds.  @ ---  @ Behind the Growth in Wrongful Discharge Suits  @ Breaking Down Those Who Sue...  @ By Race  @ White ....................................... ... 89.3%  @ Non-White ...................................... 10.7%  @ By Sex  @ Male ....................................... .... 68.6%  @ Female ....................................... .. 31.4%  @ By Job  @ Executive ...................................... 13.6%  @ Middle  @ Management ..................................... 39.8%  @ Other ....................................... ... 46.6%  @ ...And the Verdicts  @ Plaintiff verdicts: 67.5%  @ Defendant verdicts: 32.5%  @ Average compensation award: $388,500  @ (81 cases)  @ Average punitive awared: $523,170  @ (40 cases)  @ Note: The data are from a 1988 Rand Corp. Study that examined jury verdicts in 120 wrongful-discharge cases in California between 1980 and the first quarter of 1986.  @ Source: Rand Corp. Institute of Civil Justice  Wednesday, September 6, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9 1/2% high, 8 1/4% low, 8 1/2% near closing bid, 8 3/4% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.80% 27 to 44 days; 8.75% 45 to 59 days; 8.625% 60 to 89 days; 8.375% 90 to 119 days; 8.25% 120 to 149 days; 8.125% 150 to 179 days; 7.75% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.88% 30 days; 8.80% 60 days; 8.73% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.29% one month; 8.30% two months; 8.30% three months; 8.28% six months; 8.28% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.85% one month; 8.80% three months; 8.80% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.75% 30 days; 8.65% 60 days; 8.55% 90 days; 8.50% 120 days; 8.43% 150 days; 8.37% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 9% to 8 7/8% two months; 9% to 8 7/8% three months; 9% to 8 7/8% four months; 9% to 8 7/8% five months; 9% to 8 7/8% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 9% one month; 9% three months; 9% six months; 8 15/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Tuesday, September 5, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.88% 13 weeks; 7.87% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 10.16%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.25%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 10.09%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 9.10%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.07%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Charles Grantham, director of the National Basketball Association players' union, began to have second thoughts about drug testing the day Micheal Ray Richardson was kicked out of the game.  Mr. Richardson knew that if he flunked one more urine test, he would be banished from the NBA for at least two years.  Yet even with a $3 million contract with the New Jersey Nets on the line, Mr. Richardson tested positive for cocaine in 1986.  "Richardson couldn't say no for $3 million," says Mr. Grantham, who was the player's agent at the time.  "If testing is a disincentive, then on its face it didn't serve the purpose." (Mr.  Richardson has since recovered and been certified as clean by the NBA; he is playing in Europe.)  For all the recent debate over drug testing and all the enthusiasm among employers, there is only a trickle of evidence that it deters drug use.  In cases where testing seems to have benefits, it's difficult to factor out all the other anti-drug forces also at work.  Some employers consider drug testing useful, if only as a way to avoid hiring addicts.  And in unusual environments -- such as the military or the parole system -- testing seems to deter drug use.  But it's far less clear whether the broad use of drug testing would reduce drug use nationally -- or whether it would simply make addicts unemployable.  The National Institute on Drug Abuse says it knows of no studies that have examined the deterrent effect of random, surprise drug testing, the most controversial kind.  Mark Rothstein, a drug-testing specialist at the University of Houston Law School, says, "There's very little hard data that drug testing is effective -- that it has resulted in savings in terms of reducing accidents, absenteeism or health-care expenditures."  The American Society for Clinical Pharmacology said in a position paper last year that "adequate scientific studies of the relationship among safety, productivity, drugs of abuse and testing of urine aren't available or haven't been done."  Despite the uncertainty, public and private employers are embracing testing.  A Labor Department survey last year found that one-fifth of all private-sector employees work for a company that conducts drug testing of some sort.  President Bush's new anti-drug strategy calls for testing federal employees and encourages other employers to test "where appropriate."  Federal contractors may be compelled to adopt testing policies or risk losing their government contracts.  As testing takes on a bigger role in the workplace, at least some questions are getting resolved.  The courts are clarifying the complex legal issues.  The care with which tests are conducted is improving, although eating a poppy-seed bakery roll can still sometimes cause a subject to test positive for heroin.  The federal government has also begun a process to certify testing laboratories that it finds reliable.  But the weighing of costs and benefits is only beginning.  The costs can add up: A simple screening test costs $17 to $25, and confirming a positive test with more accurate equipment -- a step recommended by most specialists -- costs an additional $50 to $75.  Though evidence of benefits remains sketchy, many employers remain convinced of the merits of drug testing -- at least as part of a broader corporate strategy.  International Business Machines Corp., cited as a model in the Bush drug plan, has been testing all applicants since 1984.  In 1986, it set a policy of testing employees with "unexplained changes in behavior on the job" if company doctors so recommended.  Those who test positive must undergo treatment to keep their jobs and must agree to frequent tests when they return to work.  "We do think it works.  We probably have screened out some problems," says Philip Shellhaus, an IBM program manager.  But IBM can't prove that the program has actually discouraged drug use.  "Can we say we have {fewer} employees showing up with drug problems?"  Mr. Shellhaus asks.  "We don't have the statistics to back that up."  The deterrent effect of drug testing may be strongest in some unusual environments, such as the parole system and the military.  Use of drugs among uniformed military personnel plunged after the Pentagon in 1981 began vigorously enforcing its "zero tolerance" policy and conducting surprise tests of all ranks.  In anonymous surveys, the percentage of personnel saying they had recently used drugs fell to 4.8% last year from 19% in 1982 and 27.6% in 1980.  Three-quarters of the more than 18,000 troops responding to the latest survey said urine testing reduces drug use in the military.  "I don't know how much {of the decline} is due to leadership as opposed to the threat of punishment from random drug testing," says Stephen Duncan, an assistant secretary of defense who oversees the Pentagon anti-drug effort.  But, he adds, "our military commanders say our random-urinalysis testing is the single most important factor."  The military experience, however, is hard to translate to the civilian sector.  The military has sure and swift penalties for drug use, and more control over its personnel than most other employers.  "The deterrent effect is just incredible in that unaddicted, socially compliant group," says Douglas Anglin, a psychologist at the University of California at Los Angeles.  "It isn't going to have the same effect in inner cities."  Some employers notice fewer accidents and other favorable signs after they begin testing, and these cases are cited by testing advocates.  But the employers themselves say they aren't sure how important the tests are.  After Southern Pacific Transportation Co. began post-accident testing in 1984, the company's rate of railroad accidents blamed on human failure dropped to 8.1 for every million miles in 1985 from 22.2 in 1983; it since has fallen to 2.2.  "We think testing was clearly a part of it, but it's hard to prove," says spokesman Andrew Anderson.  "It went along with other safety programs."  Evidence is stronger that companies benefit by not hiring drug users in the first place, though it isn't clear whether pre-employment testing helps them achieve this goal.  In the largest reported study of its kind, the U.S. Postal Service took urine samples from 5,465 job applicants, although it didn't use the results in making hiring decisions and didn't tell local managers of the findings.  When in-house psychologist Jacques Normand checked six months to a year later, workers who had tested positive turned out to be absent 41% more often and to be fired 38% more often.  Overall turnover, however, was the same because non-users were more likely to quit voluntarily than users.  Even after adjusting for differences of age, sex and race, Mr. Normand found that pre-employment drug testing proved a significant predictor of an employee's reliability.  The Postal Service is now implementing pre-employment drug tests nationwide.  A hospital in Georgia, however, stopped pre-employment drug testing after a small study it sponsored found no significant link between test results and job performance.  "A couple of years later, it started {testing} again," says David Parish, a professor at Mercer University Medical School in Atlanta who conducted the recently published study but agreed not to name the hospital.  "They felt they had to do their part in the war against drug use," he says.  Employers that test applicants are finding that fewer test positive than in the recent past.  For example, only 2% of Chevron Corp.'s applicants test positive today; a few years ago, before it required testing, a study of applicants found that one in three job seekers tested anonymously produced a positive result.  But the significance of this trend isn't clear.  It may simply prove that applicants who use drugs casually have figured out that they need only abstain for a couple of weeks to pass the tests.  "Some employers," says Mark DiBernardo, director of labor law at the U.S. Chamber of Commerce, "refer to them as IQ tests."  ---  @ Testing Job Applicants  @ TOTAL  @ TESTED PCT.  @ INDUSTRY (in thousands) POSITIVE  @ TOTAL 3,913.7 11.9%  @ Mining 72.0 12.7  @ Construction 326.6 11.9  @ Manufacturing  @ Durable goods 767.6 11.2  @ Nondurable goods 1,106.5 12.7  @ Transportation 451.8 9.9  @ Communications,  @ utilities 143.5 5.5  @ Wholesale trade 260.5 17.4  @ Retail trade 169.7 24.4  @ Finance, insurance  @ and real estate 308.4 6.7  @ Other services 306.2 9.9  @ Source: Bureau of Labor Statistics  Minnesota Mining & Manufacturing Co., which has gone through a half-dozen corporate slogans in recent years, is planning a new campaign built around the company's reputation for innovation.  For some reason, the "I" word hasn't been in 3M's advertising lexicon until now, despite the fact that Fortune magazine's compilation of most-admired companies lists 3M third under "most innovative" (after Merck & Co. and Rubbermaid Inc.).  Business Week recently dubbed 3M employees, many of whom are encouraged to spend 15% of their time thinking up new product ideas, "Masters of Innovation."  But 3M doesn't plan to keep quiet about its inventiveness for long.  The $10-billion company will soon launch a major corporate image campaign with the slogan "Innovation working for you."  The St. Paul, Minn., company won't say how much money will support that umbrella effort, but acknowledges it "will be more than anything that we've spent in the past."  The campaign is part of what 3M calls "an integrated corporate-awareness program" that likely will include support of the next Olympic Games; 3M was a major sponsor of the 1988 Olympics.  The "innovation" campaign will begin the week of Oct. 9, with commercials running on the CBS and ABC nightly television news, with supplementary ads in business and newsweekly magazines.  Cable news show and spot buys in 19 major TV markets also are planned.  Ad dollars will be split about 70-30 between broadcast and print as the company tries to reach employed adults 25 to 54, especially "professional managerial types."  A lot of them know that the Post-it notes on their desk come from 3M, but don't realize that the company makes more than 50,000 other products as well, 3M admits.  "They know we do a lot of things and we do them well," but "they often have difficulty explaining what it is that we're good at," says Charles Eldridge, staff vice president for corporate marketing services.  "The intent is not to try to sell products or make people familiar with the complete product line.  The intent is to say, we are an extremely innovative company."  If 3M has had trouble communicating that idea it hasn't been for lack of trying.  Over the past quarter century it has invented a half-dozen catch phrases, ranging from "What will they think of next" to "The kind of climate that grows good products" to "One thing leads to another."  The latest revision is justified because the marketplace has changed, the company says.  "People aren't interested any more in how you do things.  They want to know what's in it for them," says Elizabeth McMahon, 3M's manager of corporate marketing communication.  But frequent changes carry risks, some experts say.  "Any strategy you stick with has a better chance of sticking in the public's mind," contends Jerry C. Welsh, a former American Express Co. marketing man who heads his own consulting firm.  That's partly why General Electric Co. has stayed with "We bring good things to life" for a decade, and Du Pont Co. has used "Better things for better living" since 1936. (DuPont later dropped the words "through chemistry" as too confining.)  At 6 a.m., when many retirees awake for a day of fishing, James Archer pulls on his yellow waders and pushes a tattered straw hat down over his wiry black hair.  He drives a dozen miles to a state park and pays $3 to enter.  Mr. Archer doesn't fish, though.  He digs for diamonds, along with a dozen or so other regular prospectors and a stream of tourists, in a 30-acre field the state plows for amateur diggers.  Crater of Diamonds State Park, in the rolling hills of southwest Arkansas, is the only place in the U.S. where significant numbers of the stones have been found.  Mr. Archer spends eight to 10 hours in the field every day.  "You know how some people get hooked on drugs?" he says.  "This thing got me hooked."  The 64-year-old former lumberman digs pails of dirt from deep holes, carries them with a handmade yoke to a big pan of water, washes out the clay and soil and sorts through the stones for diamonds.  Usually, in a week he will find two or three diamonds, averaging about 0.25 carat each.  Like the other regular diggers, Mr. Archer sells his diamonds to tourists and local jewelers for $200 to $1,000 a carat, depending on the size and color of the stones.  He has found about 200 carats, and although he won't say how much money he has earned, it hasn't been much for 13 years of backbreaking labor.  But money isn't why he comes to the park.  "It's a hobby," he says.  "If I stayed at home, I'd be looking at the walls."  That may happen soon.  With diamond prices rising, mining companies have set their sights on the park.  They have obtained permission to test it for commercial potential, and this drilling is expected to begin early next year.  The prospect of towering excavating equipment and earth movers replacing picks and shovels has the diggers upset, environmentalists furious and local businesses that depend on the park's modest draw worried.  "They ought to leave it alone.  There's no other place in the world like it," says Chester Guest, who spends all his vacations digging for diamonds at the park.  "We'd like to see it here for Sonja's kids," he says, pointing to his 13-year-old daughter.  Mining companies, however, maintain that the park isn't living up to its economic potential.  Attendance has dropped over the past few years, and the state doesn't reap any tax dollars from the miners' meager discoveries.  A commercial mine would provide a windfall of tax revenue and transform the park into a tourist mecca, claims Carrick Patterson, a spokesman for Arkansas Diamond Development Corp., one of several interested companies.  "We believe people would flock to this thing," he says.  Such promises of prosperity are seductive here in Pike County, one of the poorest regions in America.  With per capita income in the county 67% of the national average, the prospect of new jobs and more tourist dollars has provided the mining companies with a powerful argument.  The main existing local industries -- timber harvesting and poultry processing -- pay lower wages than the diamond companies promise.  "This is a place where husband and wife can both work and starve at the same time," says James A. O'Neal Jr., a local justice of the peace and an X-ray technician at the county hospital.  The diamond mine "would be a way out of poverty for a number of people," he believes.  But many local businesses that depend on tourism aren't convinced.  They argue that a commercial mine might get played out in a few years.  And they fear that many tourists who trek here for the tantalizing prospect of finding a diamond in the field will take their vacations elsewhere.  As for the notion that tourists would delight at the sight of giant scoops and bulldozers tearing up the park, Jane Terrell, owner of the local Queen of Diamonds Inn, says that makes about as much sense as getting a thrill out of watching a professional gambler placing bets at the race track.  "It just can't match the experience of doing it yourself," she says.  Environmentalists, meanwhile, worry that the approval of testing here indicates other parks aren't safe from conversion to commercial use.  Regional officials of the U.S. Interior Department had prohibited commercial testing because federal funds were used to develop the park; as a condition for obtaining the funds, the state had promised not to convert it to other uses.  But department officials in Washington reversed that decision after a visit from some Arkansas Diamond lobbyists.  Ironically, the controversy over mining has brought 25% more visitors to the park this summer, says Jim Cannon, superintendent.  About 80,000 tourists are expected this year.  But if history is any guide, only about 1,000 diamonds will be found, and more than half of those will be unearthed by the handful of regular diggers like Mr. Archer.  The odds don't bother Joan Derryberry, a Tyler, Texas, teacher who pounds at the clay with a spare-tire tool, near a sign marking the spot where another Texan found a 16-carat diamond in 1975.  "I don't think people find that many diamonds here," she says.  "It's just for fun."  Other tourists stop to ask a mud-splattered Mr. Archer endless questions.  He obligingly digs in a small pouch at his waist and pulls out about a dozen plastic boxes, each holding a small diamond nestled on cotton.  He spreads the treasures out on his palm and knotted fingers.  The diamonds, rounded and ranging in color from white to dark bronze, don't look like the cut and polished gems that rest regally in engagement rings.  Still, the tiny stones shine with the unmistakable glow of crystallized carbon, and they elicit oohs and ahs from the children.  Across the field, Raymond Schall holds court with a group of youngsters.  Dressed in a pink striped shirt and green herringbone pants, the lanky 84-year-old leans on a cane he made from an old pool cue.  He pulls a picture out of his pocket, his clear eyes shining with pride.  It shows his biggest find, a 6.07-carat diamond he found in 1981 and sold for $15,000.  He was a digger then, but he found this diamond lying on the ground.  He fell on it, speechless in his excitement, clutching it in his fist.  His fellow diggers at first feared Mr. Schall had suffered a heart attack.  Now, too old to dig anymore, he walks the field daily, knocking clods of dirt over with his cane, occasionally finding a small diamond.  "If I don't find a diamond in an hour or two, I give up," he says.  Mr. Archer muses over his friend's fate.  "What else would he do if he didn't come out here?  He'd be crazy.  He'd fall over dead."  Under the trees at the far end of the field, Mr. Guest, a 47-year-old Tulsa sheetmetal shop owner, has set up washing apparatus he made for his twice-yearly vacation diamond dig.  The washing is hard work -- sweaty, muddy and buggy.  For all that, the Guests have found about 45 diamonds in 10 years.  They say they come to get away from the telephone.  Sonja, wise for her 13 years, has another theory: "It's a place where grown-ups can be little kids again and play in the dirt."  Not all the diggers are so friendly.  Al Scifres, a regular for three years, doesn't talk to tourists.  Even the other regular diggers find him a little scary.  As mining-company employees escort a visitor through the field, Mr. Scifres yells at them.  If commercial mining starts, he pledges, he will die and come back as a ghost.  "All your machinery will be destroyed and you won't know who did it," he threatens, as tourists give him a wide berth.  The state and federal crackdown on penny-stock fraud is starting to yield results.  Regulators say that as their files of enforcement actions and investigations continue to thicken, the ranks of firms that deal in the high-risk, low-priced securities are thinning.  Already, the heat has become so intense that a number of firms are seeking less-hostile environs.  In a report prepared for a congressional hearing today, the North American Securities Administrators Association says that the number of state penny-stock enforcement actions ballooned 97% from 1987 to 1988; the number of closed investigations, resulting in fines, suspensions or revoked licenses of penny-stock brokers, jumped 51% during that time.  "Americans are being nickel-and-dimed by penny-stock fraud, and it's starting to add up to real money," John C. Baldwin, president of the securities regulators' group, said in an interview.  In the report, the group says penny-stock swindles cost investors at least $2 billion a year and are the "No. 1 threat" to small investors in the U.S.  Penny-stock fraud may be a favorite whipping boy of regulators now, but it certainly isn't a new problem.  By the securities administrators' own admission, abuse of penny stocks dates back to the 1940s, "when worthless shares in uranium mine stocks were bought and sold over the counter of a Salt Lake City coffee shop."  Penny stocks, which are thinly traded and usually sell for less than a dollar, are still traded over the counter, but the industry has grown.  Today, there are an estimated 325 firms based in 29 states operating in the $10 billion penny-stock market, the state securities chiefs say.  That's up sharply from 55 in less than six locales five years ago.  Many of the 13,000 issues that trade on the OTC market, but outside the computerized Nasdaq system, are penny stocks.  To be sure, many of the stocks are issued by legitimate companies and aren't vehicles for stock manipulation.  Price quotes for the low-priced issues appear in the "pink sheets" published daily by the National Quotation Bureau.  National regulatory efforts to curb abuses in the penny-stock market heated up last year.  The formation in June 1988 of the Florida Penny Stock Task Force -- which includes state regulators, the Securities and Exchange Commission, the National Association of Securities Dealers, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, federal prosecutors and the Internal Revenue Service -- is one example of the heightened attention accorded the problem by federal authorities.  With 31 penny-stock brokerage firms calling the state home, Florida's penny-stock industry ranks as the nation's third biggest, behind New York and Colorado.  As a result of increased pressure, many broker-dealers apparently are on the run.  The Florida task force reports that operators who find the state inhospitable are moving to Georgia and other southeastern states.  But Georgia regulators last month instituted their own assault on penny-stock manipulators, promising criminal prosecution of certain "serious" violators.  Even penny-stock giant Blinder, Robinson & Co., currently the target of a sweeping enforcement action by Florida officials and a past target of federal securities regulators, reportedly wants to move its headquarters out of Denver to a place where the company won't be "harassed" by regulators and the media, according to reports in Denver newspapers.  Officials of Blinder Robinson didn't return phone calls seeking comment on their plans.  In Florida alone, there were 150 examinations of penny-stock broker-dealers from June 1988 to June 1989 conducted by the Florida Division of Securities, the SEC and the NASD.  The agencies' coordinated efforts have led to the closing of about 22 penny-stock brokerage firms in the state, according to a recent report by the Florida task force.  Lawrence Fuchs, Florida deputy comptroller, estimates the task force has saved taxpayers millions of dollars, both by protecting them from unscrupulous operators and eliminating a possible duplication of enforcement efforts.  Despite the recent flurry of regulatory action across the U.S., some observers complain that there haven't been enough jailings yet and that many crooked penny-stock brokers, sanctioned in one state, often open shop in another and begin again.  James B. Cloonan, president of the Chicago-based American Association of Individual Investors, acknowledges that regulators have made some progress, but he laments that they seem unable to "punish these people" the way they do other securities laws violators.  He speculates that difficulties arise because "there's no paper trail and it all comes down to one person's word against another's" in many penny-stock transactions.  Lawrence Iason, regional administrator of the SEC in New York, acknowledges some "problems" at the state level, but emphasizes that "if someone is barred from the industry by the SEC, he's out -- nationwide."  He and other federal regulators say efforts are under way to encourage the participation in penny-stock cases of agencies with the power to put offenders behind bars.  Mr. Fuchs in Florida counters that the best way to avoid penny-stock fraud is for investors to just say no.  "The best protection for investors," he says, "is never to get involved in the first place."  ---  @ Clamping Down  @ Actions by 50 state securities regulators involving penny stocks  @ 1987 1988  @ New investigations 357 737  @ Resolved cases 262 395  @ Consumer reports of fraud 1,767 2,660  @ Involvement by the Securities and Exchange Commission  @ 1988 1989*  @ Penny-stock actions  @ undertaken 25 46  @ Consumer complaints  @ to SEC 1,510 2,462  @ *Through June 30  @ Source: North American Securities Administrators Association  Dresdner Bank AG and Lufthansa AG announced stock issues that would raise a total of 2.14 billion German marks ($1.08 billion) at a time that many analysts are predicting a correction of the West German equity markets.  Dresdner Bank plans to raise 1.2 billion marks by issuing four million shares of common stock to shareholders at a rate of one for every eight held.  The new shares, priced at 300 marks each, will be open for subscription in late October and early November.  Separately, Lufthansa, West Germany's government-controlled airline, said it plans to offer 6,080,000 shares of common stock at 155 marks a share, valuing the transaction at 942.2 million marks.  Shareholders can draw one new share for every four held between Oct. 9 and Oct. 23.  The asking price showed a 23% discount on the airline's closing share price of 200.5 marks on the Frankfurt Stock Exchange yesterday.  The West German government won't subscribe to the issue, meaning its Lufthansa stake will drop to 51.6% from 64.5%.  Lufthansa said the airline needs cash to expand its fleet and ground services over the next decade.  Prior to Dresdner Bank's announcement, its shares fell 5.3 marks yesterday to close at 354 marks, meaning that the new stock will be issued at a 15% price discount.  In unofficial off-floor trading later in the day, Dresdner Bank shares were changing hands at around 347 marks.  "Their price is high and the market is reacting accordingly," said Werner Dort, a broker for Commerzbank AG. "Everybody is talking about an impending market consolidation and the market has become a little cautious."  West German stock analysts say a prolonged technical recovery is long overdue as market indices continue to show postcrash highs.  The German Stock Index eased 3.92 to 1633.55 yesterday, after two days of strong gains.  Exchange-rate uncertainties and signs of an inflationary buildup in West Germany's brisk economy have fueled speculation of an impending hike in official West German interest rates.  Since higher rates would hurt bank earnings by increasing refinancing costs, West German bank shares fell across the board yesterday in nervousness about today's meeting of the Bundesbank Central Bank Council.  Analysts were discomfited by the timing of Dresdner Bank's issue, still seven weeks away.  "It's a fairly long wait and much can happen between now and then," said Georg Siebenburgen, a bank analyst at the Bank in Liechtenstein's Frankfurt branch.  Dresdner Bank's stock issue would increase its nominal share capital by 200 million marks to 1.69 billion marks, thus keeping the bank's equity capital total in line with business growth.  In a brief statement announcing the offering, Dresdner Bank said it was motivated by "European strategy considerations," but didn't say whether the fresh capital would be used to finance an acquisition.  California ain't what it used to be, I'd been reading.  And surely around its metropolitan centers that's true.  Lots more people and congestion.  At the same time, tens of thousands supposedly are moving out of state to escape the hubbub.  But I thought I could find a big slice of the place that hadn't lost its mid-1960s appeal.  That period is now framed as a golden era of hope and promise.  One could quibble politically, recalling that in 1964 the state's voters overwhelmingly repealed a fair-housing law and banned pay TV. Nevertheless, it's true that a trip to the beach was more hassle-free.  It still is at Zmudowski Beach State Park near Salinas.  Just a jog or two down an agricultural service road from the coastal highway, it's the farm worker's answer to the Pajaro Dunes business "conference" resort a riptide north.  The dunes aren't shabby at Zmudowski either, though one wonders about the signs that guard your entrance to a nice stretch of sand and surf: "Horses OK" but "No Swimming or Wading."  Maybe a picnic, then.  And if you've driven from nearby Castroville, "Artichoke Center of the World," your baskets are full with goodies from the Giant Artichoke restaurant and ranch market.  Needless to say, you can get the delicacy your way.  Castroville and the rest of the loop I traveled from San Jose along inland route 101 to San Luis Obispo and back up ocean-hugging Highway 1 were greatly unchanged from when I last passed through 15 or 20 years ago.  Go north or south, or east for that matter, and the differences will be more pronounced.  Yet for now, within reach of its uncelebrated central coast, California Lives]  Although one hears the state's freeways are in disrepair, the only traffic jam I hit was the result of ongoing road work on the edge of the San Jose sprawl.  Once below and free of that, I braked only for fruit stands.  The population may have nearly doubled over two decades even in this region, but at no apparent loss.  Sure, Cannery Row is only a replica, but Steinbeck still would recognize his surroundings: Irrigated acreage in the Salinas Valley actually has increased in recent years.  Water generally is the biggest local concern, although its particular scarcity after another dry winter can be a blessing for those who want to discourage growth of the non-vegetable kind.  The Hearst Corp.'s plans for a resort near the old man's hilltop castle at San Simeon are yesterday's news (and, indeed, only portable chemical toilets are in use at the mansion tour's much-developed staging area).  Growing businesses in San Luis Obispo must figure how to make do with 90% of their 1987 water use or pay double rate on the overage (for residential users, it's an even drier town).  A hardship case -- that is to say, rapid success story -- like the San Luis Sourdough makers, whose burgeoning bread business is explained with one whiff, can win an exemption but still can't clean the delivery fleet.  Expansion also was in the air at the Hog's Breath Inn in Carmel by the Sea, but Sandy Dawson, a four-year veteran of Clint Eastwood's eatery, explained that the plywood-pounding that punctuates the outdoor dining is mainly for a neighboring office structure, although the restaurant will get out of it some added kitchen storage space and badly needed new restrooms.  Notwithstanding the run-in the joint had with the county health authorities last year, my sprouts-laden salad was quite adequate, although I grew a little gun-shy when I spilled a fistful of tasty blue-cheese dressing on one of Clint's tree-trunk tables.  Ms. Dawson, a real Belle Starr of a food slinger, assured me the boss was off in Africa filming "White Hunter, Black Heart."  It's a house of a different color down the road in Carmel Highlands, where the demure sign for the Tickle Pink lodge is a nevertheless irresistible siren.  Mix cutesiness with commanding views of sea life au natural on the kelp beds, and you have a recipe for reserving months in advance.  But don't let your kinky hearts run wild -- the means-testing motel was built on the site of the late state Sen. Edward Tickle's cottage of the same name.  "Mrs.  Tickle was a great lover of flowers, especially pink ones," and that's as far as the legend goes.  If it's sex that's your fancy, drop on down to the Henry Miller Memorial Library beneath Big Sur.  The cabin actually was the home of artist Emil White, who left us in July, and along with shelves full of his soft-core pal Henry's literature one will find snapshot after snapshot of the two old rapscallions cavorting (usually clothed) with ladies less than half their New Age.  Elsewhere the action is tamer, though not without reminders of danger.  Where highways 46 and 41 meet east of the Paso Robles winery strip is a memorial to James Dean's last road test at the site.  And I'm sure trouble occasionally stalks the Broccoli Festival in Greenfield to the north, or the garlic dens of Gilroy.  But amid the campfires at Montana de Oro beach park south of Morro Bay the memory of the surgically gloved male nurse caught hiding beneath the women's outhouse two summers ago has turned to ash.  On the intake end of things, my favorite ingestible of the trip was a peanut-butter "flip" at Country Culture Yogurt in San Luis Obispo.  This high-protein milkshake proxy has found its way up from Santa Barbara, where it is all the rage these days.  But those parts were too glamorous for this trip.  I wanted the easy, breezy California of a bygone era.  It's still there if you know where to look.  ---  Mr. Ferguson is features editor of the Journal's editorial page.  Tele-Communications Inc. boosted its plan, to $32.25 a share from $31.75, to acquire the 25% stake it doesn't hold in Westmarc Communications Inc.  The increase is tied to the companies' agreement to settle certain litigation filed by WestMarc holders who claimed that the original price was inadequate.  The two Denver companies also have signed a definitive agreement for the 7.4 million-share, $238.7 million purchase.  WestMarc shareholders will vote sometime between November and January.  WestMarc holders would be paid cash, but holders of at least 1,000 shares may elect to receive preferred stock.  "The receipt of preferred stock . . . would be tax-free; however, the value of the preferred stock will not necessarily be the equivalent of the cash price," WestMarc said.  Tele-Communications, the nation's largest operator of cable-television systems, earlier had owned all of and then spun off WestMarc, which began as a microwave-communications business and moved into cable TV over time.  The companies agreed on the latest transaction in May.  Laura Bolton, a Dallas businesswoman, isn't at all surprised to hear that consumer spending has been picking up.  "I know," she says, "I've been spending away.  It's all my fault."  Ms. Bolton recently bought clothes, a $1,000 mattress and bed frame -- and a $7,000 sailboat.  Why the spending now?  "I've just been in the mood," she says.  As for the sailboat, "it's simply the time for sailing."  For more than a year, economists have been expecting consumers to start worrying about economic head winds, slow their spending and begin paying off some of their debts.  And, for a few weeks last spring, it did look as though consumers, whose spending accounts for about two-thirds of the gross national product, had begun to retrench.  But, in part, that cutback appears to have been a statistical illusion.  "The data from March to June initially showed that the economy was slowing toward the recession we had been forecasting," says Burton Zwick, senior economist at the investment firm of Kidder, Peabody & Co. "Now, the most recent retail sales and employment releases show a large upward revision to previous months and suggest that consumer demand and economic growth have actually rebounded slightly."  So have some economic forecasts.  When Blue Chip Financial Forecasts, a Sedona, Ariz., newsletter, surveyed economists early last month, 25% of them were still predicting a recession this year.  But talks with analysts in the past few days suggest that some of the pessimists have postponed their recessions, at least until 1990.  Richard Hoey, chief economist of the investment firm of Drexel Burnham Lambert, is delighted.  For several months, he has been predicting that the economy would revive in the second half of 1989 and then slip into a recession in 1990 as the Federal Reserve tightened credit to check inflation.  "We are no longer alone in our forecast," he says, cheerfully.  This isn't the first time consumers have prolonged the current economic expansion, which began in mid-November 1982 and is the longest in peacetime history.  In both 1984 and 1986, the inflation-adjusted gross national product -- the total output of goods and services -- slowed sharply, and recessions were widely predicted.  But consumer spending surged, and the expansion soldiered on.  The gains in spending were accompanied by a slowdown in saving, however, and many economists worried about saving being inadequate to support investment.  To calculate "personal saving," the Commerce Department subtracts consumption spending from disposable personal income; over the past quarter-century, personal saving had been averaging 6% of disposable income and higher.  But in 1984, the saving rate slipped below 6% and often ran below 4%.  A year ago, the rate picked up; at last report, for the 1989 second quarter, it hit a respectable 5.7%.  Such a gain in saving can be accompanied by a gain in consumer spending -- odd as that may seem at first blush -- if personal income is rising.  In July, personal income, and personal spending as well, rose at a brisk 0.7% rate.  Behind that gain in personal income, the strongest in several months, is an increase in jobs.  Last month, payroll employment rose 110,000, seemingly a small figure in comparison with previous months.  But the number would have been 108,000 higher if it hadn't been for strikes, particularly those by telephone workers around the country.  Even more important is the fact that the rise in employment has been almost without interruption since the 1981-82 recession.  Such an extended climb encourages consumers to keep spending.  Tony Brown, a Boca Raton, Fla., bank employee, bought a new house last December.  He says he and his wife have spent about $10,000 over the past few months on furnishings.  "We're pretty comfortable about the prospects of ongoing employment if a recession does hit," he adds.  A recession seems unlikely to hit right away.  Reflecting the upward revision of consumption data, the Commerce Department said in late August that the real GNP rose at an annual rate of 2.7% in the second quarter, up from its earlier estimate of 1.7%.  Job numbers were adjusted upward, too.  Revised statistics show that monthly increases in payroll employment averaged 224,000 in the second quarter, almost double the 133,000 reported earlier.  Government statistics, though, weren't the main worries holding down consumer spending last spring.  Consumers were hit by what seemed to be a triple whammy: The Federal Reserve was continuing to push up interest rates to head off a possible rise in inflation; oil prices were surging; and April 15 income-tax payments were unexpectedly large.  Since then, however, the Fed has moved interest rates slightly lower, oil prices have come down and the tax payments, though still painful, have at least faded into the past.  The economy often is hit by such unexpected shocks, but Stephen Roach, senior economist at the investment firm of Morgan Stanley & Co., sees fairly smooth sailing for consumers, and the economy, the rest of this year.  He cites "the fundamentals of solid income growth, augmented by the job security of low unemployment along with the added wealth imparted by rising stock and bond markets."  Roger Farah, the chief executive of Rich's department stores in Atlanta, is glad that economists keep pushing back their recession forecasts.  "The customer," he believes, "has lost the concern that a recession is just around the corner."  Rich's had a good August "and is looking for a strong fourth quarter," he adds.  Most forecasters, however, are merely postponing a recession, not ruling one out.  Mr. Roach of Morgan Stanley, for instance, deplores "this latest round of recession mania" as premature.  The 4% growth in real disposable personal income over the past year "should provide ample support to consumer spending," he says, and the consumer is the key to what happens in 1989.  But for 1990, Morgan Stanley forecasts a sharp decline in disposable income, a drop in consumer spending and a mild recession in the second and third quarters of the year.  Although a few analysts see inflation-adjusted GNP rising at an annual rate of 3% or more in the current half-year, most economists expect something more modest.  For some time, Donald H. Straszheim of Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith had been predicting a mild recession in the 1989 second half.  Now, he thinks real GNP will grow in the current quarter, but only at a 1.5% to 2% annual rate.  The third-quarter rise, in Mr. Straszheim's view, will stem largely from strong sales of 1989 model cars as buyers "avoid price hikes on the 1990 models."  Other analysts credit the surge in auto sales, which continued strong in late August, mainly to the low-cost financing and rebates offered by manufacturers.  But car buyers with the money -- or a respectable credit rating -- sometimes buy at least partly on impulse.  William B. Milham, the owner of Chopstix Dim Sum Cafe & Takeout restaurant in Los Angeles, recently traded in his Jeep for a red Mercedes.  Why?  Well, he says, he considers it a form of saving, "something with quality and integrity.  It can only appreciate."  Alexander P. Paris of Barrington Research Associates thinks that the third-quarter strength in auto sales may be setting the stage for "a big disappointment in the fall."  The sales of 1989 models, he says, may be stealing sales from the 1990s.  Mr. Paris sees other reasons for cheer in the current consumer market, such as housing starts and new home sales, but warns that "this may be a false upturn."  For some time, economists have been saying that eventually even the most attractive sales incentives won't persuade consumers to buy more cars, appliances or other big-ticket items, that they will become stocked up.  Richard D. Rippe, a senior vice president of the investment firm of Dean Witter Reynolds who holds this view, says spending on consumer durables will be weak mainly because of the large purchases in prior years.  He notes that the ratios of houses to households and cars to licensed drivers are at all-time highs.  "The appropriate inference," he says, "is that most of the pent-up demand for major durable goods has already been satisfied by the five to six strong and uninterrupted years already recorded."  If the consumer does indeed cut back, the economic outlook could worsen quickly.  A large share of consumer spending has been going to the service industries -- partly explaining why manufacturers have been having their troubles.  The National Association of Purchasing Management each month surveys industrial purchasing executives, and the recent polls haven't been encouraging.  The association's index last month fell from 46% to 45.2%.  Any reading below 50%, the association says, indicates that manufacturing is in a decline.  Right now, however, consumers are doing their best to keep the economy afloat.  And at least some of them appear to be not especially worried.  In New York, Pierre H. Hivert, the U.S. vice president of retail for Cartier Inc., a jewelry firm, says a horde of "investment-banker types and others who like to have a status symbol on their wrists" are taking home $2,000 to $14,000 Santos and Panther watches made of stainless steel and gold.  Consumer optimism and spending, in some cases, extends beyond economic analysis.  Stephanie Walls, a Dallas attorney who recently spent about $1,500 on furniture, says the timing of her purchases was mainly determined by the fact that her husband happened to be out of town.  ---  Contributing to this story were Wall Street Journal bureaus in Atlanta, Dallas, Los Angeles, Chicago and New York.  CABLE-TV: Maclean Hunter Ltd.'s cable-TV division acquired Armstrong Communications Ltd., an Ontario cable-TV concern with 37,500 subscribers.  Maclean didn't give the price but said half will be paid in cash and half in its shares.  Dear Bill:  In Oliver Cromwell's eloquent words, "I beseech you, in the bowels of Christ, think it possible you may be mistaken" about the course you and President Bush urge us to adopt to fight drugs.  The path you propose of more police, more jails, use of the military in foreign countries, harsh penalties for drug users, and a whole panoply of repressive measures can only make a bad situation worse.  The drug war cannot be won by those tactics without undermining the human liberty and individual freedom that you and I cherish.  You are not mistaken in believing that drugs are a scourge that is devastating our society.  You are not mistaken in believing that drugs are tearing asunder our social fabric, ruining the lives of many young people, and imposing heavy costs on some of the most disadvantaged among us.  You are not mistaken in believing that the majority of the public share your concerns.  In short, you are not mistaken in the end you seek to achieve.  Your mistake is failing to recognize that the very measures you favor are a major source of the evils you deplore.  Of course the problem is demand, but it is not only demand, it is demand that must operate through repressed and illegal channels.  Illegality creates obscene profits that finance the murderous tactics of the drug lords; illegality leads to the corruption of law enforcement officials; illegality monopolizes the efforts of honest law forces so that they are starved for resources to fight the simpler crimes of robbery, theft and assault.  Drugs are a tragedy for addicts.  But criminalizing their use converts that tragedy into a disaster for society, for users and non-users alike.  Our experience with the prohibition of drugs is a replay of our experience with the prohibition of alcoholic beverages.  I append excerpts from a column that I wrote in 1972 on "Prohibition and Drugs."  The major problem then was heroin from Marseilles; today, it is cocaine from Latin America.  Today, also, the problem is far more serious than it was 17 years ago: more addicts, more innocent victims; more drug pushers, more law enforcement officials; more money spent to enforce prohibition, more money spent to circumvent prohibition.  Had drugs been decriminalized 17 years ago, "crack" would never have been invented (it was invented because the high cost of illegal drugs made it profitable to provide a cheaper version) and there would today be far fewer addicts.  The lives of thousands, perhaps hundreds of thousands of innocent victims would have been saved, and not only in the U.S.  The ghettos of our major cities would not be drug-and-crime-infested no-man's lands.  Fewer people would be in jails, and fewer jails would have been built.  Colombia, Bolivia and Peru would not be suffering from narco-terror, and we would not be distorting our foreign policy because of narco-terror.  Hell would not, in the words with which Billy Sunday welcomed Prohibition, "be forever for rent," but it would be a lot emptier.  Decriminalizing drugs is even more urgent now than in 1972, but we must recognize that the harm done in the interim cannot be wiped out, certainly not immediately.  Postponing decriminalization will only make matters worse, and make the problem appear even more intractable.  Alcohol and tobacco cause many more deaths in users than do drugs.  Decriminalization would not prevent us from treating drugs as we now treat alcohol and tobacco: prohibiting sales of drugs to minors, outlawing the advertising of drugs and similar measures.  Such measures could be enforced, while outright prohibition cannot be.  Moreover, if even a small fraction of the money we now spend on trying to enforce drug prohibition were devoted to treatment and rehabilitation, in an atmosphere of compassion not punishment, the reduction in drug usage and in the harm done to the users could be dramatic.  This plea comes from the bottom of my heart.  Every friend of freedom, and I know you are one, must be as revolted as I am by the prospect of turning the United States into an armed camp, by the vision of jails filled with casual drug users and of an army of enforcers empowered to invade the liberty of citizens on slight evidence.  A country in which shooting down unidentified planes "on suspicion" can be seriously considered as a drug-war tactic is not the kind of United States that either you or I want to hand on to future generations.  Milton Friedman  Senior Research Fellow  Hoover Institution  Stanford University  Stock prices fell in the largest sell-off in more than two weeks after a market strategist said many shares are overvalued.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 24.89 to 2719.79, its steepest decline since Aug. 21.  New York Stock Exchange volume totaled a moderate 161,800,000 shares, which still made it the busiest session since last Wednesday.  Declining shares on the Big Board swamped gainers, 1,091 to 433.  Broader averages posted comparable losses.  The Standard & Poor's 500-stock index fell 3.32 to 349.24, the Dow Jones Equity Market Index slid 2.98 to 327.90, and the New York Stock Exchange Composite Index dropped 1.66 to 194.18.  Traders said bearish comments by Morgan Stanley's chief investment strategist, Barton M. Biggs, published in the New York Times triggered selling by investors who had been nervous about the record heights to which the market climbed in its summer rally.  Mr. Biggs advised clients to sell 10% of their stock holdings.  Stock groups cited by Mr. Biggs as overvalued -- airlines, hotels, food and soft drinks, and media -- were sold heavily.  "A lot of the rumor stocks were hit, and there was general profit-taking in stocks like Woolworth that have had nice run-ups," said Christopher Pedersen, senior vice president at Twenty-First Securities.  "We had clients bailing out and protecting themselves from further market deterioration."  Woolworth fell 1 5/8 to 67 1/8.  Large sell programs tied to stock-index arbitrage augmented the decline and drove the industrial average to about a 40-point loss at one point.  In this strategy, traders capture profits by exploiting price discrepancies between futures and the underlying stocks.  Traders also said some investors believe the economic factors that fed the summer rally -- declining interest rates and moderate economic growth -- are disappearing, with interest rates now widely expected to hold firm for some time and the economy showing signs of possibly inflationary growth.  The Dow Jones Transportation Average nearly matched the point decline in the industrials and was off substantially more sharply in percentage terms, falling 23.30 to 1508.71.  Airline stocks involved in takeover speculation were among the biggest losers.  "The group has had an excellent move, and it is not unreasonable to think that people would take profits," said Helane Becker, airline analyst with Shearson Lehman Hutton.  UAL, the parent of United Airlines and target of a $300-a-share buy-out offer, dropped 3 7/8 to 286 7/8.  AMR, owner of American Airlines, tumbled 3 1/4 to 87, and Delta Air Lines retreated 1 7/8 to 79 1/2.  USAir Group fell 1/2 to 50, and Alaska Air Group slipped 1 to 28.  Midway Airlines rose 1 5/8 to 20 5/8.  Ampco-Pittsburgh, which has said it may seek control of the company, raised its stake to 9.6%  In the media group, McGraw-Hill eased 1 1/8 to 77 1/4, MCA dropped 2 to 62 1/2, Gannett skidded 1 3/8 to 46 3/8, and Capital Cities/ABC fell 10 to 507.  Among beverage issues, Anheuser-Busch declined 7/8 to 41 1/8, Coca-Cola dropped 7/8 to 64 3/4, and PepsiCo lost 5/8 to 57.  Traders said a little bargain-hunting helped pick up the market when the industrial average was at its low point, but concern about the potential for further setbacks kept many would-be buyers away.  "It's got people sitting on the sidelines, waiting to see which way they want to jump," said Dan Williams, a vice president of trading at Dillon, Read & Co.  "They're going to let the market tell them which way to go here."  Prices gradually recovered late in the day as a round of program selling subsided, but traders said the market's loss of upward momentum is likely to remain an obstacle to any recovery attempts.  "There's nothing saying to jump back into stocks," Mr. Williams said.  Among the lodging stocks, Holiday rose 2 to 83, and Hilton fell 3/4 to 108.  In the blue-chip area, Minnesota Mining & Manufacturing dropped 2 to 76.  One of 3M's top officials forecast that third-quarter earnings would be slightly higher than a year earlier and said a slowdown in the U.S. economy is continuing to affect several of its businesses.  Other weak blue-chips included International Paper, down 2 3/8 to 55 3/8; Boeing, down 1 to 55 1/2; Procter & Gamble, down 1 3/4 to 126, and Merck, down 1 to 72 1/4.  Goodyear Tire & Rubber surged 4 1/8 to 57 5/8 amid rumors that Pirelli of Italy would offer to acquire the company for $90 a share.  Goodyear said it hasn't heard of a bid coming from Pirelli or anyone else, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Texaco was on the Big Board's most active list, falling 1/4 to 50 5/8 on 6.3 million shares, more than five times its average daily volume.  Mr. Pedersen of Twenty-First Securities said Tuesday was the last day investors needed to hold the stock to capture a special $3-a-share dividend.  Pep Boys -- Manny, Moe & Jack fell more sharply than any other Big Board issue in percentage terms, dropping 2 1/8 to 13 1/2, a decline of more than 13%, in response to a disappointing second-quarter earnings report.  More than 1.2 million shares, about 12 times the stock's average daily volume, changed hands in composite trading.  Litton Industries rose 2 to 96 3/4 amid continuing speculation that Teledyne Teledyne might sell its 28.7% stake, either to the company or to a third party that may call for a restructuring or sale of Litton.  The company declined to comment.  Phelps Dodge climbed 2 1/4 to 77 1/4.  The company declared a special dividend of $10 a share and said it plans to repurchase as many as two million common shares, or about 5.7% of the total outstanding.  Wells Fargo advanced 2 1/8 to 85, a 52-week high.  PaineWebber placed the stock on an "action list" of recommended banking issues and removed Norwest, which fell 3/8 to 22 1/8.  Georgia Gulf went up 1 1/8 to 59 5/8 in response to the plans of Dallas investor Harold C. Simmons and NL Industries, which he controls, to try to unseat the company's board.  Mr. Simmons and NL own a combined 9.9% stake and have offered to acquire the company or help it recapitalize.  NL fell 5/8 to 27 1/4.  The American Stock Exchange Index lost 1.66 to 382.87.  Volume was 12,300,000 shares, compared with 12,460,000 Tuesday.  There were 211 issues advancing, 367 declining and 259 unchanged.  Thermedics gained 7/8 to 16 5/8.  The company, which produces a drug-detection device, attributed the gains to optimism about the sales outlook for the product in light of President Bush's newly announced program to combat illegal drug use.  A lawyer for former national security adviser John Poindexter said former President Reagan had directly ordered Mr. Poindexter to give misleading responses to congressional investigators probing the Reagan administration's efforts to aid the Nicaraguan Contras.  The lawyer, Frederick Robinson, said at a hearing in federal district court here that he should be given access to Mr. Reagan's notes of his meetings with Mr. Poindexter so that he can use them as part of Mr. Poindexter's defense.  Mr. Poindexter is charged with conspiracy, two counts of obstructing Congress and two counts of making false statements.  He is awaiting trial.  Mr. Robinson said that at a meeting in mid-1986, Mr. Reagan told Mr. Poindexter to give inaccurate responses to Congress about the Contras.  He said that notes of the meeting could show that Mr. Poindexter was acting on presidential authority.  If such notes exist, they would provide the first evidence that Mr. Reagan authorized his aides to lie to Congress about his administration's activities on behalf of the Contras.  Mr. Robinson also argued that his client should be given access to the notes of then-Vice President Bush and other top Reagan administration officials.  Theodore Olson, Mr. Reagan's attorney, couldn't be reached for comment.  American Western Corp., Sioux Falls, S.D., said it is holding talks with a group of senior managers and the company's employee stock ownership plan over a possible $11.50-a-share leveraged buy-out of the plastic-packaging manufacturer.  According to a recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, the management group, which includes Chairman John L. Mulligan, holds a 9.1% stake.  The ESOP holds 15% of American Western.  The company earlier this year announced that it was considering "strategic alternatives to enhance shareholder value," including a buy-out by its ESOP.  American Western shares slipped 75 cents in national over-the-counter trading to close at $11.50 yesterday.  At that price, American Western is worth an indicated $64.8 million.  The management group is seeking financing for the buy-out, and Mr. Mulligan said any formal offer is subject to the group's receiving adequate financing.  "We expect to have that soon," he added.  The Securities and Exchange Commission filed a civil suit against Eddie Antar, former chairman of Crazy Eddie Inc., accusing him of engaging in a "massive financial fraud" to overstate the company's earnings over a three-year period.  Also named in the suit were six other former executives of the troubled Edison, N.J., electronics chain.  Only Mr. Antar and three other defendants -- Mr. Antar's brother Mitchell, a cousin, Sam E. Antar, and David Panoff -- face court action.  The three other defendants, Isaac Kairey, Eddie Gindi and Kathleen Morin, agreed to settle without admitting or denying any wrongdoing, according to the SEC.  Under the settlement, the defendants agreed to accept the court's judgment on damages, the SEC said.  The case was filed in federal court in Newark, N.J.  The SEC case essentially repeats, but in much greater detail, allegations made in civil suits previously filed by shareholders against Mr. Antar and others.  In court filings in those earlier suits, Crazy Eddie accused Mr. Antar of falsifying inventory and profit figures.  In those suits, the defendants have denied artificially inflating the company's value.  According to the SEC suit, Mr. Antar aimed to pump up the company's stock price through the false statements so that he could sell his stake and reap huge profits.  The SEC said Mr. Antar sold 5.6 million Crazy Eddie shares for more than $60 million in fiscal 1985 through 1987.  The suit seeks the disgorgement of profits from the sale of Crazy Eddie securities by the defendants, plus triple damages.  However, the SEC declined to state its estimate of the profits made by Mr. Antar and the other defendants.  Mr. Antar's attorney, Justin Feldman, said his client "has denied the allegations before and denies these allegations again."  He also said the SEC should have joined the earlier civil actions.  "Now we're going to have to start from scratch," he said.  Marvin Gersten, the attorney for Mitchell Antar, said his client denies the allegations in the SEC suit.  Mitchell Antar left the company in May 1988, Mr. Gersten said.  In November 1987, dissident shareholders elected a new board of directors, who then ousted Mr. Antar and the other defendants.  The company last June filed for protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  The SEC alleges that under the direction of Mr. Antar, the company's founder, chairman, president and chief executive officer, Crazy Eddie overstated pretax earnings by about $20.6 million for the year ended February 1987, by about $6.7 million for fiscal 1986 and by about $2 million for fiscal 1985.  According to the SEC, the false profit figures were achieved by understating accounts payable, overstating inventories and falsifying debit memos.  The SEC suit alleges, among other things, that in early December 1986, employees were given blank billing forms and told to write $4 million in phony bills to 50 of Crazy Eddie's largest vendors.  These bills were never sent, the suit says.  Such requests were repeated, according to the SEC, and by the end of January 1987 the employees had written a total of $20 million in phony bills.  Accounts payable were understated by approximately $20 million that year, the SEC alleged.  Nerio Nesi, chairman of Banca Nazionale del Lavoro, Italy's largest state-owned bank, is expected to resign at a special board meeting today, according to people in Rome's banking community.  Speaking on the condition that they not be identified, the people said Mr. Nesi met briefly with Treasury Minister Guido Carli yesterday to inform him of his plans.  Mr. Carli then met with Bank of Italy Governor Carlo A. Ciampi.  BNL's branch in Atlanta is under investigation by U.S. and Italian authorities for alleged irregularities over financing of exports to Iraq.  The Georgia Department of Banking and Finance said the Atlanta branch had assets of $785.6 million as of June 30, substantially less than the estimated $1 billion to $2 billion in unauthorized transactions that were kept off the books.  Bruce Kirwan, an attorney for BNL in Atlanta, said the local office would have no comment on the matter.  Political leaders and opinion makers in Italy have asked Mr. Nesi to assume public responsibility for the investigation and step down as head of the big bank.  Mr. Carli is expected to accept Mr. Nesi's resignation and appoint a temporary commissioner to clear up the matter.  Italian press reports say Treasury Director General Mario Sarcinelli and Bank of Italy Deputy Governor Lamberto Dini are possible candidates.  Fort Howard Corp., which went private last year through a leveraged buy-out, said it agreed to sell its paper-cup operations to a private investor group.  The paper-products concern didn't disclose how much it received in the cash-and-securities buy-out of the cup unit, which has about 9,400 workers and last year had sales of $925 million.  The operation has been valued at as much as $1 billion.  Fort Howard said it sold the business to an investor group led by D. Greg Horrigan and R. Philip Silver, the chairman and president, respectively, of closely held Silgan Corp.  The two will remain in their posts with the Stamford, Conn., maker of steel, aluminum and plastic containers after the sale.  Under the pact, Fort Howard said, it will retain a minority stake in the cup operation.  The company said a "substantial portion" of the cash proceeds will be used to pay down debt it incurred in last year's $3.9 billion buy-out by a group that included management and Morgan Stanley Group Inc.  The Morgan Stanley Leveraged Equity Fund II Limited Partnership, which participated in last year's buy-out, is also participating in the group buying the cup unit.  SmithKline Beecham PLC said it received approval from the Food and Drug Administration to market its hepatitis B vaccine in the U.S.  The vaccine, known as Energix-B, was introduced in Europe in 1986 and is already available in about 80 countries.  The drug relies on recombinant DNA technology.  Merck & Co. already has a recombinant hepatitis B vaccine on the U.S. market.  An official of London-based SmithKline said Energix-B would be less expensive than Merck's drug and would require less time to administer.  Details about SmithKline's U.S. marketing plans for the drug are scheduled to be discussed tomorrow at a news conference in New York, the official said.  Hepatitis B, a blood-borne disease that is considered even more contagious than AIDS, infects about 300,000 Americans a year and kills about 5,000 of them annually.  According to the World Health Organization, there are about 285 million chronic carriers of the disease, all of whom risk developing liver cancer and cirrhosis of the liver.  A federal judge in Tucson, Ariz., approved $584 million of settlements of litigation stemming from Washington Public Power Supply System's $2.25 billion bond default in 1983.  The judge also approved a $6.5 million settlement with WPPSS's auditor, Ernst & Whinney, in a separate case.  The settlements, combined with earlier settlements in the case, plus interest, could bring the total pot available to pay bondholders and attorneys to more than $800 million.  But industry observers said it could be months or even years before the settlement monies are distributed, as disgruntled bondholder factions appeal Judge William Browning's decision.  "The bad news is that several parties felt they weren't represented fairly.  They'll contest these settlements . . . and this may just be the first of many court decisions on this," said Gary Krellenstein, senior municipal utility analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton in New York.  "I was hopeful that if these settlements were approved, some people in the class could see money by Christmas 1990.  But I don't think so now."  In yesterday's decision, class plaintiffs who bought the WPPSS bonds before June 1983, and Chemical Banking Corp.'s Chemical Bank, the trustee for the estimated 24,000 bondholders, settled with a group of defendants.  The defendants' group includes WPPSS, several utilities in six states in the Northwest, the Bonneville Power Administration, the state of Washington and various professional firms.  One plaintiff group that is likely to appeal yesterday's decision is made up of bondholders who bought the WPPSS bonds after June 1983, when the Washington State Supreme Court ruled that many of the 88 municipal utilities that were backing the WPPSS bonds hadn't the legal authority to execute their contracts with WPPSS, and thus didn't have to pay the debt.  Those bondholders won't share directly in the approved settlements.  Buyers of the WPPSS bonds are also represented in a $7.5 billion class-action lawsuit against the state of Washington that contends the state is culpable in the default because its auditor was negligent in signing off on the bond sale.  Although the state of Washington contributed $10 million to yesterday's settlements, the separate bondholder class-action suit against the state is still outstanding.  "We feel very strongly that the bondholders have very distinct rights against the state of Washington," said Charles Webb III, attorney for the plaintiffs in the class action against the state.  Although he said he was still reviewing Judge Browning's decision, Mr. Webb said it was likely that "we will appeal."  The judge's decision didn't include a ruling on attorney's fees to be taken out of the $800 million settlement fund.  Plaintiffs' lawyers have requested fees of more than $107 million and reimbursement for about $56.4 million in expenses.  The determination of fees will be considered at a later hearing.  The court also hasn't considered yet how the settlement proceeds should be allocated to the plaintiffs.  A separate hearing will be conducted to determine the distribution of funds.  Despite the possibility that distribution of the settlement monies may be delayed by legal wrangling, Chemical Bank's William H. Berls said: "It appears bondholders and bond purchasers are one step away from receiving money for their claims."  He said that in his ruling, Judge Browning "endorsed the concept of total peace," precluding the claims of the other factions.  Chemical has said it would seek to have a portion of the settlement fund allocated for bondholders who purchased their WPPSS bonds after the class period, and in yesterday's decision, the judge "endorsed the authority of Chemical to represent the interests of all bondholders who purchased before and after" June 1983, Mr. Berls said.  However, Robert M. Sedgwick, the attorney representing bondholders who bought after the class period, said his clients "haven't been happy with the representation they got from Chemical Bank, and to the extent that the judge has indicated Chemical has been an enthusiastic representative, we just don't agree."  He added that his clients are likely to appeal Judge Browning's approval.  Chemical Bank's Mr. Berls said the approval of the settlements has "no effect whatsoever" on WPPSS's current plans to sell $450 million of revenue-refunding bonds for WPPSS power plant projects Nos. 1, 2 and 3.  Chemical had threatened earlier to try to seek proceeds from the sale to help pay investors who hold the defaulted bonds on projects Nos. 4 and 5.  But Chemical last month reached an agreement with WPPSS that it won't pursue a claim to the proceeds of the planned sale.  The bond sale is scheduled to begin next week.  Gasoline prices advanced in stepped-up trading, as bullish traders took advantage of a California refinery fire to spark a small rally.  Crude contracts also rose.  Yesterday's fire, at a 140,000-barrel-a-day Shell Oil Co. refinery outside San Francisco, is the first sizable disruption to the gasoline market since spring when the Valdez oil spill and an accident at a Chevron Corp. refinery in California boosted gasoline prices.  But the Shell fire isn't expected to have the same impact, traders said.  A Shell spokeswoman said the entire Martinez, Calif., plant was shut down, though "unaffected units are expected to start up through the next few days."  She added that Shell isn't yet sure how long it will take to restart the damaged part of the refinery, a 50,000-barrel section used in making gasoline.  Two workers performing routine inspections, employed by a unit of U.S. Testing Co., were hurt, but are expected "to recover nicely," an official said.  A number of market players speculated the unit could be out for at least a year, but downplayed the significance of the accident.  "It had a big impact on the market first thing," said Don Morton, a vice president at PaineWebber Energy.  "But 50,000 barrels a day is not a lot of gasoline.  The bulls are looking for an excuse for the market to run higher."  Another trader said, "Psychologically, it is affecting the gasoline market more than it is fundamentally."  Adding to that psychology was a fire at a much smaller unit of an Ashland Oil Co. refinery in St. Paul, Minn., over the weekend.  On the New York Mercantile Exchange, gasoline for October delivery rose 1.35 cents to 55.11 cents a gallon.  Crude prices rose in sympathy and gained momentum as they crossed various technical barriers.  October West Texas Intermediate advanced 23 cents to $19.28 a barrel.  "There was heavy technical followthrough as crude took out minor resistance levels," a market participant said.  "The market is feeding on itself."  Many major oil companies reacted to the price movements, raising their WTI postings -- the price they pay for crude at the refinery gate -- 25 cents to 50 cents a barrel, to $18.25 a barrel.  But on the Merc, it was a gasoline market as traders wondered whether another refinery would have an accident, reminiscent of the spate of plant closings earlier this year and in 1988.  More importantly, demand for gasoline has remained stronger than expected through August.  A number of large refineries in the midcontinent region will be shut for the next month or so for routine maintenance, adding to some tightness in supply.  Shell, a unit of Royal Dutch/Shell Group said it expects to meet "normal product requirements" by the Martinez plant and two other Shell refineries.  After the market closed, the American Petroleum Institute released its weekly inventory statistics, showing a 5.8-million-barrel drawdown in gasoline stocks and a 1.5-million-barrel drawdown in crude stocks.  The decline in crude inventories was generally expected though the drop in gasoline inventories was larger and could add to the bullish feeling.  In other commodity markets yesterday:  PRECIOUS METALS: Futures prices rose.  But one analyst characterized the advances as "rather tame" in view of a number of factors that normally would have had a stronger price-supporting influence.  December delivery gold advanced $2.30 an ounce to $367.40.  December silver was up four cents an ounce to $5.22.  October platinum rose $3.50 an ounce to $480.80.  There was unrest in South Africa associated with the parliamentary elections there and a weaker dollar, said William O'Neil, vice president of research of Elders Futures, New York.  He also noted that oil prices rose, as did the Commodity Research Bureau Index, and the stock market was lower.  "These are all things that are usually helpful for precious metals and they all came together, but had only a modest impact."  He attributed the inability of gold to rise sharply to a lack of demand for bullion.  One constructive factor was the ability of the spot, or September, position, to hold at around the $357 level.  That's a low set three years ago and regarded as a key support level, he noted.  Ted Arnold, Merrill Lynch's London metals specialist, writing in the firm's latest monthly base and precious metals report, observed: "The gold market has put on an encouraging performance when you consider that it has been absorbing increased gold sales by the Russians and the Chinese and has seen Far Eastern demand slacken.  This steady price action . . . suggests to us that there is some regular if modest buying interest going on at around the $360-$363 an ounce area basis spot.  Mr. Arnold estimates the projected trading range for gold for the next two to three months at $360 to $400 an ounce, basis spot London or the equivalent Comex position (September).  COPPER: Futures prices continued declining for the third consecutive session.  December delivery copper ended 2.95 cents a pound lower at $1.2155.  This represents a cumulative loss of 7.40 cents since last Thursday and a decline of 10.50 cents since Aug. 25, when the December contract settled at a life-of-contract high of $1.3190.  As has been the case recently, the labor problems that had underpinned the market continue without significant change or impact on futures prices.  "The bad news has all been absorbed by the market," one analyst said.  In Chile, mine union and management talks showed some progress, but were "still far away" from an agreement, he said.  In British Columbia, the negotiations between management of the Highland Valley mine and unions have been recessed until Friday and both sides remain apart, the analyst said.  In Papua New Guinea, two towers were blown up, cutting power to the Bougainville mine there, according to a company official.  Damage to the towers was being assessed, but it may take up to a week to restore full power, the official said.  "Any consequent resumption of operations would be entirely dependent on considerations of employee security," the official said.  The Bougainville mine reopened after being shut down since May 15 because of attacks from angry native landowners.  However, it was forced to close down again only several hours later after buses carrying employees were attacked, the analyst said.  LIVESTOCK and MEATS: The prices of hog and pork belly futures contracts rallied late during the trading session amid reports that the Polish government is requesting a huge food aid package that includes pork bellies and beef.  Last week, the prices of pork bellies and hogs soared in the U.S. on reports that the Bush administration was mulling whether to ship food to Poland to ease shortages plaguing its new government.  It isn't clear, however, whether the White House is willing to foot the high cost of shipping refrigerated pork overseas, or whether it is willing to see the consumer price of products such as bacon rise in the U.S. as a result.  Although the U.S. supply of pork bellies has been at its highest level in 18 years, the Polish government's wish list might cut that stockpile.  According to trade reports, the Polish government is asking for 50,000 metric tons of pork bellies, which is more than the current U.S. supply in cold storage.  The Polish government is also requesting butter, powdered milk, oilseeds, wheat, corn, barley and rice, analysts said.  Phelps Dodge Corp. declared a special $10-a-share cash dividend, but left itself plenty of financial flexibility to modernize and keep searching for another acquisition.  Analysts acclaimed the pay-out, noting that it struck a nice balance, stroking investors while keeping the nation's No. 1 copper producer's balance sheet clean.  "It's a good middle ground," said Peter Merner, who runs his own metals research firm in New York.  Phelps Dodge also said it intends from time to time to buy back up to two million of its 35.2 million common shares outstanding.  The program supercedes a similar plan announced in November, under which the company has repurchased 2.3 million shares for about $126 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Phelps Dodge shares jumped $2.25 to close yesterday at $77.25 each.  "All of the shareholders have to be very grateful," said Robert Gintel, chairman of Gintel Equity Management, a Greenwich, Conn., firm whose three mutual funds hold more Phelps Dodge stock than any other.  "They've had a number of factors to consider: whether they should make a payout or buy back shares or make acquisitions.  And I think they've done an excellent job balancing out the constituencies."  The dividend is a clear indication that Phelps Dodge -- which, in the past few years, has diversified into wire and cable equipment, chemicals and truck parts -- hasn't come across another company that it wants to snap up.  "Frankly, we looked and couldn't find anything, so we've elected to reward the stockholders," Douglas C. Yearley, chairman and chief executive officer, said in an interview.  Mr. Yearley noted that Phelps Dodge wants to continue to get into other businesses and recently has explored the buy-out of several "smokestack industry" concerns as well as mineral properties.  But, he said, today's bullish stock market has driven purchase prices too high for now.  He added that the company's primary objective is to upgrade its operations "and remain low-cost producers in every area."  The special dividend is payable Oct. 10 to stock of record Sept. 20.  The action is in addition to the regular 75-cent-a-share quarterly dividend payable Sept. 8.  Dallas takeover specialist Harold Simmons is known to hold a large position in Phelps Dodge, but it couldn't be learned if he helped prod management into declaring the special dividend.  Mr. Yearley declined to comment on individual investors, except to say: "We never lack for advice on how to run our company."  Most metal companies have been riding cyclical upswings in the past two years, leaving management to decide what to do with the excess cash generated during these peaks.  Aluminum Co. of America in January devised a formula linking the size of its dividend to its earnings performance.  Others have spent their cash almost exclusively on takeovers and capital improvements.  Still others, including specialty steelmaker Allegheny Ludlum Corp. and nickel giant Inco Ltd., have elected to hand out huge, one-time payments.  Phelps Dodge, with hardly any debt and $375 million cash on hand, may be able to afford undertaking a combination of these strategies.  While the $350 million special dividend distribution "seems like a big deal, it's really a conservative action," said John Tumazos, an analyst with Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp.  "They could pay this next year, too, if copper prices remain" at current levels.  Mr. Merner agreed: "This is not an enormous disbursement.  To a degree, they're simply paying out on their earnings."  Phelps Dodge recently posted record profit of $292.3 million for the first six months.  The copper market, while always subject to wild swings, has been riding high since mid-1987, when prices for the commodity hit a dollar a pound on the London Metals Exchange.  Prices hit a high in December of $1.685, and lately have been hovering around $1.25.  Meanwhile, recent labor strife and civil unrest in Mexico, British Columbia, Papua New Guinea, Peru and Chile have again tightened copper supplies and threaten to push prices even higher.  "I've never seen so much of this sort of thing all at once," said William Siedenburg, of Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  Mr. Tumazos added, "The biggest risk to the copper market right now is an outbreak of harmony.  If everybody kisses and makes up, that's bad news for Phelps Dodge."  Synthetic hormones women take to counter symptoms of menopause also prevent adverse changes in cholesterol levels, according to a study released today.  Researchers at the University of Pittsburgh found in a survey of 101 women that menopause naturally produced changes in blood cholesterol that may explain why older women have an increased risk of heart attacks.  But the researchers found that women who took hormone supplements to relieve menopause-related problems didn't suffer adverse cholesterol changes.  The new findings, published in today's New England Journal of Medicine, will certainly fuel the recent debate over the relative health benefits of hormone use by menopausal women.  Millions of American women take estrogen and progestin hormone products to counter symptoms of menopause such as osteoporosis, a condition in which bones can become brittle.  Some earlier studies have shown that women who use estrogen have a lower risk of cardiovascular disease, while other research has contradicted those findings.  The new report appears to strengthen the claim that hormone use can protect older women against heart attacks.  But the study probably won't damp controversy over hormone use in general.  The issue spilled into the news last month after Swedish researchers reported that long term use of a combination of estrogen and progestin sharply increased a post-menopausal woman's risk of breast cancer.  Publicity surrounding the report caused an uproar in medical circles and confusion among the many women using the drugs.  Some specialists praised the study for alerting women to a potentially serious side effect, while others have charged that the study was flawed.  A spokeswoman said the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists in Washington has fielded numerous queries about the use of the synthetic products to replace the normal loss of hormones that accompany menopause.  The group is one of several medical organizations which said the Swedish study wasn't relevant to American women because estrogen products used in Sweden differ from the products most widely prescribed in the U.S.  The most widely used estrogen product in the U.S. is sold under the brand name Premarin by American Home Products Corp.'s Wyeth-Ayerst Laboratories.  In 1988, sales of Premarin, largely to prevent osteoporosis, jumped 26% to $236 million.  A spokeswoman for the company said Premarin isn't currently indicated for use in preventing heart disease, but the company is researching the matter.  Earlier research had found that estrogens can reduce the risk of cardiovascular disease by about 50% and that women who took the hormones had higher levels of a "good" kind of cholesterol called high density lipoproteins, or HDL, which protect against heart disease.  The newest study by the Pittsburgh researchers found that estrogens don't directly increase HDL levels, but, instead, counter a natural tendency for HDL levels to drop during menopause.  The new study found that after menopause HDL levels on average fell about four milligrams for each deciliter of blood.  Meanwhile, levels of low density lipoproteins, the dangerous kind of cholesterol known as LDL, rose about 12 milligrams after menopause.  But the HDL and LDL levels of women who were administered hormone supplements were basically unchanged.  Karen Matthews, who co-authored the study with Lewis Kullers, said the new findings suggest that women likely to undergo menopause, at about age 50, ought to monitor their cholesterol levels.  Those already at high risk of heart disease, she said, might consider changing their diet, stepping up their exercise, or taking the hormone products.  "The risks and benefits of {hormone} replacement therapy really needs to be addressed on a patient-to-patient basis," Ms. Matthews said.  The study surveyed 541 women between the ages of 42 and 50 who hadn't entered menopause, and then, after 2 1/2 years, examined 101 of those women who stopped menstruating.  The researchers compared cholesterol levels in the 69 women who didn't take hormone supplements to the 32 women who did.  Poland's Roman Catholic Primate Jozef Cardinal Glemp isn't doing his Solidarity friends a favor by reviving the image of the Jew-baiting Pole.  Raising the old bugaboo about Jewish control of the media while slamming Jews protesting the presence of a Carmelite convent at Auschwitz, Cardinal Glemp seems to have forgotten what happened to Jews there, just a short drive from Krakow.  Jews aren't about to let him forget the Nazi mass murders of their people, and that's right.  It's their moral obligation, but they also must devote energy to memorializing the noble non-Jews who risked their lives to protect Jews.  One of the few films to deal with the subject was "Au Revoir Les Enfants," the lovely 1988 movie by French director Louis Malle -- a Catholic -- about his memory of a rural priest who eventually was deported to a concentration camp for hiding Jewish boys in his school.  A great many Holocaust survivors can report isolated incidents of kindness and bravery like the one Mr. Malle recalled in fictional form.  Far rarer was what happened at the little French village of Le Chambon-sur-Lignon, where an entire town conspired to save Jews.  Now Pierre Sauvage, a 45-year-old Jewish film maker who was born near Le Chambon, and spent his early months there, has commemorated the place and its people in an understated yet stirring documentary called "Weapons of the Spirit."  Mr. Sauvage's parents wanted so badly to forget the past they didn't raise him as a Jew.  Yet after he discovered that his family was Jewish, at the age of 18, they did take him to visit Le Chambon.  When he returned in 1980, intending to make a documentary about the Allied decision not to bomb the railroad tracks leading to Auschwitz, he decided instead to tell about what happened in Le Chambon, about what he calls "the conspiracy of goodness."  He doesn't insult Le Chambon's down-to-earth residents with sentimental treatment though he clearly feels passionately about what they did for him.  Most of the villagers who harbored the Jews have died; the rest are old and seem slightly bewildered by Mr. Sauvage's intentions.  When he asks an elderly couple why they helped, they shrug.  "I don't know," says the white-haired woman.  "We were used to it."  Another villager says: "It happened so naturally we can't understand the fuss."  Finally: "It's a normal thing to do."  Of course in Nazi-occupied France -- Le Chambon was 40 miles from the Vichy border -- saving Jews wasn't the "normal" thing to do.  It was abnormal -- dangerous, life-threatening.  Mr. Sauvage provides the background that explains the overwhelming casualness with which the Chambonnais viewed their actions.  They, too, are outsiders, Huguenot Protestants living in Catholic France who had themselves experienced isolation and persecution hundreds of years before.  When the old woman said, "We were used to it," she probably was taking the long view.  Mr. Sauvage mixes up the imagery of Le Chambon today, a quaint provincial town, with photographs from the Nazi era.  He fills in the historical context with words and with old news footage of Vichy France, including a cheerful account of an exhibit called "The Jew in France," which explained in detail "the harmful effect of the Jew in France."  More than 13,000 people visited the exhibit in three days, the announcer declared.  The numbers may or may not have been true.  In Le Chambon, where Jewish refugees arriving in the middle of the night were never asked what their religion was, the propaganda was irrelevant.  Under the guidance of their pastor, Andre Trocme, these fundamendalist Christians practiced what Trocme preached.  They loved their neighbors.  By the war's end, the town's population included almost one Jew for every one of the 5,000 locals.  Mr. Sauvage, too, took his cue from Pastor Trocme, who encouraged his congregation to use "weapons of the spirit" to fight evil.  He rousted other Jewish beneficiaries of Le Chambon's spirit to speak on film about how they were saved.  Many of them had never acknowledged the good that had been done them, because they couldn't bear to remember the accompanying sorrow.  In his capacity as film maker and the president of a charitable foundation called Friends of Le Chambon, Mr. Sauvage is performing a valuable function.  He's reminding us that while the evil shouldn't be forgotten, neither should the good.  ---  Playwright Willy Russell's "Shirley Valentine" has greatly pleased audiences in London and New York with the idea that all a bored, middle-aged British woman needs to resuscitate her marriage is a quick roll in the sand with a bartender on a Greek island.  Mostly the piece gave Pauline Collins, with her droopy doll's face, a chance to work lots of charm with the play's zippy one-liners and sit-com philosophizing.  Transferred to the screen, Ms. Collins remains charming, even playing against the odd spectacle of Tom Conti's flabby Greek beach boy.  ---  VIDEO TIP: Louis Malle, best known in this country as Mr. Candice Bergen, has made two fine and entirely different films about the Nazi occupation of France.  His 1974 "Lacombe Lucien" was a chilling investigation into the banality of evil, about how a rough farm boy became a vicious Nazi collaborator simply because he couldn't get a job with the local resistance.  More recently, with "Au Revoir Les Enfants" (which is available on videocassette), he returned to an incident in his own history, to the time he spent in the rural Jesuit school where his Parisian parents shipped him to sit out the war.  Though the film is about the boys, the movie's hero is the school director who defied the Nazis by harboring Jewish children.  Colorado's Department of Health fined the Army $1,570,000, claiming it violated state law during its cleanup of a toxic-waste site near Denver.  The penalty is believed to be the biggest environmental fine in the state's history.  The health department late last week said the Army had committed 42 violations of state toxic-waste laws.  It alleged that tanks built to store the waste drained from the site are leaking.  The Army hasn't decided whether to appeal the fine, said Amy Brown, a Justice Department spokeswoman.  She said the Army believes the state may be barred from penalizing the federal government under the doctrine of "sovereign immunity."  At the heart of the dispute is the Army's cleanup of Basin F, a hazardous waste disposal pond located at the Rocky Mountain Arsenal.  Shell Oil Co., which operated a pesticide plant on the site from 1947 to 1982, is paying part of the cleanup costs.  State officials have criticized the Army in the past for not being thorough and moving too slowly on the cleanup.  In February a federal judge ruled that the state would be allowed to help supervise the project.  The Army has asked the judge to reconsider the decision.  It is unusual for one government entity to fine another, said Michael R. Hope, the Colorado deputy attorney general representing the health department.  "We're not trying to raid the federal treasury.  We want the Army to comply with the law and we feel we have no choice but to assess penalties," Mr. Hope said.  --- TEXAS COURT RULING could make bank mergers risky.  A federal appeals court panel in New Orleans has ruled that a bank can be held liable for past crimes committed by a bank it acquires.  If the ruling stands, it is likely to complicate the process of assessing merger prospects, lawyers say.  Potential criminal liabilities aren't always easy to spot.  But if they aren't provided for in a merger agreement, acquiring banks could be open to litigation and fines.  Lawyers for the American Bankers Association argue that the case could discourage acquisitions of failing banks.  They say evidence of criminal activity often turns up in bank failures.  The court's decision involves two tiny banks.  Alamo Bank of Texas had appealed its conviction for violations of the currency reporting requirements of the federal Bank Secrecy Act.  The violations had been committed by Central National Bank three years before its merger into Alamo, but Alamo was indicted and convicted as a "successor in interest" to CNB. Last November, a U.S. district judge fined Alamo $750,000, suspending $500,000 of the fine and putting the bank on three years probation.  Alamo had argued that holding it responsible for another bank's criminal acts violated its constitutional right to due process.  But the three-judge panel unanimously sided with the Justice Department in ruling against Alamo last month.  It ruled that CNB continues to exist, even though it's now part of an entity named Alamo.  "CNB cannot escape punishment by merging with Alamo and taking Alamo's corporate persona," the panel held.  ---  TRACKING DALLAS law-firm mergers means keeping up with the Johnsons.  Johnson & Gibbs, Dallas's biggest law firm with 264 lawyers, is having merger talks with Davis, Meadows, Owens, Collier & Zachry, a 20-lawyer firm specializing in tax litigation and white-collar criminal defense work.  Johnson & Gibbs is following the lead of other big Texas firms that have acquired criminal defense expertise in the past year.  Meanwhile, 65-lawyer Johnson, Bromberg & Leeds is continuing merger talks with Gardere & Wynne, which will have 204 lawyers as of Oct. 1.  The merger would create the biggest firm in Dallas, barely outstripping Johnson & Gibbs.  But Gardere & Wynne managing partner Barry Drees said size isn't the motivation for the talks.  "As a byproduct, it might not be all bad, but it's not a numbers race," Mr. Drees said.  ---  U.S. JUDGE APPROVES plan to settle discrimination suit against GM.  A plan unveiled in January to settle a discrimination suit brought by black salaried employees against General Motors Corp. was approved by U.S. District Judge John Feikens.  A dissident group of black employees had tried to block the settlement, claiming GM's plan didn't adequately compensate workers, but the judge rejected their efforts.  The group, which has 30 days to appeal the decision, couldn't be reached for comment.  The settlement includes a commitment from GM to set up an unusual computer model to monitor personnel practices.  The system will compare career advancement and the pay of blacks and whites, adjusting for factors such as education and job experience.  If the percentage of promotions or pay raises among blacks differs significantly from those among whites, GM must make up the difference based on specific formulas.  Roughly 10,000 current and former black salaried employees in Michigan, Ohio and Indiana are covered by the settlement.  GM agreed to pay more than $3 million, mainly in awards and one-time salary adjustments, to about 3,800 past and present employees but didn't admit it had discriminated against them.  ---  TOP MANHATTAN PROSECUTOR: The White House, as expected, has announced President Bush's intention to nominate Otto G. Obermaier to be U.S. attorney for the Southern District of New York.  Mr. Obermaier is a partner in Obermaier, Morvillo & Abramowitz, which specializes in white-collar criminal cases.  He was a prosecutor in the Manhattan U.S. attorney's office during the 1960s, and served as chief trial counsel at the Securities and Exchange Commission from 1968 to 1970.  Mr. Obermaier, 53, would succeed Rudolph Giuliani, who resigned in January and is running for mayor of New York.  The acting U.S. Attorney is Benito Romano.  ---  POINDEXTER PROSECUTOR NAMED: Dan Webb, a former U.S. attorney in Chicago, was named chief trial prosecutor in the government's Iran-Contra case against former National Security Adviser John Poindexter.  Mr. Webb, a partner in Winston & Strawn, specializes in white-collar criminal defense.  Mr. Poindexter is charged with making false statements and misleading a congressional investigation.  President Bush's anti-drug initiative set off a late-year budget scramble in Congress, where the administration risks a new round of military cuts unless it comes up with a more credible plan to finance its proposals.  Democrats are determined to at least match Mr. Bush dollar for dollar on the drug issue, and House Majority Leader Richard Gephardt signaled that defense commitments in the budget summit agreement of last spring are now open to change.  "Last night put a new light on things," said the Missouri Democrat in reference to Mr. Bush's national television address.  Republicans acknowledged the White House hurt itself by failing to put forward a more complete list of savings to offset the new program costs.  The $716 million in new spending proposed this week is only part of $1.48 billion added by the administration this year to its initial fiscal 1990 budget for fighting drugs -- now totaling nearly $7.9 billion.  Offsetting cuts proposed by the Office of Management and Budget would cover only half the increases proposed since February, and in several cases, the savings appear exaggerated.  While speaking in terms of "war," the administration rejects new revenues and is even shy of challenging the pork-barrel amendments of House and Senate Appropriations committees.  For example, the budget office suggests trims of $90 million from public housing and juvenile justice programs, while making no mention of offsetting cuts from costly highway projects or academic buildings sponsored by members.  The largest single reduction, said to be $320 million, would come from federal aid to states providing social services to new immigrants -- money the administration admits may never be spent in any case.  "Trust and later verify," joked House Speaker Thomas Foley.  And with the new fiscal year beginning Oct. 1, the fight will be compressed in the appropriations process currently under way.  The first shot was fired when senators pressed yesterday to shift at least $45 million from lawmakers' mail expenses to drug-treatment programs, and the debate will be fully joined next week when the Senate Appropriations Committee takes up the revised Justice Department budget.  Absent a waiver, it will be impossible for most lawmakers to accommodate the new spending requested by the president under the allocations established by the budget.  But Sen. Warren Rudman (R., N.H.), one of the original sponsors of the Gramm-Rudman deficit law, said he would consider voting for at least a temporary waiver to bring the matter to the floor, where offsetting cuts would have to be found.  While Republicans expect further reductions from the military budget, these won't be easily achieved.  The next few weeks promise a rough-and-tumble fight with the GOP countering by using the drug issue to push for cuts in domestic programs.  "It will strip some old wallpaper," says Republican Whip Alan Simpson of Wyoming.  The administration, meanwhile, yesterday launched an aggressive campaign to sell the president's plan in speeches and briefings.  At a White House news conference, Louis Sullivan, secretary of the Health and Human Services Department, said that under the Bush plan, the government would create 210,000 to 360,000 new slots to treat drug addicts during the next year.  That seems unlikely given the amount the president proposes to add to the treatment budget -- $321 million -- and the prolonged process by which federal money moves from Washington to state and local treatment programs, according to experts in the field.  Even at the low end of that projection, Mr. Sullivan estimates new treatment slots would cost about $1,530 each -- "lower than you can do outpatient methadone treatment, which is the cheapest kind there is," said Karst Besteman, executive director of the Alcohol and Drug Problems Association, a Washington advocacy group.  In a separate session with reporters, the White House director of drug policy scolded Democratic critics who have called for more spending than the president's $7.9 billion proposal.  Drug czar William Bennett said that amount was almost $2 billion more than what Congress has agreed to spend in fiscal 1990.  In fact, however, it was President Bush who in February proposed to spend $5.96 billion on anti-drug programs next fiscal year.  A sudden burst of buying in the financial futures market provided a brief lift to bonds and capped an otherwise listless trading day.  The benchmark 30-year Treasury bond rose more than 1/4 point, or over $2.50 for each $1,000 face amount.  The issue's yield, which moves in the opposite direction from its price, fell to 8.10% from 8.13% Tuesday.  But shorter-term Treasurys ended unchanged to slightly higher.  Corporate, municipal and mortgage-backed securities were flat to as much as 1/4 point higher.  Some bond traders cautioned investors against reading too much into the late afternoon advance because trading volume remained extremely light and prices were stuck in narrow trading ranges.  Before the late-day turnaround, bond prices had meandered for most of the day.  "It was a battle to get the market to move at all," said James Capra, a senior vice president at Shearson Lehman Government Securities Inc.  "As the market moved up a tick, a few investors lined up to sell, and when the market moved down a tick, another group lined up to buy."  A "tick" is bond market jargon for 1/32 percentage point.  Joel Kazis, the head of trading at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co., said the bulk of yesterday's buying came from speculators and dealers who were rushing to cover short positions.  "When long-term bonds outperform other bonds, it often means that the buying is of a speculative nature," he said.  In a short sale, dealers sell borrowed securities and later seek to make a profit by buying the securities back at a lower price to replace what was borrowed.  Mr. Kazis said the buying began in the futures trading pit and quickly spread to the cash market.  December bond futures rose about 1/4 point to settle at 97 4/32, the high for the day.  Some dealers said investors were heartened by the firmer tone in the face of negative economic reports.  "The market waded through some pretty bad news today," said Joseph Liro, a vice president and money market economist at S.G. Warburg Securities & Co. "Auto sales were much stronger than expected, and the lack of {Federal Reserve} activity with federal funds at 9 1/4% was also a negative," he said.  The federal funds rate, which banks charge each other on overnight loans, rose to a high of 9 3/8% at one point in the day but settled at 9%.  Economists said the firmness in the rate was because of technical factors and was unlikely to have policy significance.  Banks borrow from each other, if necessary, to keep average daily reserves over a two-week period at certain minimum levels.  The federal funds rate fluctuates wildly on the last days of these periods, such as yesterday.  Meanwhile, domestic auto sales are estimated to have reached a seasonally adjusted annual rate of 7.9 million units in the Aug. 21-31 selling period, according to calculations based on sales data reported yesterday by major manufacturers.  The consensus view had been for sales at a 7.4 million-unit pace.  "People who sold the market after the auto sales data and the lack of Fed intervention did not get any satisfaction from being short," said Mr. Liro.  "They could not knock the market down, and when prices started to do better, they had to cover those shorts."  Treasury, Agency Securities  Treasury securities were unchanged to modestly higher.  The benchmark 30-year bond was quoted late at a price of 100 4/32, compared with 99 27/32 Tuesday.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted late at a price of 98 26/32 to yield 8.16%, compared with a price of 98 22/32 and yield of 8.18% Tuesday.  Two-year notes were unchanged at 99 23/32 to yield 8.34%.  Short-term rates moved lower.  The discount rate on three-month Treasury bills was 7.82% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.07%, while the rate on six-month Treasury bills was 7.81% for a bond-equivalent yield of 8.22%.  In the agency sector, the Federal National Mortgage Association said its $600 million in new seven-year debentures due Sept. 10, 1996, were priced at par to yield 8.625%.  The agency's $500 million of 10-year indexed debentures with a 9.15% coupon were priced at 99.30 to yield 9.165%.  The sinking-fund debentures are "indexed" because the sinking-fund payments are pegged to any changes in the rate on the 10-year Treasury note.  If there is little or no change in the rate on the 10-year note, which stood at 8.19% when the issue was priced, the average life of the debentures will be 5.4 years.  If the rate on the 10-year note falls, the amount of sinking-fund payments will increase, resulting in a shorter average life.  And if the rate on the 10-year note rises, the amount of sinking-fund payments will decrease, resulting in a longer average life.  Corporate Issues  Corporate bonds ended 1/8 point higher.  Among new issues, a subsidiary of New Zealand's Fletcher Challenge Industries Ltd. offered $125 million of 10-year Yankee bonds.  Yankees are dollar-denominated bonds issued in the U.S. by foreign companies.  The offering, by Fletcher Challenge Industries Finance U.S.A. Ltd., has an unusual twist -- they are backed by a letter of credit from the Industrial Bank of Japan Ltd. in New York.  The non-callable notes were priced to yield 9.09%.  Household Finance Corp. offered $150 million of 10-year notes via competitive bidding.  The issue was won by Goldman, Sachs & Co. and reoffered to investors at a price to yield 8.962%.  Foreign Bonds  Prices of Japanese government bonds fell sharply in early trading, but the slide halted later as comments from Bank of Japan officials curbed the dollar's surge against the yen and soothed anxiety about interest rates.  Concern about the dollar's strength and the prospect for higher interest rates has eroded sentiment in the Japanese government bond market for two weeks.  During that time, the yield on the benchmark issue rose more than 1/4 percentage point.  The benchmark's yield was headed to 5.3% when a Bank of Japan official was reported as saying the central bank is considering measures other than intervention to hold down the U.S. dollar.  Further heartening the yen bond market was Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita's indication that the central bank won't tolerate higher yen interest rates in the fight to turn the dollar lower.  Japan's benchmark No. 111 4.6% bond due 1998 ended on brokers' screens at 96.03, down 0.43 point to yield 5.26%.  British government bonds ended lower for the fifth straight day, confounding analysts who thought the market was due for a rebound.  The Treasury's bellwether 11 3/4% gilt due 2003/2007 fell 6/32 to 113 27/32 to yield 9.85%, while the 11 3/4% issue due 1995 was unchanged at 99 11/32 to yield 12.22%.  West German government bonds drifted lower on fears of higher interest rates, even though most economists don't expect the Bundesbank's policy-setting council to boost key rates anytime soon.  The Treasury's 6 3/4% bond due June 1999 fell 0.20 point to 99.10 to yield 6.87%, while the 6 3/4% notes due 1994 were unchanged at 99.00 to yield 7%.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities generally gained 3/32 after light trading.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for September delivery ended at 97 5/32, up 3/32; 9 1/2% securities at 99 8/32, up 3/32; 10% securities at 101 3/8, up 3/32; and Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. 9% securities at 96 9/32, also up 3/32.  The Ginnie Mae 9% issue was yielding 9.53% to a 12-year average life assumption, as the spread above the 10-year Treasury widened 0.01 percentage point to 1.36.  Municipals  Municipal bonds finished steady to 1/4 point higher in slow trading.  The closely watched New Jersey Turnpike Authority's 7.20% issue due 2018 finished 1/8 higher at 98 1/8, to yield 7.35%.  Among new issues priced yesterday was Alaska Energy Authority's $100 million of power revenue bonds, First Series, for the Bradley Lake Hydro-Electric Project.  The bonds were priced by a John Nuveen & Co. group to yield from 6.30% in 1992 to 7.33% in 2018.  Meanwhile, a First Boston Corp. group priced Indiana Health Facility Financing Authority's $75 million of hospital revenue bonds.  The insured bonds, for Lutheran Hospital of Indiana Inc., were priced to yield about 7.29% in 2019.  But some traders said the spotlight is still on California's $385 million of general obligation Veterans bonds, which are scheduled for competitive bidding today.  Separately, a federal judge approved $584 million of settlements of litigation stemming from Washington Public Power Supply System's 1983 default on $2.25 billion of bonds.  WPPSS's $450 million bond offering is expected to be priced next week by lead managers Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  Woodfield Lexus, a dealership in Schaumburg, Ill., has taken orders for 37 luxury cars of Toyota Motor Corp.'s new division and it hasn't even opened its doors yet.  Construction on the Lexus division dealership won't be complete until November or December but General Manager Phill Ceraulo, said it will begin shipping vehicles as soon "as we have a roof."  Such speed in getting cars to market is part of efforts by Lexus, Toyota's first luxury-car division, to get a strong sales start in the U.S., particularly to compete with Nissan Motor Corp., whose new luxury-car division, Infiniti, is scheduled to begin sales in November.  Lexus sold nearly all of about 1,000 cars it sent to dealers in August and expects to reach its goal of selling 5,000 cars this month, said J. Davis Illingworth, vice president and general manager of the Lexus division, in a recent interview.  However, both Lexus and its competitors caution that it is too early to determine how well Lexus will do once the initial hype fades.  Competitors also said they can't tell yet what effect Lexus will have on the rest of the market.  "We don't know if they're going to take from us or bring their own buyers along," said a spokesman at Mercedes-Benz of North America.  Lexus's 70 or so dealers began receiving cars on Aug. 2.  Robert Longpre, a dealer in suburban Los Angeles, said he sold all 50 of his August cars and has taken another 30 orders.  Many customers wrote out a check for the entire purchase price, he said.  The Lexus dealership in Coral Gables, Fla., has kept its showroom open until midnight so people can test-drive cars.  Lexus plans to sell 16,000 cars in the last four months of this year and 75,000 cars in 1990.  That would put it behind the pace of Honda Motor Co.'s Acura luxury car division, which sold 109,470 cars in 1987, its first full year of operation.  However, Mr. Illingworth said the comparison is unfair, because the least expensive Acura, the Integra model, is priced far below the ES 250, which starts at $20,050.  He sees the ES 250 competing with the top-of-the-line Acura Legend, while the Lexus LS 400, with a base price of $35,000, would compete with cars made by Mercedes-Benz, BMW and Jaguar.  That is consistent with patterns dealers report.  Mr. Longpre said buyers are trading in mainly Japanese cars for the ES 250 and European cars for the more upscale LS 400.  Lexus's own internal estimates call for only 10% of sales to come at the expense of U.S. car makers.  Lexus of Brookfield in Brookfield, Wis., has sold 58 cars so far.  Trade-ins include some relatively predictable models: a 1984 Rolls Royce Silver Spur, a Porsche 928, Toyota Cressida, Acura Legend, Saab 9000 turbo and Lincoln Continental and Town Car.  One buyer, however, traded in two cars -- a 1979 Pontiac Grand Prix and a 1980 Volvo -- for an ES 250, paying cash for the difference between the value of the trade ins and the purchase price.  RJR Nabisco Inc. has agreed to sell the tropical-fruit business of its Del Monte foods unit for about $875 million to Polly Peck International PLC, according to European market sources.  An announcement is expected as early as today by Polly Peck, a London-based food and electronics company little known outside Europe.  The Del Monte unit being acquired sells bananas and pineapples.  If completed, the sale will be the second major step toward RJR's plan to sell about $5.5 billion in food assets by early 1990.  How those divestitures proceed will play a big part in determining the success of the record $25 billion leveraged buy-out of RJR by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. completed early this year.  Unlike the first major asset sale, the $2.5 billion purchase announced in June of five European food businesses by BSN S.A. in France, the Del Monte auction hasn't resulted in a quick sale that exceeds expectations by a wide margin.  The tropical-fruit business only represents about $675 million of Del Monte's expected 1989 sales of $2.6 billion.  The investment bank representing RJR in the Del Monte auction, Goldman, Sachs & Co., is still talking to potential buyers of Del Monte's canned-food business.  That unit, expected to have about $1.9 billion in 1989 sales, is likely to be sold later this month.  RJR assigned Goldman to explore a possible sale of Del Monte in March, and analysts have been expecting a price for the entire company of between $2.5 billion and $3 billion.  According to people familiar with the sales process, Goldman first asked for bids for the entire business, then later asked for bids on the two pieces.  Goldman executives declined to comment.  The tropical-fruit price is 1.3 times expected 1989 sales and a robust 13 times expected 1989 pretax operating profit of about $70 million.  If that multiple of sales were achieved for the canned-food segment, the total price for both Del Monte units of $3.38 billion would far exceed expectations.  But the canned-food business may not fetch such high multiples.  That's because even though it is stable and mature, canned goods is "a declining business," according to food analyst John McMillin of Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  The food industry has been moving away from canned packaging and toward preservation methods such as freezing.  The canned-food business is expected to have 1989 operating profit of about $160 million.  Polly Peck is a fast-growing company 25%-owned by its chairman, Asil Nadier, 47 years old.  It had 1988 profit of $183 million on sales of $1.2 billion.  Its profits have been doubling annually since 1980, and buying the Del Monte fruit business will boost its sales by more than 50%.  Advised on the purchase by CS First Boston Group, Polly Peck expects to obtain financing from bank debt and a stock offering.  The British company already sells citrus fruit and vegetables grown in the Middle East under the brand name of Sunzest, which account for about half its sales.  It also makes computer peripherals, television sets and videocassette recorders, as well as clothing.  Much of its manufacturing is done in Turkey.  Polly Peck recently acquired two U.S. food distributors, Prevor Marketing International in New York and Mendelson-Zeller in Fresno, Calif.  Among other bidders rumored to have been interested in Del Monte's pineapple and banana operations were Castle & Cooke Inc., which sells Dole pineapples, and United Brands Co., which sells Chiquita bananas.  But each of those companies was thought to face antitrust questions that could have impeded a purchase.  Ampco-Pittsburgh Corp., which had said it may seek control of Midway Airlines Inc., said it raised its stake in the Chicago carrier to 9.6% from 6.6%.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Ampco disclosed that from Aug. 10 to Sept. 5 it bought 297,400 Midway common shares at $19 to $21 each.  The purchases bring the company's total holdings in Midway to 960,000 shares.  In Chicago, a Midway spokeswoman declined to comment, saying she hadn't seen the filing.  But she reiterated that Midway wants to remain independent.  Early last month, Ampco's initial disclosure of a stake in Midway sent the carrier's stock higher on speculation that Ampco might launch a takeover bid.  Midway subsequently tightened its takeover defenses.  In composite New York Stock Exchange trading yesterday, Midway closed at $20.625, up $1.625.  Ampco, based in Pittsburgh, produces rolls for steel and aluminum rolling mills and other industrial products.  With all the high-minded and obfuscating talk of shareholder benefit that swirls around takeover battles, it is refreshing to encounter a novel that unsparingly reveals the passions and motives behind the rhetoric.  Mark Probst's "Winter Losses" (Farrar, Strauss & Giroux, 311 pages, $18.95) is a convincing tale of a takeover and its effects on a conscientious lawyer in a midsized Manhattan law firm.  Philip Kreg has the kind of job many lawyers once coveted as a lifetime sinecure-counsel to a foundation owning a controlling stake in a manufacturing company called Brandt Systems.  Kreg's steady billings to Brandt seem secure, guaranteeing his position as a respected partner in his firm.  All that is theatened when Marcu, a glamorous European corporate raider, begins accumulating shares in Brandt.  Kreg knows only too well that the foundation's dividend income doesn't even come close to matching the returns "any child could generate" from the proceeds of selling its Brandt stock.  As such observations indicate, Kreg is unusually candid, dangerously so in the view of many of his friends and colleagues.  He is keenly aware of his own fiduciary obligations to the foundation, "fiduciary duty" being one of those abstractions so often invoked in real takeover battles but rarely taken seriously by the players.  With the exception of Kreg, Mr. Probst's characters display scant concern for such notions, using them cleverly as a smokescreen for their own greed.  Mr. Kreg's client is similarly self-interested.  "One thing we should be doing," he says, "is fixing some of us with some contracts.  Those golden parachutes.  Somebody buys the company, I want to be able to show him a piece of paper that says he has to give me a lot of money."  Kreg finds the fat-cat system repulsive, but can't help wondering whether he should cut a deal with Marcu that could enrich him for the rest of his life.  "Winter Losses" isn't only a takeover novel.  Much of the action revolves around Kreg's only child, Adam, an astonishingly self-absorbed, amoral, and ultimately self-destructive young man who vanishes into a shadowy world of cash and violence just as Kreg is trying to contend with Marcu's takeover bid.  Kreg is divorced from his alcoholic former wife and his relationship with a new companion is tenuous.  Mr. Probst makes his complicated life seem a plausible, if not inevitable, consequence of the work-dominated lives of many Manhattan professionals.  ---  Meet some thoroughly unpleasant characters in "Stark Truth" (Houghton Mifflin, 304 pages, $18.95) by Peter Freeborn: Stark Thompson, a well-born trusts and estates lawyer ripe for a mid-life crisis, and Kitty Goldmark, the beautiful insider trader who provokes it.  The insider trading ring of which Ms. Goldmark is a part manages to amass some $180 million in illegal profits (that's about 18 times what Dennis Levine made) with nary a phone call from a stock-exchange investigator.  Where, in this post-Boesky era of sophisticated computer surveillance, is the Securities and Exchange Commission?  Stark is soon swept away by his affair with Ms. Goldmark, quits his law firm, and tries to take over the family trust funds in a Machiavellian scheme.  At Ms. Goldmark's behest, he also undergoes an unconvincing personality transformation from stodgy lawyer to sexual athlete.  Insider trading evolves into murder, all in the name of obsessive love.  Some of the details suggest that Mr. Freeborn, who uses a pseudonym, is a lawyer.  He most certainly is not a good writer.  There are numerous portentous references to a future calamity, which is disappointing when it arrives.  "Stark Truth" only perpetuates the baseless stereotype that insider trading is a peculiarly Jewish crime.  Not only does the Jewish Ms. Goldmark prove the downfall of the hitherto respectable Stark, but an old-line, Waspy investment banking firm is seriously damaged by the criminal misdeeds of its Jewish partner.  Like Kreg's law firm in "Winter Losses," Stark's firm is being torn by economic pressures, with senior partners forced to generate more clients and billings or accept Draconian cuts in their income.  Is this a trend in real law firms, or is it the paranoia of lawyer-authors whose writing is reducing their billable hours?  ---  The title of "A Killing in Venture Capital" (Walker & Co., 208 pages, $19.95) by Margaret Logan is about as clever as this murder mystery gets.  A fledgling bio-tech company is about to go public in an initial stock offering that promises to make several of its officers and backers extremely rich.  David Benoit, the company's young chief financial officer, discovers something that looks as if it could derail the offering.  Predictably, David ends up dead.  The motive is obvious and the suspects are a pretty small group.  Even so, how the sleuths in this tale -- David's male lover and his lover's cousin, a venture capitalist -- deduce the identity of the murderer escaped this reader.  Armchair detectives seeking any fresh insights into venture capital or gay relationships will be disappointed.  They are little more than window dressing for a mystery that never seems anything but banal.  ---  Mr. Stewart is the Journal's page-one editor.  Led by shares of Liz Claiborne and other big issues, the Nasdaq over-the-counter market fell sharply in moderate trading.  The Nasdaq Composite Index tumbled 2.17, or about 0.5%, to 469.25, on 136.4 million shares.  The New York Stock Exchange Composite Index lost almost 0.9%.  All of the Nasdaq industry groups were lower.  The weakest was the Utility Index, which fell 4.05 to 739.05.  Tele-Communications, one of the market's largest stocks, fell 3/4 to 39 on volume of 413,600 shares after it agreed to raise the price it will pay for the remaining shares it doesn't own of Westmarc Communications.  Tele-Communications agreed to pay $32.25 a share for the stock, up from the $31.75 previously agreed on.  Overall, bigger OTC stocks posted sizable declines.  The Nasdaq Financial Index fell 1.21 to 467.05 and the Nasdaq 100 Index, of which Liz Claiborne is a part, dropped 3.82 to 443.34.  The dressmaker's stock tumbled 1 1/8 to 25 7/8 on 1.3 million shares.  This newspaper's Inside Track column said Securities and Exchange Commission filings disclosed that five insiders, including the company's new chairman and its president, have sold chunks of Liz Claiborne stock since May.  Yesterday, additional insider filings with the SEC disclosed that Liz Claiborne and her husband Arthur Ortenberg, who serve as directors of the apparel company but are retired from its day-to-day management, each sold an 8.5% stake in the company between Aug. 3 and Aug. 10.  The Ortenbergs sold a total of 400,000 shares for $10 million, according to SEC filings.  The company's chief financial officer, Sam Miller, said the sales aren't "anything out of the ordinary" because the couple periodically has been selling shares to diversify their portfolios.  He added that the two "haven't indicated any lack of confidence" in the current management.  At the top of the OTC most-active list was MCI Communications, which ended unchanged at 39 1/4.  Merrill Lynch chose MCI and International Business Machines to design and operate an advanced network management and control system for its world-wide telecommunications network.  The $50 million, five-year contract is an addition to a $150 million contract awarded to MCI by Merrill Lynch in June for world-wide voice and data services.  Also on the most active list, Brite Voice Systems, a new issue, closed at 14, up 1/2 from its opening price and up from its offering price of 12 1/2.  Tony Cecin, director of equity trading at Piper, Jaffray & Hopwood in Minneapolis, said there was strong individual investor interest in the shares.  Brite Voice makes interactive voice response systems for telephones.  Piper Jaffray was lead underwriter for the offering.  In a last-minute revision to the offering prospectus, the Wichita, Kan.-based company told potential investors that a major customer is dissatisfied with an audiotex system it purchased from Brite Voice and has yet to pay the balance of its bill.  The dispute could end up in court, the company warns in the prospectus.  But in an interview, Brite Voice officials insist that the problem has been resolved and that it expects the customer to pay.  Elcotel gained 3/8 to 2 7/8.  The company announced that it is designing a billing control module to be installed in facsimile equipment supplied by "a major Japanese manufacturer."  The company said the billing module will provide unsupervised machines with a commercial credit card reader to collect, store and forward billing data.  Wolohan Lumber climbed 1 1/4 to 19.  The stock was the pick of Neil Eigen, a portfolio manager at Integrated Resources, in this newspaper's monthly stock-picking feature, which pits analysts against throws of darts onto stock listings.  Varitronic Systems gained 1 3/8 to 12 1/8.  The company is expected to report financial results for the fiscal year ended in July.  The rise puzzled some traders and analysts, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report, because the company is expected to earn less than the 33 cents a share of a year earlier.  ---  Alexandra Peers contributed to this article.  Ariel Sharon's autobiography, "Warrior" (Simon & Schuster, 571 pages, $24.95), summons up vivid memories.  In June 1967, with Egyptian tanks pouring into the Sinai and Jordan and Syria mobilizing forces along Israel's borders, I was camped with other correspondents at the Tel Aviv Hilton.  A Danish TV newscaster, feeling the pressure, issued a lament that echoed down the hall: "What's going to happen to this poor little country?"  What happened, of course, is history.  The Israeli Defense Forces defeated the combined armies of five Arab nations in six days.  In the 19 years since Israel's war of independence, the IDF had become a formidable fighting force, likely the best, man for man, in the world.  Ariel Sharon deserved much of the credit.  He had trained the paratroops and tankers.  He conducted a decisive battle, routing the Egyptian forces at Abu Agheila to open the way for the Israeli dash to the East Bank of the Suez Canal.  Mr. Sharon's book, written with David Chanoff, has three levels, military, political and personal.  Soldiers and military historians will learn much from his accounts of battle management.  Describing the Abu Agheila clash, Mr. Sharon tells of his comrade Avraham Yoffe sending a tank brigade between dueling Egyptian and Sharon tanks, emerging unscathed to forge deeper into the Sinai interior.  Mr. Sharon denies that he was the "king of improvization."  He believed in meticulous planning, but he planned battles in such a way as to create the unexpected, believing that the Arabs, while brave, often could not cope effectively with surprises.  He told his troops that they would never be left behind on a battlefield, even if recovering Israeli wounded or dead meant further casualties.  The confidence and solidarity this engendered more than offset the risks, he believed.  He drilled his officers constantly on the importance of knowing the terrain intimately to gain tactical advantage, especially during night fights.  His explorations of the Sinai during the 1956 effort to block Gamal Abdel Nasser's takeover of the Strait of Tiran and the Suez Canal stood him in good stead in the Six-Day and Yom Kippur wars.  Interestingly, he makes little mention of how that 1956 effort, made jointly with the British and French, was undermined by U.S. Secretary of State John Foster Dulles.  Some historians rank this as one of the greatest postwar U.S. foreign policy blunders.  Mr. Sharon's maverick image originated with the 1956 campaign.  Ordered, mysteriously, to stay out of the strategic Mitla Pass, he requested permission to recover his wounded.  But in doing that he also seized the pass, opening the way to the Western Sinai.  IDF commanders were as combative in strategy sessions as with the enemy, and Mr. Sharon was usually in the thick of the fights.  Yet in the 1973 Yom Kippur war, he clearly saved Israel from a major defeat by demanding from a reluctant and confused high command permission to strike across the Suez Canal at Anwar Sadat's Soviet-supplied anti-aircraft (SAM) batteries, which were keeping the Israeli air force at bay.  Later, the IDF changed its war doctrine to allow a field commander, subject to later court martial review, to disobey the orders of officers in the rear if it was clear they had no grasp of the tactical situation.  "Warrior" draws much of its richness from Mr. Sharon's gentler side, however.  He gives a vivid account of a tour through Africa in 1964 with Mr. Yoffe and their discovery of a Jewish tribe in the wilds of Gondar, high on the Ethiopian escarpment.  These Jews had been cut off from mainstream Judaism for millenia, "yet still they nurtured their racial memories and they treasured their connection."  After Camp David, Mr. Sharon entertained at his farm the Egyptian officers he had fought against in the Yom Kippur war.  "I had never seen their faces before, but their voices were all familiar.  In 1973, I had listened to them on the radio net."  Mr. Sharon's personal tragedies have a Biblical quality.  His young wife, Gali, was killed in an auto crash, leaving him with their five-year-old son, Gur.  Later, Gur was killed by a playmate's accidental discharge of an antique shotgun.  In the Yom Kippur war, Mr. Sharon saw many of his dearest comrades fall in battle, which no doubt contributed to his bitterness about the conduct of that war.  Later, Mr. Sharon married Gali's sister, Lily, and they have two sons, Gilad and Omri.  Mr. Sharon's individualism no doubt owes much to his parents.  His father, Samuil, and his mother, Vera, fled to Israel from Tiflis in 1921 to escape the Red Army, which had no love for Zionists.  Vera was never a very strong Zionist, and Samuil was not a socialist, which often put them at odds with the other residents of Kfar Malal, their "moshav," or farm cooperative, on the Plain of Sharon.  When young "Arik" was growing up, Jews and Arabs rubbed shoulders daily in Palestine.  That changed when refugees from the Holocaust began clamoring for admission against Arab resistance and British temporizing.  Further exacerbating the tensions, the Soviets began to promote Arab socialism, fomenting hatred of Jews as a unifying theme.  The Soviets have sponsored almost every major assault on Israel and have not given up their Mideast designs.  Which brings us to today's Ariel Sharon, who as a leader of the conservative Likud government coalition is a major factor in Israeli politics.  As minister of defense in 1982, Mr. Sharon launched an offensive against the Soviet-equipped PLO army in Lebanon in response to shellings of Israel's northern villages.  As usual, the offensive was a military success.  It resulted in the expulsion of a part of the PLO force from Lebanon and blocked off Syrian intervention.  But it also brought Mr. Sharon a major political setback.  Christian forces, entering the West Beirut neighborhoods of Sabra and Shatilla to try to rout out PLO fighters, massacred Moslem non-combatants.  Mr. Sharon was accused of instigating the massacre as a reprisal for the murder of Lebanese president Bashir Gemayel, who had become Mr. Sharon's friend.  An inquiry commission absolved Mr. Sharon of that charge, although holding him "indirectly" responsible.  He later won a "blood libel" action against Time magazine for its claim of a "secret appendix" to the commission report alleging Sharon complicity.  But the Israeli left used the Sabra-Shatilla affair as a cue for attacking the Menachem Begin government, and the hue and cry was picked up by leftists internationally.  Mr. Begin asked Mr. Sharon to resign as minister of defense, although he continued in the government as a minister without portfolio.  Mr. Sharon is seldom critical of the U.S., a country he much admires despite the State Department's often-inept Mideast interventions.  But he clearly is bitter about the bloodshed that has wracked Lebanon since the U.S. and his enemies, in effect, took matters out of his hands.  Which brings me another memory of 1967, giving three Israeli soldiers a lift in my rented car on the road to Jerusalem in the last stages of the Six-Day War.  "Are you going to give back the land you conquered?"  I asked.  They looked at me mystified.  Of course not.  Israel did give back some land to Egypt in exchange for peace.  But Mr. Sharon cites a maxim he told his soldiers: "To get the wagon up the hill, first you have to find a stone to put under the wheel.  First is the stone.  We should be secure, first of all, to enable normal life.  Then we have to deal with all the rest."  "Warrior" will open new and rancorous debates in Israel's tempestuous politics.  But the book may serve Mr. Sharon's political goals nonetheless by reminding Israelis how often, over 41 years, they have needed that stone.  ---  Mr. Melloan is deputy editor of the Journal's editorial page.  Pagurian Corp. and Canadian Express Ltd. said they plan to sell a total of 60.6 million Pagurian Class A nonvoting shares for gross proceeds of about C$288 million (US$243.8 million).  Pagurian said it will issue 34.9 million Class A shares from treasury for sale to the public at 8.25 Canadian dollars each under a previously reported agreement.  Canadian Express said it will sell its 25.7 million Pagurian shares, for gross proceeds of about C$212 million, as part of a program to reduce the cross holdings between the two companies.  Pagurian recently sold its stake in Canadian Express.  Canadian Express, a Toronto-based holding company which is 24% held by Hees International Bancorp Inc., said the shares will be offered first to its own shareholders and then to the public.  Pagurian, also a Toronto-based holding company, has about 50 million Class A shares outstanding.  Bethlehem Steel Corp. agreed to buy an additional 12.5% interest in an electrogalvanizing facility at Walbridge, Ohio, from Inland Steel Industries Inc., Chicago.  Neither company would disclose the proposed sale price.  Electrogalvanizing is a cold electroplating process for applying zinc and other materials to the surface of steel to provide corrosion resistance.  The auto industry is increasing its use of corrosion-resistant steel to reduce rust problems, greatly expanding the market for the product.  Currently, Bethlehem and Inland each own 25% of the facility, and Pre Finish Metals Inc., which operates the plant, owns 50%.  The plant has the capacity to coat 400,000 tons of steel sheet annually, and Bethlehem and Inland each take 50% of the output.  After the transaction, Bethlehem Steel, Bethlehem, Pa., will own a 37.5% interest and take 75% of the output.  Inland will own 12.5% and take 25% of the ouput.  The transaction will occur after a new facility, jointly owned by Inland and Nippon Steel Corp. of Japan, begins operating in the first half of 1992, the companies said.  The Inland-Nippon facility near New Carlisle, Ind., will have a total capacity to coat 900,000 tons of steel a year, including electrogalvanizing 400,000 tons, Inland said.  Arby's Inc. named a new president as executives and franchisees continued their struggle to gain control of the restaurant company.  Arby's -- part of DWG Corp., the Miami holding company controlled by financier Victor Posner -- said its board elected Irving Riese president.  Mr. Riese is a principal at Riese Organization, a closely held New York company that controls more than 500 restaurants and real-estate operations in 33 states.  Mr. Riese's appointment came one day after Leonard H. Roberts was fired as president and chief executive officer of Arby's.  That dismissal was prompted by Mr. Roberts's decision to resign as vice chairman and director of DWG, a resignation that was accompanied by a blistering attack on what Mr. Roberts described as Mr. Posner's heavy-handed style of management.  The personnel changes are the latest in a series of actions that have buffeted DWG, one of the few bright spots in Mr. Posner's embattled empire.  Since April, DWG has been fighting a $22-a-share, $572 million, hostile bid from New York investor Andrew Heine.  Last week, a group of Arby's franchisees bid more than $200 million for Arby's Inc., the marketing, franchising and service company for the 2,100 restaurants in the chain.  Mr. Posner, who has said he holds 46.5% of DWG's common stock, rejected the franchisees' bid.  The appointment of Mr. Riese sparked mixed reactions -- and a good deal of confusion -- among franchisees and executives at Arby's.  Initially, a spokesman for Mr. Posner indicated that Murray Riese, who is also a principal at Riese Organization and the brother of Irving, might become Arby's next president.  That idea was rejected out of hand by AFA Service Corp., an organization owned by Arby's franchisees.  AFA described Murray Riese as "totally unacceptable" because the restaurants controlled by Riese Organization, including Burger King, Pizza Hut and others, are direct competitors with Arby's.  Late yesterday, however, Mr. Posner finally announced that Irving Riese would be Arby's president.  Frank Belatti, executive vice president of marketing at Arby's and president of AFA, said he and other senior executives had met with both brothers.  The result: "They asked us to stay, and we agreed to do that," Mr. Belatti said.  Although Mr. Belatti said the decision to stay was a difficult one, he said he believed "It was important to the employees and franchisees that they have some continuity in the business.  Otherwise, we would have been abandoning the people who worked for us and trusted us."  Mr. Belatti declined to say how the battle for ownership of the company should be resolved.  But he added: "I hope for the sake of the business and the employees that it is resolved quickly."  Former U.S. Attorney Rudolph Giuliani concedes that he has run a pretty dismal campaign for New York City mayor so far.  As a candidate, he has antagonized both sides of the abortion battle, played defense instead of offense on such issues as crime and his law firm's links to Panama and failed to articulate a vision for the city.  "Right now, I see Rudy standing at the edge of an open airplane without a parachute, about to jump into a total freefall," said Scott Miller, a political consultant for the Sawyer/Miller Group.  "And once you're headed down, it's difficult to go back up."  Yet, many people haven't written off Mr. Giuliani.  He is expected to prevail over Ronald Lauder in Tuesday's Republican primary and could get back on track by November's general election.  "I made mistakes," says the former U.S. attorney.  "The transition from prosecutor to candidate is not an easy one."  For one thing, Mr. Giuliani acknowledges, he has acted too much like the lawyer he is, arguing each issue to the bitter end, whether or not such a practice was politically wise.  But Mr. Giuliani insists his missteps don't reflect on his ability to govern.  "I try hard not to make the same mistakes twice," he says.  By his own reckoning, the 45-year-old Mr. Giuliani was not prepared for the street fighting that has marked his race for the Republican nomination.  He says in an interview that he did not expect Mr. Lauder's more than $11 million barrage of negative advertising, much of which aims at casting doubt on Mr. Giuliani's commitment to crime-fighting.  One Lauder campaign advertisement refers to Mr. Giuliani as "a liberal" for calling the death penalty only "a limited deterrent" to crime prevention.  Heir to the Estee Lauder cosmetics fortune and former U.S. ambassador to Austria, Mr. Lauder has made up for his political inexperience by hiring Republican Party operatives and spending more money than all the other candidates combined.  The latest poll gives Mr. Lauder 30% of the Republican primary vote -- up sharply from earlier tallies.  When Mr. Giuliani announced his departure from the U.S. attorney's office in January, some people thought the mayor's job was his for the asking.  The New York Post ran his picture -- gun in hand -- and a headline that said: "Crime buster Giuliani steps down: Good news for bad guys."  Polls placed him ahead of his leading Democratic rivals, Manhattan Borough President David Dinkins and Mayor Edward I. Koch, by as much as 20 percentage points.  He lags by about the same amount today.  People stopped him in the street for a chance to shake the hand of the man whose office prosecuted mob bosses, insider trader Ivan Boesky and former Bronx Democratic leader Stanley Friedman.  Jimmy Breslin said flatly in his Newsday column: "The city election began and ended when he announced that he was leaving the job of U.S. attorney."  A former McGovern Democrat whose ideological evolution toward the right roughly coincided with his upward career in the Reagan administration's Justice Department, Mr. Giuliani seemed to have hit the political scene at the right time.  Mayor Koch's popularity was at low ebb, in part because of a municipal corruption scandal implicating some of his top political aides and allies.  Such black leaders as Harlem Congressman Charles Rangel called for the defeat of the mayor after 12 years of what they characterized as his hostility to their community.  And many civic leaders said publicly it was time for Mr. Koch, 64, to step down.  Still, if Mr. Giuliani emerges victorious in the Republican primary, he will likely be an underdog against either Mr. Dinkins, 62, or Mayor Koch, who is running neck and neck with Mr. Dinkins.  Mr. Koch, whose voluble style masks a knack for making political hay out of almost any situation, has heaped more abuse on Mr. Giuliani than on Mr. Dinkins, whom he still must defeat in the Democratic primary.  The Giuliani camp believes that once the primaries are over and the public focuses on Mr. Giuliani as the Republican candidate, his fortunes will rise.  For this to happen, political analysts say, Mr. Giuliani must articulate more clearly what he stands for -- and how his mayoralty would improve the city.  In speeches and campaign literature, he has used such catch-words as "independent" and "integrity," lauded his crime-fighting ability and proclaimed that the city lacks leadership.  "I'm younger than they are," he says of his opponents.  "I'm the only one who can lead a crusade to save New York City."  Since July, the job of getting past the platitudes and resuscitating the campaign has belonged to President Bush's former media adviser, Roger Ailes.  "Ailes's role has been to make him less verbose and more attuned to television," says Giuliani adviser Raymond Harding, who heads the city's Liberal Party, which has placed Mr. Giuliani on its ticket.  "Rudy is learning that New York City politics is not {the federal courthouse at} Foley Square."  Mr. Giuliani seems to be paying attention.  In a recent TV debate with Mr. Lauder, he appeared more self-controlled than usual, answering questions in clipped sentences instead of offering up the rambling explanations that marred previous appearances.  "Ronnie {Lauder} doesn't really understand suffering.  Suffering to him is the butler taking the night off," Mr. Giuliani said in an uncharacteristically humorous aside.  One thing he still may need to learn, politicians say, is when to drop an issue that might be winnable in a courtroom but is a sure loser in a political campaign.  The best example of his failure in this area was his handling of the disclosure that the law firm he had recently joined, White & Case, represented the government of Panama, led by alleged drug-runner Gen. Manuel Noriega.  According to people close to the situation, Mr. Giuliani's political aides advised dismissing the episode as a non-issue and moving on.  Instead, the candidate gave the story long life by slugging it out with a media willing to let the story drag on, Mr. Giuliani concedes.  "I should have treated it as a frivolous allegation," he says.  Mr. Giuliani seems convinced that he is being held to a different standard than the other candidates.  In a recent interview, he complained about press treatment and said Mr. Lauder's campaign has "distorted" the issues.  He said negative news stories had "reached a point where it became fun to do it."  He also accused Mayor Koch's political consultant David Garth and Mr. Lauder's staff of planting negative stories about him, though such tactics are standard operating procedure in campaigns.  Finally, he complained that his proposals on housing and drug abuse were not picked up by the media when he proposed them, but nearly identical proposals got publicity for other candidates when they proposed them later.  "If you were to add up all the negative stories written about me, they would be greater than the combined negative stories about all the other candidates," he said.  Ove Sorensen, formerly senior vice president, marketing and sales, of Pepsi-Cola International, a unit of PepsiCo Inc., was named president and chief executive officer of Haagen-Dazs, a Teaneck, N.J.-based unit of this international food, drinks and retailing concern.  He succeeds Mark Stephens, 48, who resigned in May.  Staff members of the House Ways and Means Committee and the Treasury Department have been meeting to find ways of curbing any special tax benefits that might be associated with the proposed takeover of B.A.T Industries PLC by a group led by Sir James Goldsmith.  In a letter to Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady, committee Chairman Dan Rostenkowski (D., Ill.) said he was deeply concerned about the proposed transaction, which would include Marshall Field, B.A.T's Chicago-based department-store chain.  One issue raised by Rep. Rostenkowski was the possibility of imposing a U.S. income tax on the gains from assets that Sir James might sell in order to repay debt used in the acquisition.  The Chicagoan said he might want to insert any tax-law change affecting the transaction into the tax bill expected to speed through the Congress during the next few weeks.  Separately, the executive committee of Britain's Takeover Panel rejected the claim of Sir James's group that B.A.T is attempting to frustrate the group's bid through U.S. regulatory protests.  The Goldsmith group, Hoylake Investments Ltd., appealed the committee's ruling to the full panel, which will hear the matter Wednesday.  At that meeting, the panel will also consider Hoylake's request to extend its $20.7 billion bid beyond the normal 60-day deadline of Oct. 7.  Meanwhile, France's Axa Midi Assurances said it filed applications with regulators in nine U.S. states to acquire Farmers Group, B.A.T's U.S. insurance unit.  Sir James has agreed to sell Farmers to Axa if he wins control of B.A.T.  Thomas W. Field, chairman and chief executive officer of McKesson Corp., resigned suddenly from the giant drug-distribution concern.  A terse company announcement said Mr. Field, 55 years old, resigned "because of differences with the board of directors over management philosophy and the future direction of the company."  Neil E. Harlan, 68, who stepped down as the company's chief executive in 1986 and retired in July 1988, was elected interim chairman and chief executive officer.  Mr. Field didn't return a call to his office.  Calls to Mr. Harlan were referred to a McKesson spokesman, who wouldn't elaborate on the company's announcement.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, McKesson shares closed at $37.25, down 37.5 cents.  The resignation surprised analysts.  "I had not any intimation that he was going to resign," said Donald Hultgren, an analyst at Raymond, James & Associates.  At least two issues could have raised a conflict between Mr. Field and the board: whether to dispose of businesses other than the drug-distribution operations and whether to pursue a leveraged buy-out as did a major competitor, Alco Health Services Corp. of Valley Forge, Pa.  McKesson last month said it was trying to decide whether to sell or increase its 86.2% stake in PCS Inc., a processor of prescription-drug claims.  Some analysts had expected an announcement on the PCS issue after yesterday's regular board meeting.  Mr. Hultgren speculated that a rift may have occurred over the future of PCS, which has what he called "an inherent conflict of interest" with McKesson's drug business.  PCS's primary customers are insurance companies that want policy holders to buy discount drugs, while McKesson's customers are drug retailers that are opposed to discounts.  In addition, analysts say McKesson's stock price undervalues its assets, making attractive a sale of the PCS stake and other assets, including Armor All Products Corp. and a bottled-water division.  Undervalued assets could also make a leveraged buy-out attractive.  It isn't known whether Mr. Field was considering a buy-out.  A report issued earlier this year by Morgan Stanley & Co. called McKesson's undervaluation "jarring" in light of Alco's buy-out.  Alco was purchased for 20 times its twelve-month earnings, the report said.  But even if McKesson's stock were trading at $40, that would value its drug segment at only about 11 times its earnings, the report said.  Mr. Field made a name for himself by stirring up the once-sleepy McKesson.  He joined the company as president and chief operating officer in 1984 after 31 years with American Stores Co. and its predecessor companies.  He was named chief executive officer in 1986 and chairman in July 1988.  In the year ended March 31, his compensation was $1.2 million.  At McKesson's helm, Mr. Field began selling off its food, liquor and chemical distribution operations, concentrating instead on winning market share for the wholesale-drug distribution unit.  In June 1988, for example, the company agreed to sell its Wine & Spirits wholesale business and to acquire Northwestern Drug Co., a drug distributor in Auburn, Wash.  Mr. Field made waves the same month by launching a $508 million takeover offer for Alco.  That effort was quashed by the Federal Trade Commission on antitrust grounds.  The buy-out would have given McKesson roughly a 38% share of the business.  Mr. Field left McKesson with sluggish earnings.  Net income in the first fiscal quarter, ended June 30, totaled $24 million, up 3.8% from a year earlier.  {An Occasional Look at Investing Fundamentals}  All over America there are investors who bought into new stock and bond offerings and lived to regret it.  It may be that the company hasn't made much money, and its stock price is languishing.  Or maybe things got so bad that the company was forced to seek protection under federal bankruptcy laws.  Some companies' problems are impossible to predict.  But there is a good chance investors would have at least had an inkling of the trouble to come if they had read the prospectus.  "After reading all the slick, upbeat marketing information, the prospectus can really sober you up," says Lewis J. Altfest, a New York financial planner.  The prospectus, a formal written offer to sell securities, can be for an initial public offering or for a new issue of stock or bonds of an already public company.  The prospectus describes the business of the issuer and the security being sold.  It also gives a financial history of the company and information about its management.  "The advantage of a prospectus is that all the information is there, and you can get to it pretty quickly," says Frank Wisneski, who manages Vanguard Group's $250 million Explorer Fund.  Reading a prospectus can be intimidating for people who aren't used to doing it.  But knowing what to look for makes it easier.  Financial advisers and professional money managers offer these suggestions:  SPECIAL RISKS: Investors eager to avoid making a costly mistake might start by looking for things that make an investment particularly risky.  Frequently, these are conveniently grouped together in a section called "special considerations," "investment considerations" or "special risks."  Take ZZZZ Best Co., the carpet-cleaning company founded by one-time whiz-kid Barry J. Minkow.  Among other things, its October 1986 preliminary prospectus disclosed that 86% of the company's revenue in a recent three-month period had come from a single, unaffiliated firm.  It also stressed the company's dependence on Mr. Minkow, who was then only 20 years old.  ZZZZ Best filed for protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of federal bankruptcy laws in July 1987, costing lenders and shareholders as much as $70 million.  Mr. Minkow was sentenced to 25 years in prison for conspiracy, securities fraud and money laundering.  Not all risks are alike, however.  Some are simply the one-chance-in-a-thousand variety that a lawyer may have insisted be put in the prospectus to protect the company against possible lawsuits.  How is the novice investor to tell?  "If he sees anything that looks at all disconcerting, he should get a second opinion -- from his lawyer, his accountant," says Arthur Nintzel, a senior financial consultant at Merrill Lynch & Co. who teaches a course in investing at New York University.  EARNINGS PROBLEMS: The financial record of a company may be the most critical part of a prospectus, investment advisers say.  Even people who don't consider themselves financial experts can spot some of the major warning signs.  Looking carefully at earnings statements may be especially rewarding.  "Earnings trending downward would certainly be a red flag," says Laura Adams, a Princeton, N.J., financial planner.  And John Powell, portfolio manager for T. Rowe Price's $35 million Small Cap Value Fund, says he is "somewhat skeptical" when he finds a company that has just started being profitable.  "It's a far different thing to establish a long-term record of profitability and to have one profitable quarter," he says.  Past performance may also foretell the future.  For instance, an investor could see how a company came through past recessions.  It also helps to know where the earnings are coming from.  Is the company dependent on a single product for its profits, for example, or are there special, one-time items that artificially boosted earnings?  TOO MUCH DEBT: Investment professionals pay special attention to a company's debt-to-equity ratio, the proportion of debt to stock after the offering.  While the optimum ratio varies from industry to industry, most financial professionals say that the amount of equity should significantly exceed the amount of debt.  "If there's too much debt you have a high-risk situation," says Stuart Williams, who manages Fidelity Investments' $1.4 billion Freedom Fund.  "If the balance sheet is strong, you know the company can weather a storm."  PURPOSE OF THE OFFERING: Companies issue stock and bonds for a variety of reasons: to finance an expansion of the business, which could include building new facilities and buying new equipment; to pay for an acquisition; or simply for "working capital."  The more specific the better, says Mr. Powell of T. Rowe Price.  "Then you have an idea that they're going public because they have a reason to raise capital, not because it looks like a good time to sell stock."  Sometimes, a portion of the proceeds go to corporate officers, who by selling stock are reducing their holdings in a company they may have founded.  Some professional investors consider that to be a red flag.  "It's like any other insider selling," says Mr. Powell.  "Why are they selling if it's such a good deal?"  TOP MANAGEMENT: Professional money managers look for information about how long management has been in place, what its track record is and how much stock it owns in the company.  Says Mr. Nintzel of Merrill Lynch: "You have to ask yourself, 'Are these the kind of people I want managing my funds?'"  Mr. Williams of Fidelity says officers and directors as a group should own a minimum of 5% of the total stock outstanding.  "There's a lot less potential for isolated instances of fraud," he says.  "The managers want to make money, too.  Their interests are aligned with yours."  CERTAIN TRANSACTIONS: Transactions that deserve special consideration.  Prospectuses for stock and debentures of Crazy Eddie Inc., for example, disclosed that before the company went public, it funded a medical school in the Caribbean, invested in oil-and-gas limited partnerships and made interest-free loans to the chairman and other members of his family "to meet family needs."  The electronics retailer, which filed for bankruptcy-law protection from creditors in June, also had licensing agreements with a company owned by the chairman's brother-in-law.  Such information isn't always a red flag.  "Some of it is natural," says Mr. Powell.  "Private companies really are different from public companies."  LAWSUITS: Legal actions against a company can be significant in themselves.  Or they may raise other questions that may make potential investors think twice.  The October 1986 preliminary prospectus for ZZZZ Best disclosed that the company was being sued by a man from whom it had borrowed money at an interest rate that "exceeded the maximum rate permitted by law."  The man, Jack Catain, was convicted on counterfeiting charges the following month; he died in February 1987 before being sentenced.  Rochester Telephone Corp., Rochester, N.Y., said it agreed to acquire Mt. Pulaski Telephone & Electric Co., Lincoln, Ill., in exchange for Rochester Telephone common stock.  It declined to disclose the number of shares involved.  Mt. Pulaski Telephone, which would be Rochester Telephone's fifth Illinois telephone concern, serves about 1,800 lines in central Illinois.  It has cellular-telephone interests, but other partners are expected to exercise their rights of first refusal to acquire those interests, Rochester said.  Despite the name, Mt. Pulaski no longer has electric customers, Rochester said.  Rochester Telephone, which serves more than 570,000 lines, mainly in Western-Central New York state, has acquired or announced agreements to acquire eight Midwestern telephone companies this year -- five in Illinois, two in Wisconsin and one in Indiana.  The company also owns a regional long-distance carrier, cellular telephone interests and a telecommunications equipment and service concern.  Three chemical makers said they are cutting back, though not eliminating, uses of a popular class of fungicides on produce because of concern about potential cancer risks.  The action follows the Environmental Protection Agency's release of new data showing that exposure to ethylene bisdithiocarbamate, or EBDC, exceeds the risks posed by Alar, a chemical that was widely used on apples to make them redder.  Du Pont Co.; Pennwalt Corp., a unit of Societe Nationale Elf Aquitaine; and Rohm & Haas Co. said they would voluntarily withdraw their registrations to use EBDC on 60 crops, including apples, pears, carrots, celery, cucumbers, squash and tobacco.  Use of EBDC fungicides would continue on such important crops as tomatoes, potatoes, wheat, corn, grapes and onions.  The EBDC fungicides -- the most widely used class of fungicides in the U.S. -- include mancozeb, marketed by all three companies, and maneb, marketed by Pennwalt.  For the companies, the voluntary withdrawal is an attempt to head off EPA action.  The EPA, which began a special review of the EBDC fungicides in 1987, has found that a breakdown product of EBDC causes tumors in laboratory animals and has been classified as a probable human carcinogen.  The companies, in a joint statement, said their action is intended "to maintain public confidence in the safety of fruits and vegetables."  The EPA has authority to suspend the usage of agricultural chemicals, eliminating approved crops on product labels.  In this case, the companies acted on their own to halt usage on certain crops.  The manufacturers, who will allow continued use on 13 crops, are under orders from the EPA to conduct a "market basket" study on residues found in food from supermarkets.  The first results are expected by year end.  While the EPA praised the action, it signaled that the three companies, which account for nearly all of the EBDCs made in the U.S., may not have taken a big enough step.  "We are looking at the industry plan to determine how far and how rapidly risk might be reduced," said Linda Fisher, assistant administrator for the EPA's pesticide office.  The agency, she said, is completing a study of the risks and benefits of EBDCs and will soon announce proposed regulatory action that might include "more immediate steps to reduce the risk to an acceptable level."  The companies' action stirred concern at the Natural Resources Defense Council, the group that made Alar a household name earlier this year.  The companies "are taking a responsible and unprecedented step in ceasing many profitable but highly risky uses even before the EPA acts," said Janet Hathaway, a council lawyer.  "However, the companies' actions are insufficient to protect the public."  Ms. Hathaway said that the cancer risk posed by the use of EBDCs is greater than that posed by Alar.  On tomatoes and potatoes together, the risk is 16 times greater than the EPA's "negligible risk" standard, she said.  Ms. Hathaway called on the EPA to act swiftly to slash EBDC residues "particularly in foods like bananas, grapes and potatoes which are consumed in large quantities by children."  An EPA spokesman repeated an agency recommendation that consumers can cut the risks associated with pesticides and fungicides by washing and peeling fruits and vegetables.  In a statement, the three companies said the fungicides "offer an important contribution to safe food production.  However, the theoretical risk associated with some specific uses of these products unnecessarily raises questions about the safety of the entire class of fungicides."  They noted that the chemicals have been used for about 40 years to control more than 400 types of fungi.  The companies said that normal processing removes much of the fungicide residue before reaching grocery stores.  A spokeswoman for Du Pont said that the product isn't a major one for the company and that the effect on revenue would be minimal.  A Pennwalt spokeswoman said revenue figures weren't readily available.  And at Rohm & Haas, a spokesman said the voluntary withdrawal would probably reduce revenue $5 million, representing about 5% of the its agricultural chemical business, which itself is a small part of the company's revenue stream.  John Talucci, business group director for agricultural chemicals at Rohm & Haas, said the decisions to curb use of EBDCs could eventually affect where certain crops are grown because there aren't cheap substitute fungicides for many crops.  For example, he said, growers in Florida may decide to abandon such fungus-prone crops as lettuce.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Household Finance Corp. -- $150 million of 8.95% notes, due Sept. 15, 1999, via competitive bidding by Goldman Sachs & Co., priced at 99.918 to yield 8.962%.  The notes were priced at a yield spread 78 basis points above the 10-year Treasury note.  The noncallable notes are rated single-A-1 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and double-A-minus by Standard & Poor's Corp.  Fletcher Challenge Industries Finance U.S.A. Ltd. -- $125 million of 9% notes, due Sept. 15, 1999, priced at 99.417 to yield 9.09%.  Rated triple-A by Moody's and S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by First Boston Corp.  The non-callable issue, which was guaranteed by a letter of credit from the New York branch of the Industrial Bank of Japan Ltd., was priced at a yield spread of 90 basis points above the Treasury 10-year note.  @ MUNCIPALS  Alaska Energy Authority -- $100 million of power revenue bonds, First Series, (Bradley Lake Hydro-Electric Project), tentatively priced by a John Nuveen & Co. group to yield from 6.30% in 1992 to 7.33% in 2018.  The bonds are rated triple-A by Moody's and S&P.  Indiana Health Facility Financing Authority -- $75 million of hospital revenue bonds (The Lutheran Hospital of Indiana Inc.), tentatively priced by a First Boston Corp. group to yield approximately 7.29% in 2019, with a 7% coupon.  The bonds are insured.  University of Alabama -- $67.6 million of hospital revenue bonds, Series 1989, of the Board of Trustees of the University of Alabam at Birmingham, tentatively priced by a Goldman Sachs & Co. group to yield from 6.10% in 1990 to 7.30% in 2004, with capital appreciation bonds yielding 7.30% in 2005-2008.  Approximately $27 million term bonds due 2014 will yield 7.25% with a 7% coupon.  The bonds are rated single-A-1 by Moody's and single-A by S&P, while the capital appreciation bonds and the term bonds are rated triple-A by both Moody's and S&P, and insured.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $600 million of 8 5/8% seven-year debentures due Sept. 10, 1996, priced at par, 39 basis points above the rate on the Treasury seven-year note.  Fannie Mae also is offering $500 million of 10-year indexed with a 9.15% coupon rate at 99.30 to yield 9.165%.  The issue, with a maturity date of Sept. 10, 1999, was priced to yield 95 basis points more than the Treasury five-year note.  The sinking-fund debentures are "indexed" because the sinking-fund payments are pegged to any changes in the rate on the 10-year Treasury note.  If there is little or no change in rate on the 10-year note, which stood at 8.19% at the time the issue was priced, the average life of the debentures will be 5.4 years.  If the rate on the 10-year note falls, the amount of sinking-fund payments will increase, resulting in a shorter average life.  If the rate on the 10-year note rises, the amount of sinking-fund payments will decrease, resulting in a longer average life.  @ EUROBONDS  Yuasa Battery Co. Ltd. (Japan) -- $150 million of bonds due Sept. 28, 1993 with equity-purchase warrants, indicating a 4 1/8% coupon at par, via Nomura International Ltd. Guaranteed by Mitsui Bank Ltd.  Each $5,000 bond carries one warrant, exercisable from Oct 12, 1989 through Sept. 14, 1993, to buy company shares at an expected premium of 2 1/2% to the closing share price when terms are fixed Sept 13.  Mortgage Securities No. 2 PLC (vehicle) -- 50 million pounds of mortgage-backed floating rate notes due September 2028 paying three-month London Interbank Offered Rate plus 0.18 for the first 10 years, thereafter Libor plus 0.50, and priced at par, via JP Morgan Securities Ltd. Callable after five years at par.  Expected average life 6.4 years.  Guaranteed by Eagle Star.  State Bank of New South Wales (Australia) -- 100 million Australian dollars of 14 1/4% subordinated bonds due Sept. 28, 1999, priced at 101.95, to yield 14.28% less fees, via Deutsche Bank Capital Markets.  Guaranteed by the State of New South Wales.  Fees 2 1/8.  AB Electrolux (Sweden) -- 125 billion Lire of 12 5/8% bonds due Oct. 10, 1994, priced at 101 7/8 to yield 12.63% less full fees, via Banca Commerciale Italiana.  Fees 1 7/8.  Swedish National Housing Finance Corp. (Sweden) -- 400 million Swedish kroner of 11 1/4% bonds due Oct. 12, 1994, priced at 101 3/4 to yield 11.28% less full fees, via Svenska International.  Fees 1 7/8.  Toyo Exterior (Japan) -- 100 million Swiss francs of privately placed convertible notes due Sept. 30, 1994 with an indicated 1/2% coupon at par via Nomura Bank Switzerland.  Put option March 31, 1992 indicated 109 5/8% to yield 4.17%.  Each 50,000 Swiss franc note convertible from Oct. 9, 1989 to Sept. 19, 1994 at 5% premium over closing share price Sept. 12, when terms fixed.  Norton Opax PLC increased its hostile bid for rival U.K. specialty printing concern De La Rue Co. PLC.  The move is a rebuff to Bowater Industries PLC, which last week launched a bid for Norton Opax in defense of De La Rue.  The Bowater bid is contingent on Norton Opax shareholders rejecting their company's planned takeover of De La Rue.  Norton Opax's new offer is the equivalent of 410 pence for each De La Rue ordinary share, up from 339 pence a share in the original offer.  The revised bid, which consists of a mix of cash and shares, values the whole of De La Rue at about #688.2 million ($1.065 billion).  Norton Opax is offering four of its ordinary shares, 120 pence of convertible unsecured loan stock and 450 pence in cash for every three De La Rue ordinary shares.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  El Paso Refinery Limited Partnership, offering of 4.8 million units, each consisting of one common share and one purchase warrant via Lazard Freres & Co.  Channel America LPTV Holdings Inc., proposed offering of 7.5 million common shares via L.H. Friend, Weinress & Frankson Inc.  Merrill Lynch & Co. selected MCI Communications Corp. and International Business Machines Corp. to design and operate a network management and control system under a five-year contract valued at $50 million.  MCI, the prime contractor, is responsible for network design, capacity planning and disaster recovery planning.  IBM will handle such services as performance and problem management.  The contract follows Merrill Lynch's recent selection of MCI to provide a worldwide voice and data communications network.  That contract, the largest ever for MCI, was valued at more than $150 million.  Merrill Lynch said the network connects computer and voice systems with 730 brokerage offices in 33 countries.  M.D.C. Holdings Inc. said it reached a settlement with the Securities and Exchange Commission over charges that the troubled homebuilder improperly recorded real-estate swaps as profitable sales.  In its administrative order, the SEC charged that M.D.C. didn't properly record or account for eight real-estate transactions between 1985 and 1987.  In one instance, the SEC said M.D.C. sold three properties in California in August 1987 to a buyer financed by a California thrift, and on the same day purchased residential property in Phoenix, Ariz., from a land developer affiliated with the same thrift.  M.D.C. booked a $2.2 million gain from the California property sales.  But an M.D.C. internal review and the SEC's review concluded that the transactions were actually an exchange of properties and the gain shouldn't have been recorded.  In other transactions, the SEC said M.D.C. booked gains or losses on properties that the company sold in 1986 and then repurchased several months later.  In two other instances, former M.D.C. employees, using money borrowed from the company, bought commercial properties from two sellers who agreed to buy homes from M.D.C. as part of the transaction.  M.D.C. initially booked profits on those home sales; the SEC concluded that the transactions were related.  In agreeing to the administrative order, M.D.C. neither admitted to nor denied the charges.  However, M.D.C. agreed to amend a footnote in its 1988 annual report to change the way it presented its quarterly 1987 results, showing that it overstated third-quarter results by $1.2 million and understated fourth-quarter results by almost $1 million.  M.D.C. also agreed to hire an independent auditor to study its internal accounting controls and make recommendations for improvements.  It must follow those recommendations and disclose them.  The homebuilder said it took a $4.2 million charge in 1988 to reflect the cumulative effect of changing the accounting for those real-estate deals.  Barris Industries Inc. said it has changed its name to Guber-Peters Entertainment Co., reflecting the "recent changes in ownership and management at the company."  The film- and television-production company has produced a number of box-office hits, including "Batman," "Rain Man" and "Gorillas in the Mist."  The company is currently producing "Bonfire of the Vanities."  Hollywood producers Peter Guber and Jon Peters sold their closely held movie-production company to Barris last year, and the two are co-chief executive officers of the concern.  Last May, Giant Group Ltd., a cement and paper-milling company, agreed to sell its 24.4% stake in Barris to an Australian joint venture for $34.5 million.  Until last week, that venture was jointly owned by two Sydney-based companies, Westfield Capital Corp., a venture-capital company, and Northern Star Holdings Ltd., which owns one of Australia's three major television networks.  But Westfield has acquired Northern Star's 12% stake in Guber-Peters as part of a transaction in which it sold its stake in Northern Star.  Yesterday, David Gonski, managing director of Westfield, said, "Westfield owns the 24.4% stake in Barris and at the moment has no plans to sell it."  Frank Lowy, chairman of Westfield, was named chairman of Barris earlier this year, succeeding Hollywood producer Burt Sugarman.  Mr. Sugarman is chairman, president and chief executive of Giant.  Mr. Sugarman didn't return phone calls.  Property Trust of America said its board rejected a hostile tender offer from Sizeler Property Investors Inc. to acquire 2.3 million Property Trust shares for $11 a share, or $25.3 million.  Property Trust said the offer, which would give Sizeler a 55% stake in the real estate investment trust, is coercive and inadequate.  Property Trust also said that its Southwestern real estate is showing "real improvement" and that now isn't a good time to sell the trust.  The offer from Sizeler, a Kenner, La., real estate trust, is scheduled to expire Sept. 29.  Archer Daniels Midland Co. said it plans to build a $70 million soy protein complex at a soybean processing plant it operates in the Netherlands.  Archer Daniels, a Decatur, Ill., processor of corn, wheat and soybeans, said construction of the plant will begin when the requisite permits are received, and it expects to have the facility in operation by the end of 1990.  The addition to what Archer said is already the world's largest soy-processing plant -- based in the Rotterdam suburb of Europoort -- will produce soy flour, soy protein concentrate and other soy products, all of which are used in the producing foodstuffs.  The new facility will use soy flakes produced at the processing plant, which makes soybean meal and oil used in animal feeds.  Demand for edible soy proteins has grown in recent years, Archer Daniels said, because of rising interest in cholesterol-free foods, and lowered subsidies to dairy producers have reduced the supply of milk proteins widely used by the food industry.  The dollar slipped under a flurry of profit-taking precipitated by a slim chance that West Germany and Japan may raise interest rates.  Despite some contentions that the dollar's rise and vigorous economic growth in the two countries offer a sound rationale for their central banks to lift key rates, most traders said the political costs of higher rates makes action in either country unlikely in the near future.  The dollar's dip, following healthy gains Friday and Tuesday, leaves the U.S. currency in a stronger position to renew its drive toward the critical two-mark level, traders said.  Now that participants in the recent rally have cashed in their gains and reduced their exposure, they will be more comfortable taking new long-dollar positions, once concerns of overseas rate increases fade, they said.  "It's just a matter of time before we break two marks," said Graham Broyd, vice president at Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co., New York.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.9755 marks, down from 1.9883 marks Tuesday, and at 146.15 yen, down from 146.84 yen.  The pound was at $1.5526, up from $1.5385.  In Tokyo Thursday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 146.20 yen, down from Tokyo's Wednesday close of 146.65 yen.  Comments by an anonymous Bank of Japan official, who said during early Tokyo trading Wednesday that the central bank may consider action other than intervention to stem the dollar rally, marked the start of the U.S. currency's tumble.  Many in the market interpreted the remark as a veiled threat that Japan will raise its discount rate or guide short-term rates higher to boost the yen.  Higher interest rates generally benefit the domestic currency by making interest-bearing instruments denominated in that currency more attractive.  Japan's central bank drove home its dissatisfaction with yen weaknesses by intervening directly to support that currency in early Tokyo trading, traders said.  But central bank Gov. Satoshi Sumita, speaking later at a news conference, downplayed the possibility of higher interest rates.  Shaping monetary policy to achieve narrow foreign-exchange objectives wouldn't be appropriate, he said.  Mr. Sumita said building inflation pressures would be justification for a shift in monetary policy.  He added that the Group of Seven industrial nations prefer to see the dollar below 140 yen, and affirmed the group's intentions to intervene in concert to block sharp gains in the dollar.  G-7 nations include the U.S., Japan, Britain, West Germany, France, Italy and Canada.  But without timely and concrete action to back up the threats, the Bank of Japan's posturing may quickly lose potency, said Earl I. Johnson, vice president at Harris Trust & Savings Bank, Chicago.  Although the dollar recovered from its early Tokyo lows, the currency started European trading vulnerable to further profittaking, especially with the trepidation surrounding the West German Bundesbank's Council meeting today, traders said.  Some participants say the central bank will be tempted to raise key interest rates in an attempt to halt the dollar before it crosses the two-mark level.  But the Bundesbank also faces political pressure to postpone tightening credit, and a snap poll of traders gave a rate boost only a 30% chance on average.  Presuming the West German central bank leaves key interest rates untouched, traders said the dollar will recommence its recent energetic climb.  Mr. Johnson said a test of the year's high around 2.05 marks is possible during the next couple of weeks but cautioned that intervention will come fast and furious when the dollar hits two marks or approaches 150 yen.  But Dennis Pettit, vice president at PaineWebber International Ltd., New York, predicted the threat of intervention and a slew of U.S. economic indicators scheduled for release late next week will hold the dollar to near this week's highs of 1.9940 marks through tomorrow.  On New York's Commodity Exchange, gold for current delivery up $2 to $361.60 an ounce in light trading.  Estimated volume was 1.7 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Thursday, gold was quoted at $360.15 an ounce.  Lomas Financial Corp., Dallas, said it has made "significant progress" in negotiating new senior-debt agreements with its bank and insurance-company lenders.  The troubled financial-services company defaulted on $145 million in notes that were due Friday, triggering a cross default on its $1.45 billion in senior debt.  Late yesterday, Lomas said its lead banks told it that all but two banks in its 34-member bank group have agreed in principle to the general terms of a restructured debt agreement.  It said the two balking banks hold less than 3% of the company's total senior debt.  Lomas said its four insurance lenders have generally agreed to the proposal.  The company has been operating under the specter of bankruptcy-law proceedings since it missed the debt payment last week.  The months-long negotiations with its banks apparently stalled over Lomas's insistence that its new credit facility cover principal payments on certain debt that might mature over the next two years.  In exchange, the senior debt-holders would become secured, not unsecured, lenders.  STOCK PRICES TUMBLED in the biggest sell-off in over two weeks.  Traders, citing bearish comments by market strategist Barton Biggs, said investors were nervous about the market's recent run-up.  The Dow Jones industrials fell 24.89, to 2719.79.  Bond prices rose, however, as investors shook off worries about a possible Fed credit tightening.  The dollar fell amid modest intervention.  The Fed Bank of New York said it sold a record $11.92 billion on currency markets from May to July to blunt the dollar's advance.  ---  RJR Nabisco has agreed to sell the tropical fruit business of its Del Monte foods unit for about $875 million to Polly Peck, a London-based concern, sources said.  The sale would be the second in RJR's plan to divest about $5.5 billion in food operations.  ---  Shearson's former chief of stock-loan operations has agreed to plead guilty to criminal charges and to cooperate with a broad inquiry of the stock-loan industry, sources said.  ---  The new S&L bailout law is worded so confusingly that thrift and banking officials can't agree on such critical issues as the amount of capital that an S&L must maintain.  The contradictory language stems from Congress's rush to finish the bill last month.  ---  U.S. auto sales surged 21.4% in late August, buoyed partly by incentives, which already are spreading to some 1990 models.  Analysts and officials also cited buyer concerns about the price increases being planned for many models in the coming year.  ---  Campbell Soup posted a $194.7 million loss for the fiscal fourth quarter and a sharp earnings decline for the year, reflecting $343 million in pre-tax charges for a restructuring.  ---  McKesson chairman Thomas Field resigned suddenly.  The drug-distribution firm cited "differences" with the board over management philosophy and McKesson's future direction.  --- Crazy Eddie founder Eddie Antar was accused by the SEC of engaging in a "massive financial fraud" to overstate the electronic retailer's earnings over a three-year period.  Six other former executives were also named in the agency's civil suit.  ---  Arby's named a new president as executives and franchisees continued to struggle to gain control of the restaurant chain, which is owned by Victor Posner's holding company, DWG.  ---  Phelps Dodge declared a special $10-a-share cash dividend but left itself plenty of flexibility to modernize and search for another acquisition.  ---  South Korea is wavering in its commitment to trade liberalization because business leaders and conservative politicians are worried that the country's economy is stalling.  ---  Non-farm productivity rose at a revised 0.7% annual rate in the second quarter, up from 0.2% estimated previously.  Hourly output by workers declined 1.3% in the first quarter.  ---  American Bank Stationery was sold for $300 million by the buy-out firm Gibbons Green van Amerongen, which bought the check printer three years ago for $99.5 million.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 161,800,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2719.79, off 24.89; transportation 1508.71, off 23.30; utilities 214.91, off 2.33.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3319.44, up 8.78.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.77, off 0.06; spot index 129.20, off 0.36.  Dollar: 146.15 yen, off 0.69; 1.9755 marks, off 0.0128.  Standard Microsystems Corp. said it entered into a world-wide nonexclusive cross-licensing agreement with Sharp Corp. of Japan for all semiconductor patents issued to the two companies.  The agreement also covers semiconductor-patent applications filed by the two companies for the next five years.  Terms weren't disclosed, but Standard Microsystems, which makes semiconductors, said it will receive a series of fixed payments and royalties from Sharp, an appliance maker, under the agreement.  As a result of the Sharp pact and other recently concluded cross-licensing agreements, Standard Microsystems said it expects that patent-licensing revenue through the end of 1994, including fixed payments and running royalties, could be $50 million or more.  Travelers Corp. has been subpoenaed by the House Energy and Commerce Committee to turn over all of its internal audits relating to its operations with New Jersey's deficit-ridden pool for high-risk drivers.  The committee's subpoena is the first time the government has ordered any of the 15 insurance companies that have serviced this auto-insurance pool, the Joint Underwriting Association, to release internal documents.  Yet, several state and federal agencies are investigating allegations of fraud and misconduct by employees of the insurance companies working with the insurance pool.  The General Accounting Office, the New Jersey Attorney General's office and the Federal Bureau of Investigation are among agencies investigating the JUA's operations and the sources of its $3 billion deficit.  The JUA was set up in 1984 to insure high-risk drivers who couldn't buy insurance in the open market.  Yesterday, Travelers, of Hartford, Conn., said it has received the subpoena and plans to respond promptly.  But the insurer added that it hasn't yet decided whether it will turn over the documents the committee seeks or challenge the subpoena in court.  The Travelers spokesman said the company has had many discussions with the New Jersey insurance department regarding problems in servicing the JUA.  Before the department released its audits last month, the company believed it had reached an agreement to settle allegations of underpayment for about $8 million.  The company said it later learned the state insurance commissioner had rejected the settlement.  Travelers is one of nine insurers that convinced a state appellate judge to issue a temporary restraining order to prevent the New Jersey insurance department from turning over to the GAO two independent audits that contained some internal documents.  If Travelers complies with the subpoena, the committee would turn over the documents to GAO, which started its investigation earlier this year at the request of Rep. James Florio, (D., N.J.).  Rep. Florio is the Democratic candidate for governor.  In a letter to the GAO controller, Mr. Florio said he was aware of allegations that Travelers had underpaid the JUA by $20 million.  The insurance department's audits, released last month, indicated that Travelers owes the JUA about $100.2 million.  Bank South Corp., Atlanta, said it plans to cut its work force by about 300 jobs, or 10%, as part of a broad restructuring to reduce costs.  The bank holding company said the job cuts will be made over time and a large number will result from attrition.  Positions affected are primarily staff and middle-management jobs.  The restructuring aims to reduce costs by 8% to 10% a year, or about $15 million.  It attributed the move to increased competition and a slower economy.  In the first six months, Bank South's net income rose 8% to $21.2 million, or 63 cents a share.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Bank South closed at $13.125, up 50 cents.  Schering-Plough Corp. sold a majority interest in its Brazilian operations to a Brazilian pharmaceutical company, Grupo Ache.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Schering-Plough said Grupo Ache has an option to buy the rest.  The Brazilian operations, based in Rio de Janeiro, include a pharmaceutical-manufacturing plant and offices that employ about 900 people.  Schering-Plough said Grupo Ache would install its own management.  The Brazilian facility had 1988 sales of $70 million.  Schering-Plough said it sold the interest in the Brazilian company because of the opportunity to ally with a local company, adding that it expects business opportunities to result from the sale.  Jannock Ltd.'s chairman and vice chairman said they have consolidated their Jannock holdings with those of Empire Co. into a holding company to create Jannock's largest single shareholder.  The holding company, 168803 Canada Inc., now holds 5.7 million Jannock common shares, or about a 21% stake.  Toronto-based Jannock is North America's largest brick manufacturer.  Empire, a Nova Scotia-based retail and wholesale distributor, said it will continue to hold 152,600 Jannock shares independently.  George E. Mara, Jannock's vice chairman, will hold 115,300 common shares of Jannock outside the holding company.  Gordon MacNeill, Jannock's chairman and chief executive officer, said in a statement the shares are being held for investment.  He couldn't be reached for comment.  Donald R. Sobey, chairman and a major Empire holder, is a Jannock director.  EG&G Inc.'s defense materials division won a $212 million Army contract for construction of a chemical weapons-destruction facility.  General Electric Co. was given $147.9 million in Army contracts for armored-vehicle transmissions and support of the air defense anti-tank system.  FMC Corp. received a $78.2 million Army contract for armored personnel carriers.  Westinghouse Electric Corp. got $76.7 million in contracts for Navy Trident missile launchers and radar-antenna research for the Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency.  Hughes Aircraft Co., a unit of General Motors Corp., was awarded $56.8 million in Army contracts for M-1 tank sights and range finders.  The Sohio division of British Petroleum Co. received an $18.6 million Defense Logistics Agency contract for jet fuel.  Allied-Signal Aerospace Co., a unit of Allied-Signal Inc., won a $16 million Navy contract for shipboard weapons systems.  Honeywell Inc. was given a $14.6 million Army contract for communications equipment.  Raytheon Co. received an $11.6 million Army contract for Patriot missile support.  The National Aeronautics and Space Administration said it chose Ford Aerospace Corp. for a 10-year contract, valued at about $469 million, to provide engineering services.  NASA said the Ford Motor Co. unit would design and develop improvements to the space shuttle mission-control center and design a new space station control center.  Braniff Inc. said it reached a preliminary agreement to lease 20 new Boeing 737-300 aircraft from GPA Group Ltd., a large Irish aircraft broker and leasing concern, and to drop plans to buy 12 new Fokker 100 aircraft from GPA.  Under the agreement, a U.S. finance subsidiary of GPA also will arrange $75 million in borrowings for Braniff.  The airline company agreed to buy the Fokker 100s, made by Fokker N.V., Amsterdam, from GPA for about $300 million in July 1988.  The Boeing Co. models that will be leased instead are valued at approximately $600 million.  Delivery is scheduled to begin next June, about six months later than Braniff would have started receiving the Fokker models.  Braniff said GPA plans to take delivery of the Fokker 100s and lease them to other carriers.  William G. McGee, Braniff's chairman and chief executive officer, said the larger, longer-range Boeing 737-300 "better suits our present route system and traffic demand."  The Boeing 737-300 seats 130 passengers; the Fokker 100 seats 101.  Braniff said it has decided to build its fleet around the European-made Airbus A-320 and Boeing 737-300.  It has several orders and options A-320s.  The carrier said some of the new Boeing models will replace Boeing 737-200s scheduled to be retired through 1992.  Highland Superstores Inc. said August sales fell 2% to $69.8 million from $71.5 million a year ago.  Comparable store sales fell 10% in August from the year earlier.  For the seven months ended Aug. 31, this consumer electronics retailer's sales rose 1% to $464.8 million from $461.1 million for the same period a year ago.  Comparable store sales fell 11% in the latest period compared to a year earlier.  SciMed Life Systems Inc. said it expects to report that sales and earnings for the second quarter ended Aug. 31 more than doubled from a year earlier.  While the Minneapolis maker of medical products didn't say specifically what second-period earnings were, it said they were "expected to exceed" the $2.6 million, or 39 cents a share, SciMed posted in the first quarter.  Per-share figures reflect a 2-for-1 stock split paid in August.  In the year-earlier second quarter, SciMed had net income of $948,000, or an adjusted 16 cents a share.  SciMed also said it expects to report sales of $15.5 million, compared with $6.3 million a year earlier.  SciMed's stock has risen recently on the strength of difficulties C.R. Bard Inc. has run into with federal regulators over a competing catheter.  SciMed said orders for its new Ace coronary angioplasty catheter "have increased recently and remain strong."  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, SciMed's stock jumped $2.25 to close at $52.25 a share.  Sales of North American-made cars and trucks rose 21.4% in late August, buoyed partly by incentives, which are already spreading to some 1990 models.  General Motors Corp.'s Chevrolet Division just yesterday announced its first consumer rebate -- $750 -- on the new Lumina family sedan.  The action comes only two weeks after Chevrolet raised Lumina's base price about $460.  Chrysler Corp. is offering dealer incentives on certain 1990 model Jeep Cherokee and Grand Wagoneer models, and car dealers in some areas are advertising deals on the 1990 vehicles they've already received.  Dreisbach & Sons Cadillac in Detroit is promoting "special pricing" on the General Motors 1990 model luxury cars it now has in stock, partly to offset the impact of the new models' higher prices, said President Mark Dreisbach.  Base prices on most of Cadillac's 1990 cars will rise as much as 7.2% above 1989 levels.  "We just basically want to stir traffic," said Mr. Dreisbach.  "We want to get {the model year} off to a good start."  Industry analysts and officials credit the sharp spike in late August sales partly to buyer concerns over the substantial, and virtually industrywide, price increases that are slated to take effect later this month and next month on 1990 vehicles.  Base stickers overall are expected to rise as much as 9% on most new cars sold by GM, Ford Motor Co. and Chrysler; the cost of new safety equipment will account for part of the increases.  The eight major U.S manufacturers said they sold a total of 492,763 North American vehicles in Aug. 21-31, compared with 365,199 a year ago.  The percent change is based on the daily selling rate; there were 10 selling days in the latest period and nine a year ago.  Domestic cars sold at a seasonally adjusted annual rate of eight million vehicles, down from the 8.6 million rate of midAugust but well ahead of the year-ago period's 6.7 million rate.  The strong late August results boosted sales of all imported and domestic vehicles 9.7% for the month as a whole to 1,416,403 cars and trucks.  A number of companies reported record August sales, including GM's Chevrolet and GMC truck operations, Volvo Cars of North America, Toyota Motor Sales U.S.A., Ford Motor and Chrysler's Jeep-Eagle Division.  Domestic car sales, up 14.2% to 685,365 for the month, amounted to an 8.3 million seasonally adjusted rate, the strongest since December.  Sales of imported cars in August were less robust, rising 2.4% to 287,887.  Still, the seasonal rate for foreign cars was 3.1 million, the highest since April.  The relatively strong sales, plus generally positive economic reports recently, have made some auto executives more optimistic about sales for the rest of 1989 and for 1990.  Philip E. Benton Jr., president of Ford's automotive group, told North Carolina business leaders yesterday that the No. 2 U.S. auto maker now estimates industry sales for next year "won't be too far from this year's projected level" of 14.8 million cars and trucks.  Previously, Ford hadn't announced an official forecast for 1990, but Mr. Benton had predicted results would come in below 1989, possibly in the 14.5 million range.  Still, the August news wasn't all good.  Despite a 5.1% increase in total car sales to 315,106, GM still recorded a dismal 32.4% share of the U.S. market.  That's a sharp drop from 34% a year ago and the 40%-plus share the company has traditionally held.  The auto maker has said new products should help improve its sales and market share and Chevrolet apparently isn't leaving that to chance.  The division has tried since it introduced its new Lumina sedans in March to sell them without incentives.  Inventories have climbed in recent weeks, however, and a Chevrolet spokeswoman acknowledged that the sedan sales "might feel a little pressured" now that two more Lumina models -- a coupe and an all-purpose vehicle -- are available.  The $750 rebate Chevrolet now is offering on the sedan is still less than the $1,000 rebate Ford offers on its 1989 Taurus family sedan.  But the Lumina, which GM has called a 1990 model since its introduction, is more expensive -- $12,340 compared with $11,778 for the least expensive Taurus now on sale.  That will change next month, however, when the 1990 Taurus is introduced with a base sticker of $12,594.  Chevrolet said the Lumina incentive, along with its other retail sales programs, will continue "until further notice."  ---  @ RETAIL U.S. CAR AND LIGHT TRUCK SALES-a  @ 1989 1988 %Chg. 1989 1988  @ Aug. Aug. Month To Date To Date  @General Motors 482,186 445,432 + 8.3 3,594,930 3,806,694  @ Domestc car 296,482 284,056 + 4.4 2,326,975 2,524,775  @ Import car 18,624 15,720 +18.5 119,103 126,721  @Total car 315,106 299,776 + 5.1 2,446,078 2,651,496  @ Domestc trk 166,394 145,656 +14.2 1,142,916 1,155,198  @ Import trk 686 0 f 5,936 0  @ Total trk 167,080 145,656 +14.7 1,148,852 1,155,198  @Ford 343,150 303,841 +12.9 2,551,848 2,584,467  @ Domestc car 209,951 178,023 +17.9 1,513,391 1,520,929  @ Import car 6,766 8,331 -18.8 55,763 57,836  @ Total car 216,717 186,354 +16.3 1,569,154 1,578,765  @ Domestc trk 126,433 117,487 + 7.6 982,694 1,005,702  @Chrysler 176,184 167,549 + 5.2 1,401,831 1,533,180  @ Domestc car 90,345 82,366 + 9.7 648,397 741,129  @ Import car 8,156 11,161 -26.9 72,370 89,352  @ Total car 98,501 93,527 + 5.3 720,767 830,481  @ Domestc trk 74,286 69,347 + 7.1 654,969 657,955  @ Import trk 3,397 4,675 -27.3 26,095 44,744  @ Total trk 77,683 74,022 + 4.9 681,064 702,699  @Toyota 114,978 86,743 +32.6 626,995 610,839  @ Domestc car 29,936 5,069 +490.6 134,594 39,074  @ Import car 58,090 58,466 - 0.6 336,645 401,546  @ Total car 88,026 63,535 +38.5 471,239 440,620  @ Import trk 26,952 23,208 +16.1 155,756 170,219  @Nissan 73,564 60,655 +21.3 471,834 434,429  @ Domestc car 14,221 13,794 + 3.1 74,844 73,912  @ Import car 39,526 29,986 +31.8 285,381 245,669  @ Total car 53,747 43,780 +22.8 360,225 319,581  @ Domestc trk 17,545 13,431 +30.6 94,661 80,532  @ Import trk 2,272 3,444 -34.0 16,948 34,316  @ Total trk 19,817 16,875 +17.4 111,609 114,848  @Honda 78,212 66,536 +17.5 531,167 498,144  @ Domestc car 36,979 33,486 +10.4 263,887 247,487  @ Import car 41,233 33,050 +24.8 267,280 250,657  @Mazda 35,131 31,779 +10.5 239,232 243,026  @ Domestc car 3,795 3,232 +17.4 29,752 20,260  @ Import car 23,809 20,872 +14.1 153,358 156,096  @ Total car 27,604 24,104 +14.5 183,110 176,356  @ Import trk 7,527 7,675 - 1.9 56,122 66,670  @Hyundai-b 20,552 25,119 -18.2 132,440 191,772  @Volkswagen-d 11,053 14,214 -22.2 94,151 123,693  @ Import car 10,572 13,807 -23.4 90,360 119,697  @ Import trk 481 407 +18.2 3,791 3,996  @Subaru 14,023 14,516 - 3.4 101,111 101,720  @Isuzu 13,318 12,886 + 3.4 77,987 73,833  @ Import car 2,264 3,197 -29.2 13,718 17,382  @ Import trk 11,054 9,689 +14.1 64,269 56,451  @Mitsubishi 16,114 10,480 +53.8 94,505 78,713  @ Domestc car 3,656 0 f 17,769 0  @ Import car 9,301 7,606 +22.3 55,477 48,586  @ Total car 12,957 7,606 +70.4 73,246 48,586  @ Import trk 3,157 2,874 + 9.8 21,259 30,127  @Volvo-b 10,435 9,543 + 9.3 72,275 67,478  @Mercedes-b 6,716 6,636 + 1.2 48,908 57,144  @BMW-b 5,580 6,526 -14.5 45,067 46,811  @Suzuki 3,330 12,208 -72.7 21,419 49,756  @ Import car 761 0 f 4,000 0  @ Import trk 2,569 12,208 -79.0 17,419 49,756  @Yugo-b 937 3,504 -73.3 7,348 23,496  @Saab-b 3,768 3,979 - 5.3 23,423 26,224  @Audi-b 1,713 3,215 -46.7 13,652 16,563  @Porsche-b 955 1,247 -23.4 6,677 11,389  @Jaguar-b 1,563 1,645 - 5.0 12,400 13,081  @Sterling-b 305 930 -67.2 4,126 6,583  @Peugeot-b 652 568 +14.8 4,171 4,540  @Alfa Romeo-b 260 386 -32.6 2,188 3,433  @Range Rover-c 398 346 +15.0 3,148 2,198  @Daihatsu-b 1,326 1,152 +15.1 9,368 7,545  @Total cars 973,252 881,188 +10.4 6,946,218 7,258,887  @ Domestic 685,365 600,026 +14.2 5,009,609 5,167,566  @ Import 287,887 281,162 + 2.4 1,936,609 2,091,321  @Total trucks 443,151 410,447 + 8.0 3,245,983 3,357,864  @ Domestic 384,658 345,921 +11.2 2,875,240 2,899,387  @ Import 58,493 64,526 - 9.3 370,743 458,477  @Total veh 1,416,403 1,291,635 +9.7 10,192,201 10,616,751  @ a-Totals include all vehicle sales reported in the period except tourist-delivery sales of imported models.  @ b-Imported cars only.  @ c-Imported trucks only.  @ d-Volkswagen ceased U.S. car production in July 1988.  @ e-Estimated.  @ f-Percentage change greater than 999%.  @ x-There were 27 selling days in the most recent month and 27 a year earlier.  Percentage differences based on daily sales rate rather than sales volume.  ---  @ Percentage of Total U.S. Car Market  @ Aug. Aug. 8 mos 8 mos  @ Make 1989 1988 1989 1988  @ General Motors-a ....... 32.4 34.0 35.2 36.5  @ Ford-a .................. 22.3 21.1 22.6 21.7  @ Chrysler-a .............. 10.1 10.6 10.4 11.4  @ Toyota-a ................ 9.0 7.2 6.8 6.1  @ Nissan-a ................ 5.5 5.0 5.2 4.4  @ Honda-a ................. 8.0 7.6 7.6 6.9  @ Mazda-a ................. 2.8 2.7 2.6 2.4  @ Hyundai ................. 2.1 2.9 1.9 2.6  @ VW-a .................... 1.1 1.6 1.3 1.6  @ Subaru .................. 1.4 1.6 1.5 1.4  @ Volvo ................... 1.1 1.1 1.0 0.9  @ Mitsubishi-a ............ 1.3 0.9 1.1 0.7  @ Other Imports ........... 2.8 3.7 2.8 3.2  @ Total Domestic .......... 70.4 68.1 72.1 71.2  @ Total Imported .......... 29.6 31.9 27.9 28.8  @ a-Includes imported and domestically made models.  @ RETAIL U.S. CAR AND LIGHT TRUCK SALES-a  @ 1989 1988 x-%  @ Aug 21-31 Aug 21-31 Chg.  @ GM total vehicles ...... 213,695 167,924 + 14.5  @ Domestic car ......... 134,159 108,986 + 10.8  @ Imported car ......... 6,585 6,010 - 1.4  @ Total car .......... 140,744 114,996 + 10.2  @ Domestic truck ....... 72,697 52,928 + 23.6  @ Imported truck ....... 254 0 d  @ Total truck ........ 72,951 52,928 + 24.0  @ FORD total vehicles .... 156,937 113,394 + 24.6  @ Domestic car ......... 93,501 65,600 + 28.3  @ Imported car ......... 3,282 2,802 + 5.4  @ Total car .......... 96,783 68,402 + 27.3  @ Domestic truck ......... 60,154 44,992 + 20.3  @ CHRYSLER total veh...... 78,616 67,527 + 4.8  @ Domestic car ......... 40,340 32,214 + 12.7  @ Imported car ......... 3,726 4,741 - 29.3  @ Total car .......... 44,066 36,955 + 7.3  @ Domestic truck ....... 33,052 28,716 + 3.6  @ Imported truck ....... 1,498 1,856 - 27.4  @ Total truck......... 34,550 30,572 + 1.7  @ NISSAN total vehicles... 18,477 12,778 + 30.1  @ Domestic car ......... 8,267 6,651 + 11.9  @ Domestic truck ....... 10,210 6,127 + 50.0  @ HONDA domestic car...... 18,245 14,699 + 11.7  @ TOYOTA domestic car..... 18,418 2,778 +496.7  @ MAZDA domestic car ..... 2,064 1,508 + 23.2  @ MITSUBISHI-c ........... 1,656 0 d  @ Total cars ............. 330,243 245,989 + 20.8  @ Domestic ............. 316,650 232,436 + 22.6  @ Imported ............. 13,593 13,553 - 9.7  @ Total trucks ........... 177,865 134,619 + 18.9  @ Domestic ............. 176,113 132,763 + 19.4  @ Imported ............. 1,752 1,856 - 15.0  @ Total domestic veh-e ... 492,763 365,199 + 21.4  @ Total vehicles ......... 508,108 380,608 + 20.1  @ a-Totals include only vehicle sales reported in the period.  @ c-Domestic car  @ d-Percentage change greater than 999%.  @ e-Includes Volkswagen domestic production to July 1988.  @ x-There were 10 selling days in the most recent period and 9 a year earlier.  Percentage differences based on daily sales rate rather than sales volume.  Mitsubishi Motors Corp.'s U.S. sales and marketing arm added new lower-priced versions of some of its 1990-model cars and trucks and increased prices of other 1990 models as much as $1,170, or 6.6%.  Mitsubishi took away features from some models to create the lower-priced versions.  The least expensive 1990-model Mirage three-door subcompact, for example, costs $6,929, or $1,760 less than the 1989 base model.  But the 1990 model comes with only a four-speed manual transmission instead of the five-speed standard on the 1989 models.  The 1990 Mirage RS three-door that compares most closely with the base 1989 model Mirage costs $8,759, or 0.8% more than the 1989 model.  Mitsubishi increased prices of its sporty Eclipse cars as much as 4.1% on the $10,819 base model with a five-speed manual transmission, or $470 on the $14,639 turbo-charged Eclipse GS with a manual transmission.  Mitsubishi also created lower-priced versions of its four-door Montero sport utility vehicles.  The 1990 base-model will cost $15,519.  But prices on the version that compares most closely with the 1989-model four-door Montero will increase as much as $1,170, or 6.6%, to $18,959.  Stock prices retreated at London and Tokyo, with both declines tied at least partly to worries over higher interest rates.  London shares dropped sharply.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100 share index was derailed from its track toward the record closing high of 2443.4 as profit-taking and the absence of institutional buying pressured the index sharply lower in moderate volume.  The index closed at its session low of 2390.8, down 35.2.  It peaked early in the session at 2427.4, up 1.4.  Fears that upward pressure on U.K. interest rates is increasing, negative readings of half-year profit reports from a few U.K. construction-sector concerns, along with some rumors of fresh rights issues, helped push the market lower.  "You've got a lot of results coming out in the next 10 days," a dealer with a U.K. brokerage concern said.  "That has worried a lot of people."  "It's a case of the institutions holding off buying just yet," he added.  He and other dealers reckon the FT-SE 100 will resume its push higher, again beyond the 2400 level.  But they added that the lack of substantial institutional buying could determine whether sizable gains are made or the FT-SE 100 settles into a range of 2375 to 2425.  Speculative dealings have underpinned recent sessions and caused broad swings in share values.  Volume registered 540.1 million shares, up from 465.1 million Tuesday.  The FT-30 index closed 29.9 points lower at 1978.7.  Though interest-rate talk was active in the market, in part on speculation that the Deutsche Bundesbank could move Thursday to boost West Germany's key rates and spark a flurry of similar action among major industrialized nations, dealers were largely discounting the speculation as overdone market hype.  "It had to have a pullback (after recent gains)," a dealer with a U.S. brokerage firm maintained.  "I think people were just looking for excuses to sell today."  Blue Circle and George Wimpey, U.K. construction-related concerns that reported interim results Wednesday, were cited as examples of nagging concerns that U.K. corporate profitability might be set to slow down.  Blue Circle, a cement, concrete and home products maker, reported an 18% rise in interim pretax profit, thanks to a surge in demand for U.K. cement products and a first-time contribution from recently acquired Birmid Qualcast.  The stock fell 1 pence (1.53 cents) to 243 pence ($3.75.)  FKI, an engineering concern, announced that it has canceled plans to sell its North American division, proceeds of which had been expected to be used to pay shareholders a special dividend.  FKI closed 14 1/2 lower at 106.  Oils, which paced the FT-SE's late gains Tuesday, shed most of their advances on profit-taking, dealers said.  Tokyo stocks fell more than 300 points midway through the afternoon session before partly softening their losses on index-related buying near the close.  The sharp afternoon drop came after a news agency reported that the Bank of Japan may be mulling a rise in short-term interest rates to offset a further fall in the yen against the U.S. dollar.  The bond market fell in response to the report, dragging share prices down in its wake.  The stock market, at first, had been slow to react when the dollar climbed to the 147-yen level in Tokyo Wednesday morning.  The Nikkei index of 225 selected issues finished down 170.64 points at 34271.31.  The index fell 41.83 points Tuesday.  In early trading in Tokyo Thursday, the Nikkei index fell another 73.21 points to 34198.10.  Wednesday's volume on the First Section was estimated at 600 million shares, up from 530 million Tuesday.  Declining issues outnumbered advancing issues, 594 to 349, while 174 remained unchanged.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index (Topix) of all issues listed in the First Section, which fell 1.25 points Tuesday, was down 10.64 points, or 0.41%, at 2602.70.  The Second Section index, which gained 12.26 points Tuesday, was up 11.30 points, or 0.34%, to close at 3383.35.  Volume in the Second Section was estimated at 25 million shares, up from 20 million Tuesday.  Wednesday's losers were spread among a wide range of sectors, including steels, electric utilities, export-related electricals, metal products and constructions.  Large-capitalization issues such as steels and shipbuildings in particular were hurt by the growing anticipation of higher interest rates, traders said.  Nippon Steel lost 16 yen (11 cents) to sink to 783 yen ($5.33), NKK fell 15 to 758 and Kawasaki Steel eased 11 to 830.  Mitsubishi Heavy Industries declined 20 to 1,130.  Kawasaki Heavy Industries also lost 20, falling to 1,030.  Electric powers continued to slide, as the stronger dollar increases costs of importing oil they need for business and hurts their earnings, traders said.  High-priced, small-capitalization issues, which made a notable advance this week, also slumped Wednesday.  An official at Wako Securities said investors who dumped large-capitalization issues tried to make up for the losses by selling high-priced issues, which had been rising.  As a result, Sony went down 130 to close at 8,820.  Pioneer shed 20 to decline to 4,400.  Fanuc lost 20, standing at 7,100.  Foods -- which fared well in the morning on their laggard status and specific incentives -- surrendered some gains in the afternoon but managed to emerge as winners by the close.  Yamazaki Baking attracted buying interest for a newly developed bread that is expected to bring 8-billion-yen in annual sales to the company, traders said.  Yamazaki was up 80 at 2,210.  Also prompting Yamazaki's popularity was speculation the company will benefit from its extensive sales network if Japanese distribution systems are restructured as a result of pressure from the U.S., said Shin Tokoi, deputy general manager of Japanese equities at County Natwest Securities.  A U.S. delegation strongly criticized Japan's distribution system during two days of talks on structural impediment issues that ended in Tokyo Tuesday.  Elsewhere, share prices closed higher in Singapore, Taipei and Manila and Hong Kong, lower in Seoul and Wellington and little changed in Sydney.  Stocks closed higher in Zurich, Brussels, Amsterdam and lower in Paris, Frankfurt, Stockholm and Milan.  South African gold stocks closed higher.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Sep 5 Sep 4 Year  U.S. .......................... 324.4 325.3 + 26.7  Britain ....................... 727.1 724.9 + 33.1  Canada ........................ 435.4 438.0 + 18.6  Japan ......................... 1535.6 1536.5 + 8.1  France ........................ 547.4 547.1 + 23.7  Germany ....................... 260.1 257.6 + 25.1  Hong Kong ..................... 1920.8 1901.7 - 5.4  Switzerland ................... 236.5 236.4 + 36.8  Australia ..................... 354.9 351.5 + 22.2  World index ................... 532.5 534.5 + 7.7  ---  @ Weekly Percentage Leaders  @ Last week's best and worst performing stocks among those issues that make up 80% of the world's stock market capitalization (in local currency)  @ISSUE (COUNTRY) CLOSE %CHG  @ WINNING ISSUES  @Chase Corp. (Australia) 0.01 + 96.2  @Shimachu (Japan) 4080.00 + 29.0  @Ariadne Australia (Australia) 0.18 + 28.6  @Isetan (Japan) 3790.00 + 27.2  @Royal Co. (Japan) 3460.00 + 23.6  @Orix (Orient Leasing) (Japan) 6380.00 + 22.7  @Taiyo Kobe Bank (Japan) 1960.00 + 21.0  @Navigation Mixte (France) 1159.00 + 20.1  @Schindler Namen (Switz'land) 1345.00 + 20.1  @Toyo Sash (Japan) 8490.00 + 17.1  @ LOSING ISSUES  @Hooker Corp. (Australia) 0.01 - 96.2  @Bond Corp. (Australia) 0.42 - 31.1  @Northern Star Hldgs (Australia) 0.46 - 29.2  @Bell Resources (Australia) 0.80 - 25.9  @Bell Group (Australia) 0.59 - 21.3  @Steinberg A (Canada) 40.00 - 21.0  @Ocelot Industries B (Canada) 10.875 - 14.7  @Cultor I (Finnish Sugar) (Finland) 151.00 - 14.7  @North Flinders Mines (Australia) 2.10 - 14.3  @Cultor II Free (F.  Sugar) (Finland) 95.00 - 13.6  @ Source: Morgan Stanley Capital Intl.  Perspective  Great American Recreation Inc. said it agreed to sell its Action Park and ski area in Sussex County, N.J., to an owner of amusement parks and other family-entertainment businesses.  The McAfee, N.J., company said the transaction provides for $30 million in cash, $5 million in a three-year promissory note and $15 million in the purchaser's stock.  Great American said that if the companies reach a definitive agreement, it will own a 20% stake in the purchaser, International Broadcasting Corp., Minneapolis.  Great American, a real estate developer that built the park about 10 years ago, said it sold it to International Broadcasting to concentrate on developing its Great Gorge Resort, which is being built adjacent to the ski area.  Blue Circle Industries PLC, a British cement, concrete and home-products maker, said pretax profit rose 18% in the first half to #100.3 million ($154.3 million) from #85.2 million a year ago.  Sales rose 32% to #694.3 million from #527.0 million.  The company attributed the increase to a surge in demand for British cement products and a first-time contribution from Birmid Qualcast PLC, acquired late last year.  However, profit in the U.S. was hit by lower demand, which was exacerbated by bad weather, Blue Circle said.  Elsewhere, overseas profit generally was better.  Profit after tax and minority interests but before extraordinary items rose nearly 7% to #69.2 million, or 11.5 pence a share on a fully diluted basis, from #64.8 million, or 11.3 pence a share, the year before.  During the first half, Blue Circle took a #200,000 extraordinary gain compared with a #6.8 million extraordinary loss in the year-earlier period, leaving profit attributable to shareholders at #69.4 million compared with #58 million.  Operating profit rose to #108.9 million from #91.2 million as trading profit gained 27% to #89.6 million from #70.4 million.  Groupe Expansion S.A. set up a holding company to pool news and other resources among a group of 18 business publications throughout Europe.  The venture, Eurexpansion S.A., will aim to broaden the content of the publications, most of which have a circulation of under 25,000.  "The European market is served by a multitude of publications.  Our clients can no longer be satisfied with information of regional quality," said Jean-Louis Servan-Schreiber, chairman of Groupe Expansion, a closely held French publishing company.  To achieve this, the newspapers and magazines plan to cooperate in reporting stories, publishing each other's articles and setting up a common electronic data bank.  The publications also plan to cooperate in advertising and marketing.  The 18 business publications joining the network include the Belgian daily l'Echo de la Bourse; the Spanish daily Cinco Dias; Britain's Financial Weekly; Italy's weekly Milano Finanza; the daily l'Agefi and weekly Bilan of Switzerland; and Europolitique, a Brussels newsletter.  Eurexpansion has acquired 34% of l'Echo de la Bourse; a 30% stake in Estructura S.A., publisher of Cinco Dias; 61% of Financial Weekly; 28% of Milano Finanza Editori; 24% of Switzerland's Agefi; and 68% of Europolitique.  The stakes represent an investment of about 200 million francs ($29.9 million), according to Groupe Expansion.  Groupe Expansion currently has full ownership of Eurexpansion, which is incorporated in Belgium.  But other minority partners are scheduled to enter the venture later this year.  These future partners are Dow Jones & Co., the publisher of The Wall Street Journal; Class Editori of Italy; and Mediafina of Belgium, Mr. Servan-Schreiber said.  Dow Jones, already owner of a 14.5% stake in Groupe Expansion and of a small minority stake in Estructura, said it has agreed in principle to participate as a minority shareholder in the new company.  Groupe Expansion intends to keep majority control of the venture.  A federal appeals court here struck down an injunction barring timber companies from logging in towering ancient forests in Western Oregon, where some of the last of the Northwest spotted owls live.  The decision is the latest twist in the convoluted and often bitter battle between the timber industry and environmentalists over the spotted owl -- and by extension, over federal timber policy itself.  In April, the U.S. Fish & Wildlife Service recommended that the owl, which lives only in the dwindling patches of the West's virgin forest, be put on the threatened species list.  The ruling technically frees the industry to begin acquiring and cutting down about 500 million board feet of redwoods and Douglas firs on federal land in Oregon's Cascade Mountains, although only about 66 million board feet are likely to be sold or cut down within the next six months to a year.  There are about 12,000 board feet in an average house.  The decision stems from a case originally brought in Portland, Ore., by environmental groups.  It doesn't affect injunctions -- in other suits based on different legal challenges -- that bar logging of two billion board feet on other federally owned owl habitat in Oregon and in Washington.  Nonetheless, "It's good news for the logging industry and bad news for owls," said Todd True, a lawyer with the Sierra Club Legal Defense Fund.  The environmental groups' original suit was filed in October 1987 against the Interior Department.  It alleged that the department's Bureau of Land Management had violated environmental and wildlife protection laws by refusing to alter timber sale plans for the area after new studies indicated that logging there might endanger the owls.  Injunctions barring sales and cutting in much of the Pacific Northwest's so-called "old growth" forests have been in place for most of the past six months.  However, the appeals court ruled that a provision contained in the Interior Department's continuing budget resolution since 1987 -- inserted by Oregon Sen. Mark Hatfield and supported by the timber industry -- prevents any challenge to BLM plans based on information that becomes available after the plans are finalized.  The BLM's plans for timber sales through the end of the decade in the Pacific Northwest were finalized in the early 1980s.  The underlying issues in the owl case are industry practices and federal policies that have resulted in tremendous acceleration in the pace at which the nation's oldest and tallest trees are being cut down.  That's partly because foreign timber concerns have been outbidding American companies for logs from state and private lands; as log exports have soared, federal forests -- from which logs can't be exported -- have been left as the last remaining large source of raw wood for the domestic market.  Though clearly a setback for environmentalists, the appeals court did revive certain aspects of their legal challenge that the district court had snuffed out.  The appeals court ruled that allegations that the BLM violated certain wildlife protection laws should be tried on their merits and remanded that portion of the case back to the district court.  Furthermore, though the injunction had covered about 500 million board feet of timber, sales of much of that will be on hold until the Fish & Wildlife Service completes months of hearings it is holding to protect the owl.  There are an estimated 3,000 pairs of the owl in the area.  Still, a BLM spokesman in Portland said the agency plans in 30 days to take bids on the sale of about 66 million board feet of timber.  It sounds like an entrepreneur's dream: New York financier Lionel Pincus is organizing a $2 billion venture-capital fund.  The E.M. Warburg, Pincus & Co. fund will dwarf even the $1.2 billion fund Mr. Pincus organized three years ago, and it will be five times larger than any other venture partnership.  Mr. Pincus, chairman and largest owner of Warburg Pincus, plans to finish lining up the investors by the end of the month.  The project carries to new extremes a trend toward ever-larger venture-capital funds.  But instead of benefiting from the trend, start-up companies in need of capital find they are still out in the cold.  The bigger the venture-capital funds get, the less interested many become in truly new ventures.  "When you have that much money, the tendency is to put it out in large chunks," says Newport Beach, Calif., venture capitalist Frederick M. Haney.  "Very little of it is likely to go to early-stage companies."  Indeed, little of the $1.2 billion fund raised by Warburg Pincus in 1986 has gone to finance start-ups.  Among the fund's big investments: a $175 million refinancing of Pittsburgh's Mellon Bank Corp.; a $90 million investment in Magma Copper Co., a spinoff of Newmont Mining Corp., and a $60 million stake in Westward Communications, a London-based entertainment conglomerate.  Years ago, Mr. Pincus focused on start-ups.  And Warburg Pincus still does have start-up companies in its portfolio.  In 1986, it financed the start up of Cambridge NeuroScience Research Inc., Cambridge, Mass., with a $7 million investment.  It also invested $6 million in the expansion of San Francisco Music Box Co.  But truly new ventures have become a smaller and smaller part of the Warburg Pincus universe.  Mr. Pincus, who declined to be interviewed for this article, nowadays describes himself as more a venture banker than a venture capitalist.  He invests in a variety of ventures, including special situations.  Many others in the field are also shying away from early-stage investments as the venture-capital industry grows.  According to Venture Economics Inc., an industry research group in Wellesley Hills, Mass., the total assets of venture capital funds soared to $32 billion at the end of last year, more than double the figure five years earlier.  But the bigger funds often conclude that the only efficient way to invest their funds is to focus on companies larger than the typical start-up.  Many are pouring money into buy-outs.  J.H. Whitney & Co., New York, one of the industry's oldest venture firms, recently announced it had completed the $1.3 billion acquisition of Prime Computer Inc. Last year, Primus Capital Fund of Cleveland and Warburg Pincus committed more than $50 million to the buy-out of LiTel Telecommunications Corp., a Worthington, Ohio, provider of voice and data transmissions.  Sequoia Capital, Menlo Park, Calif., led a $12 million investment in the buy-out of Microchip Technology from General Instruments Corp.  Boston's Bain Capital, which began as an investor in such start-ups as Staples Inc., now will only invest in buy-outs.  And other venture capital concerns such as Merrill, Pickard, Anderson & Eyre, Alan Patricof Associates and Hambro International Venture Fund are allocating increasingly larger sums to leveraged transactions.  Hambro, for example, recently invested $3.6 million in the $47.7 million buy-out of Building Technologies Corp., a maker of metal building systems from Southwestern General Corp., a troubled Cincinnati conglomerate.  Together with another investor, Hambro raised another $40 million in straight and subordinated debt.  Venture capitalist Edwin Goodman says that Hambro will work with the managers, who now own 20% of Building Technologies, to streamline the company's business and sell off some property.  It will also help launch dealerships to expand the company's markets.  "We're going to work with the company the same way we do with any venture investment," he says.  But much of the buy-out money "is going to financial engineering, not to fund growing, small businesses," says Anthony Hoberman, who heads venture capital investing for Alliance Capital Management in New York.  "If we are talking about young companies, it's going to be harder for them to raise money."  Others fret that the task of handling large sums of capital has forced senior venture capitalists to delegate the task of monitoring portfolio companies to relatively inexperienced and untrained associates.  "Even when small companies get money, they're not getting a lot of assistance," says James Biundo, who manages pension funds for U S West Inc., in Englewood, Colo.  Adds an Oklahoma City scientist who has unsuccessfully tried to attract professional investors for two important technology projects: "Getting money from professional venture capitalists is next to impossible.  Many of the people we talk to aren't capable of judging new technologies."  For eight years, the scientist has tried to raise $500,000 to make a device he says lowers costs of oil production.  But the big venture-capital funds like the results of their new approach.  Warburg Pincus has been earning more than 25% annually on invested capital.  Fees can be huge.  Many big venture firms receive annual fees of 2.5% to 3% of the funds invested, or as much as 20% of total capital over the life of the fund.  Warburg Pincus, for example, will receive an estimated $216 million in fees, or about 18%, of the total $1.2 billion fund it raised in 1986.  It also will receive 20% of all profits.  "The fee structure doesn't make sense," says Alliance Capital's Mr. Hoberman.  The fees were established when most funds were small, and "they are indefensible on such a large scale," Mr. Hoberman says, adding, "This is becoming a fee-driven business where venture capitalists are driven more by management fees than by actual performances."  But James Swartz, a managing partner of Accel Partners, a Princeton, N.J., venture capital firm, contends that the fee excesses are things of the past when money was "thrown at the industry."  These days, "all of the better fund managers have to depend on performance to fully realize their earnings power," adds Mr. Swartz, former head of the National Venture Capital Association, an industry trade group.  Whatever the case, some say the venture-capital industry has little choice but to focus increasingly on bigger companies.  After showing annual returns as high as 50% compounded on mostly high technology investing, the industry found itself swamped with money in the early 1980s.  But the combination of big money and a plethora of look-alike investments, mostly in technology, created its own problem.  "It's not easy to put large sums of money to work in this business," says Craig Foley, managing director of Chancellor Investment Management, New York.  "Investors are disappointed in the returns from venture capital," he adds.  "It's easier to responsibly invest more capital in leveraged transactions than in conventional venture deals," says Hambro's Mr. Goodman.  Compared with traditional venture investing, "leveraged transactions take a shorter time to mature, have lower risks and generate returns comparable to those of the past," Mr. Goodman says.  Adds William Mulligan of Primus: "Right now, buy-outs are more rewarding than conventional venture capital."  There isn't another commodity in the world today that leaves so large a margin of profit for the little guy than coca or, in coca's processed form, cocaine.  In economic terms its rationality is overwhelming.  The cocaine trade is a splendid example of "market forces" -- the subject of lavish praise these days -- in action.  Consider it first from the point of view of an Andean peasant.  A short-term crop of maize gets him maybe $150 an acre; livestock just a few dollars an acre; coca maybe $5,000 or $10,000 an acre.  Coca production uses plenty of labor and the peasants get well-paid.  Because local processing is simple, it is easy to break monopolies in first-stage processing, so local middlemen and local commerce can thrive.  The Andean flank of the Amazon basin is run by the coca trade and everything in the coca-producing countries rests on this huge economic base worth about $60 billion a year and creating more jobs and exports than anything else.  Cocaine agriculture is development policy in the region.  And cocaine selling is a very rational career choice for a young black male in the U.S. inner city of today.  If all roads lead to hell, why not take the one that's sometimes paved with gold?  The rise of post-industrial America damaged many lives, but none more than that of the black male.  Take Los Angeles.  In a fairly brief period about 80,000 industrial jobs, in auto assembly, tires and similar occupations, disappeared.  The life supports of well over a million people were therefore cut, with no alternative in sight and almost no safety net provided by a city that has seen no public housing constructed since shortly after World War II.  Crack distribution offers escape from poverty and despair.  The rewards are high (as are the occupational risks) and the wider society wholeheartedly endorses the ethic of rapid, brutish accumulation.  As with liquor distribution during Prohibition, cocaine offers substantial new opportunity for stifled entrepreneurial vigor.  The political culture that created the conditions in which crack selling is the rational career choice for a black 16-year-old now views the drug "problem" with emotions well beyond hysteria.  The newspapers regularly carry letters urging mandatory life imprisonment and not infrequently execution for offenders.  In fact, the larger society is not overly distressed by the consequences of the drug culture so long as they remain within the ghettos of the have-nots.  A mayor or a policeman would rather see a black youth with crack in his pocket than the writings of Malcolm X, or the late Huey Newton dealing in drugs rather than organizing the resistance.  If the Crips and Bloods of Los Angeles were only to kill each other, no great perturbation would transpire.  But policemen and politicians don't like headlines about innocent bystanders or tourists being caught in cross fire.  A "war" on drugs, like any war on crime, has distinct political advantages.  It is popular with white, middle-class voters.  It doesn't cost much, and it enables police chiefs to urge successfully the removal of vexatious laws protecting individual rights.  In the present drug "war," long-cherished constitutional protections are being shunted aside with the same elan as Chief Darrell Gates's battering ram bashing in the doors of suspected crack houses in Los Angeles.  In the end, the "war" adds up as a boom in prison construction.  The White House likes wars on drugs in Latin America for the same sort of reasons.  A Congress that balked at direct U.S. military intervention in Nicaragua has no qualms about seeing DEA hardware on tarmacs in Colombia, Bolivia and Peru, and does not lose sleep asking whether the taxpayers' money is being spent in a war on drugs or on left-wing guerrillas.  As others have remarked recently, U.S. government policy on drugs adds up as a prison state for black America and a Viet Nam war in the Andes.  It's not as though Colombia is seeing decades of civic calm disturbed by the gunslingers of the cartel.  The "violencia" of an earlier period killed, according to many reckonings, more than 200,000 people, which makes the rampages of the men of Medellin look sedate by comparison.  No government is going to spurn $65 million, which is what the U.S. is sending Colombia to beat the drug lords, even though the Colombians probably wish the U.S. had kept its $65 million and not sabotaged the international coffee agreement, an act that could cost Colombia $800 million a year.  Almost everything about the drug "war" has to be translated.  The Colombian army is not locked in a life or death struggle with the cartel, but rather locked in with the cartel in a predictable fructifying alliance, against the FARC and M-19 left-wing guerrilla movements and others who interfere in a lucrative business.  The army and the government were not at all distressed to see more than a thousand leftist activists, who had embarked upon legal opposition activities, get murdered by right-wing death squads.  This relaxed attitude to political assassination was matched by the U.S. press and by the U.S. government, which has barely reported these killings.  Nor can this same U.S. government pretend to much revulsion against the cartel.  According to one Medellin employee, Ramon Melian Rodriguez, now in prison in the U.S., the U.S. government has been dealing with the cartel for years.  One of Panamanian Gen. Manuel Noriega's functions was to act as intermediary in transactions that included the supply by the Medellin cartel of large sums of money to the Nicaragua Contras.  From peasant to president, therefore, we can see that rationality prevails.  U.S. drug aid to Colombia will no doubt end up in the pockets of Colombian cocaine executives, just as similar aid to Afghanistan has greased the wheels of the heroin convoys.  This is rational, too, since it is politically easier to throw money at the problem, so long as the money lands somewhere on the other side of the world, rather than on a street in a black slum where a member of the dangerous, undeserving and now superfluous classes might pick it up.  President Bush concluded his address to the nation Tuesday night by citing a newspaper story about a little boy in Washington D.C. suburb who had said he didn't want to sell drugs but was nonetheless resigned to the fact that selling drugs is what he might well end up doing.  The president expressed the hope that his $8 billion plan to end the drug trade would keep the lad out of the drug business.  But neither Mr. Bush nor any other politician seems to have any idea of what else this boy and his fellows might look to in order to keep body and soul together.  ---  Afterword: Three weeks ago I described the menace of pharmaceutical production on my boyhood turf of east Cork in the Ireland, and suggested local hostility might halt it.  On Monday, Merrell Dow, subsidiary of Dow Chemical, announced that for tax and merger reasons it would not be building a plant near Killeagh.  The Irish Industrial Development Authority told the Irish press that Merrell Dow had "insisted" that but for local opposition, which had delayed construction, the plant would have gone ahead.  ---  Mr. Cockburn is a columnist for The Nation and LA Weekly.  Trade talks between South Korea and the U.S. on telecommunications got off to a slow start.  An official at the Korean Ministry of Communications said the two sides failed to reach an agreement yesterday on the first day of a two-day meeting here on U.S. demands for improved access to the Korean market.  Although South Korea managed to keep off the U.S. list of unfair-trading countries, the Bush administration is pushing Seoul to liberalize its telecommunications market.  Placer Dome Inc. agreed to indirectly sell certain oil and gas assets to Amoco Corp.'s Canadian unit, for total proceeds of about 45 million Canadian dollars (US$38.1 million).  The proposed sale is part of a three-way transaction involving Oracle Resources Ltd., a small Calgary, Alberta-based oil and gas concern, under which Oracle said it agreed to acquire about C$53 million of oil and gas assets from the Amoco unit, Amoco Canada Petroleum Co.  Oracle's president, H. Graham Gammell, said the proposed transactions would settle a 1987 dispute involving Placer Dome, a big gold producer, and Dome Petroleum Ltd., a troubled oil and gas concern that was acquired by Calgary-based Amoco Canada last year.  Mr. Gammell said the assets it agreed to acquire from Amoco Canada would replace certain assets that Oracle previously proposed to acquire from Placer Dome.  Dome Petroleum objected to the planned sale, on the grounds that it held the right of first refusal on the Placer Dome assets, a Placer Dome spokesman said.  Oracle said all legal claims between the parties have been terminated, and the transactions are expected to close by the end of November.  A far-reaching drug plan that envisions tougher law enforcement -- with mandatory sentencing and a crackdown on small-time drug users.  It sounds a lot like the proposal President Bush unveiled Tuesday night.  But to some people, it has the distinct ring of the doomed anti-drug effort that New York Gov. Nelson Rockefeller led 20 years ago.  "We sure have seen some of these ideas before," says Adam Walinsky, a former chairman of the New York State Investigations Committee and a Rockefeller critic.  Nearly two decades ago, amid another "drug epidemic," Gov. Rockefeller sought to battle drug use by making his state what the Drug Abuse Council called a "laboratory" for a tougher government approach.  Although the Bush plan is far more sophisticated than the relatively crude scheme proposed by the late New York Republican, they share a "get-tough" philosophy, an emphasis on punishing drug users and a reliance on mandatory minimum sentences.  Critics say these approaches don't deter drug use -- they simply put more people in jail, at an average annual cost of roughly $20,000 a prisoner, while diverting attention from the causes of drug abuse.  "We have doubled the number of inmates in our nation's prisons over the past decade, many of them locked up for drug-related offenses," says Malcolm Young, executive director of the Sentencing Project, a prisoner-advocacy group here.  "Yet there has been no appreciable drop in crime, and drugs remain potent and prevalent."  Since the Nixon years, government has undertaken a series of anti-drug initiatives, though none nearly as ambitious as the one unveiled this week by Mr. Bush.  The closest parallel, however, is the Rockefeller plan.  The minimum mandatory sentences prescribed by the Rockefeller initiatives were harsh; those convicted of being in possession of a pound of heroin or cocaine could be punished by life imprisonment.  The Bush plan, however, recognizes more gradations in drug crimes.  "I wouldn't make a blanket statement that regardless of the circumstances, anyone in possession of a pound should be taken off the streets for life," says Reggie Walton, associate director of the Office of National Drug Control Policy.  But the administration's plan does call for, without specifying, minimum mandatory sentences based on the seriousness of drug crimes, including drug trafficking, possession of large amounts of drugs, selling drugs to children or using children to sell drugs.  Drug czar William Bennett sets out a wide variety of discretionary punishments -- including "military-style boot camps," strictly supervised halfway houses and stiff fines -- for crimes such as possession or distribution of small amounts of illegal drugs, which typically elude punishment now.  In New York, at least, mandatory minimum sentences proved to be unsuccessful in the fight against heroin.  A study commissioned by the Association of the Bar of the City of New York found that the law, which also restricted plea bargaining for lower charges, didn't bring down heroin use, didn't cut the illegal use of other drugs and didn't trim drug-related crime.  The new Bush plan, like the Rockefeller program before it, is built around the conclusion that "the criminal justice system serves as one of the most powerful forms of drug prevention."  A principal thrust of the new plan is to assure that "all drug use -- whatever its scale -- faces the risk of criminal sanction," as Mr. Bennett says.  A similar philosophy undergirded much of the Rockefeller program, which culminated with "indefinite" jail sentences that carried minimums of 15 years for those who sold as little as one ounce of heroin or possessed more than two ounces.  "Rockefeller went through the same transition we're going through now," says David Musto, a Yale University historian of medicine.  "He first wanted to treat everybody.  Then he discovered that treatment wasn't all that effective, and he went into law enforcement."  The governor told the state legislature that heroin addicts were "robbing, mugging, murdering, day in and day out, for their money to fix their habit" and, in response to his prodding, the state legislature from 1969 to 1973 passed a series of ever-stricter drug measures.  Albert Rosenblatt, an appeals court judge in New York and the author of a book on the Rockefeller drug laws, says the legislation was a landmark because it was designed to punish users -- just as the Bush plan proposes to make users a major law-enforcement target.  "There had been a belief that all you have to do is arrest sellers and drug abuse would stop," Mr. Rosenblatt says.  "Rockefeller's drug laws threw that idea out and targeted users with penalties of unprecedented stringency."  But what sounded good in theory raised qualms in practice, Mr. Rosenblatt says.  "When the police went out and made these arrests, people began to wonder if these harsh sentences were appropriate," he says.  Mr. Walinsky characterizes the Rockefeller approach more bluntly -- as "an enormous failure and a prime stupidity."  According to the New York bar association report, the rate of conviction in state superior courts actually fell by almost one-half in three years.  The report concluded that "court delays reduced the threat of the new law" by short-circuiting it before offenders ever reached the sentencing stage.  Mandatory-sentencing and plea-bargaining provisions of the law, it found, encouraged more drug defendants to take their cases to trial, with the result that within a year, it took "roughly 10 times as much court time to dispose of a case."  In Manhattan, with jails overburdened, lower bail was set for felony drug offenders under the new law than under the old.  As the first results of the Rockefeller anti-drug offensive emerged, a commission examining narcotics-law enforcement found that only a third of those convicted of drug offenses received sentences of more than a year.  The laws were substantially amended a decade ago.  Some lawmakers worry that the Bush administration proposal may encounter some of the problems that sank the Rockefeller plan.  "Law enforcement is not going to do anywhere near the full job," says Democratic Rep. Joseph Brennan, a former prosecutor and governor of Maine who serves on Select Committee on Narcotics.  But Rep. Stan Parris (R., Va.), another narcotics panel member, believes the idea merits a new effort.  "If we don't," he says, "the smart defense lawyers will protect the people who burn the brains of all the elementary-school kids."  Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.'s former head of stock-loan operations has agreed to plead guilty to criminal charges and to cooperate with the Manhattan U.S. attorney's office in a wide-ranging investigation of the stock-loan industry, people familiar with the case said last night.  For more than a year, the Manhattan U.S. attorney's office has been investigating certain aspects of the highly profitable stock-loan industry, in which major securities firms such as Shearson lend large blocks of stock to big investors in return for fees.  Officials at Shearson, which is 62%-owned by American Express Co., have said they don't believe the firm itself is a target of the inquiry.  Little has been disclosed about the specifics of the investigation.  But last summer, a grand jury issued subpoenas requesting records about investments and transactions involving Dennis T. Palmeri, who at the time was Shearson's executive vice president in charge of stock loans.  After that disclosure last summer, Shearson confirmed that federal investigators had requested information from the securities firm about its stock-loan business, but said it didn't think "the firm or any of its employees are the target of an investigation."  Mr. Palmeri resigned voluntarily from Shearson on June 28 after being on a leave of absence since the spring of 1989, a Shearson spokesman said yesterday.  An individual familiar with the case said Mr. Palmeri has already negotiated the terms of his plea agreement.  The individual would say only that Mr. Palmeri will plead guilty to charges related to the stock-loan business.  Mr. Palmeri's New Jersey home telephone number is unlisted and he couldn't be reached for comment.  Mr. Palmeri's attorney, Stanley S. Arkin, said he had no comment.  The U.S. attorney's office declined to comment.  Yesterday afternoon, Shearson released this statement: "The U.S. attorney's office has requested information from Shearson Lehman Hutton relating to a former employee of our stock-loan department and we have been cooperating fully with the request."  Among his duties while at Shearson, Mr. Palmeri supervised the lending of stock to such large speculators as Ivan F. Boesky.  Mr. Boesky cooperated with the government on various investigations of possible securities-law violations after he become embroiled in the Wall Street insider-trading investigation.  People familiar with the Palmeri case say it's an offshoot of the Boesky investigation.  Most large brokerage firms have active stock-lending operations.  Stocks are generally lent to institutions or individuals who need stock quickly and can't or don't want to purchase enough shares.  For example, firms use stock loans when clients want to make so-called short sales -- in which investors borrow stock and sell it, hoping to profit by replacing the stock at a lower price.  While the brokerage firms make big profits on the fees they charge for stock lending, the industry has also been a source of corruption over the years.  Prior cases have alleged such actions as improper payments in return for interest-free stock loans, the lending of stock that wasn't eligible for lending, and creation of phony transactions.  Over the years, the federal government has brought various criminal and civil cases involving allegedly improper stock-loan activities.  In 1987, Shearson, which has one of the major stock-loan operations on Wall Street, was censured by the Securities and Exchange Commission.  The SEC alleged in a civil case that Shearson "unlawfully used customers' securities" for stock loans in November 1985, with the largest improper use of customers' securities occurring on Nov. 4, 1985, when the company used about $69 million of such securities for illegal stock loans.  Shearson said the alleged violations were "technical in nature" and that no customers were harmed.  The firm, which neither admitted nor denied the SEC allegations, agreed to make changes in its internal procedures.  Panhandle Eastern Corp. said it reached a new accord to sell its British oil and gas assets for $961.3 million, this time to three energy companies that had fought over the right to buy the properties.  Panhandle agreed last spring to sell the vast North Sea assets, at the same price, to Enterprise Oil PLC of London.  But British Gas PLC of London and Amerada Hess Corp. of New York challenged that accord, and a British court ruled that the three prospective buyers should each get some of the properties.  The buyers will also pay interest on the purchase price to compensate Panhandle for the delay in the sale.  The transaction will enable Panhandle to repay the balance of a $1.7 billion bridge loan made in connection with its $3.22 billion acquisition earlier this year of Texas Eastern Corp.  Panhandle has virtually completed the sale of the non-pipeline assets of Texas Eastern, aside from some major real-estate holdings.  After paying off the bridge loan, Panhandle will have about $1.2 billion of acquisition-related debt remaining.  The company said it is looking at all options, including restructuring of the debt.  Under the agreement Enterprise will pay about $289 million plus interest for all or part of Texas Eastern's North Sea interests in three producing North Sea fields, which contain oil reserves estimated at about 93 million barrels.  British Gas and Amerada Hess will pay about $673 million plus interest for the remainder of the Texas Eastern North Sea properties.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, Panhandle shares closed at $28.125 each, down 50 cents.  Sen. Ivan Marulanda is running for his life.  Just beginning his re-election campaign, the 43-year-old candidate who has often spoken out against drugs, sleeps in a different bed every night.  He never rides in his own car.  His campaign will consist of unscheduled, unannounced appearances.  Eventually, if he is re-elected, he will have to show up for sessions of the Colombian Congress.  He knows the hit men could be waiting.  "I don't care if they kill me," the senator says, a sense of resignation washing over him.  Why does he seek public office?  "I want to leave to my children a respectable country."  At stake in Colombia is more than the drug cartel that controls the massive flow of much of the cocaine into the U.S.  The rule of law itself, a cornerstone of civilization since ancient times, is under siege.  Politicians, judges, officials and journalists who reject bribes and speak out receive continual death threats.  So do members of their families.  Hundreds of those threats have been carried out in brutal murders.  Now the drug lords have declared "total and absolute" war against the government.  Yet somehow, hundreds of Colombians and several important institutions have mustered the courage to embark on what seem like almost suicidal missions against the drug lords.  Their plight was dramatized last week when 32-year-old justice minister Monica de Greiff, whose husband and three-year-old son have also been threatened, came to Washington to plead for more aid for their cause.  These are some of their stories.  THE NEWSPAPER  Even as they were blasted out of their sleep Saturday morning by an explosion heard all over Bogota, reporters from El Espectador, Colombia's second largest newspaper, say they knew what had happened: Their newspaper had been bombed.  "As I woke up, I immediately thought -- El Espectador," says Harold Leiter, a wiry reporter watching his colleagues sweep the glass of the newspaper's shattered windows off the newsroom floor.  The massive truck-bomb explosion turned a neighboring gasoline station into a pile of rubble and twisted steel, injured 73 passers-by and employees, and caused extensive damage to the newspaper.  The bomb, estimated to have had the force of at least 110 pounds of TNT, was almost certainly the work of terrorists in the pay of Colombia's drug barons, government officials say.  For years, El Espectador has been on the front lines of Colombia's drug war.  Despite the danger, the newspaper, owned by the Cano family, has shown a disdain for the drug barons.  Among other things, it refused to print their communiques.  The paper's anti-drug position is "almost a religion with them," says Alejandro Reyes, a political scientist here.  And like many other religions, El Espectador's crusade has produced its share of martyrs.  In December 1986, Guillermo Cano, the newspaper's editor-in-chief, was machine-gunned in front of the building by a motorcycle-riding hit man.  Two years later, Hector Giraldo, a lawyer, columnist and director for the newspaper, who was following the investigation of Mr. Cano's murder for the editor's family, was assassinated as he left for work.  Two of the newspaper's reporters have also been killed.  For most Colombians, the reasons for the murders and the bombing are clear.  In 1983, El Espectador helped spoil drug lord Pablo Escobar's bid for respectability by publishing a story on Mr. Escobar's first cocaine bust.  His picture was displayed prominently alongside the story.  Although the newspaper's drug stories weren't signed, a common precaution here, Mr. Cano kept up the attack in his weekly column.  Mr. Escobar, whose budding parliamentary career the paper helped ruin, apparently didn't forgive or forget, prosecutors have alleged.  He is one of those who have been indicted for the editor's murder.  Since the latest outbreak of violence, the newspaper's employees have been living from death threat to death threat.  Reporters say that Colombia's intelligence service warned the paper of a plan concocted by the drug kingpins to bomb the building from a helicopter.  Other threats were more personal.  Ignacio Gomez, who is in charge of the paper's investigative unit, got a telephone call telling him to be sure to be at the newspaper Saturday because a bomb was going to go off.  From sales clerk to editor-in-chief, everyone knew El Espectador would be hit.  It was just a matter of time.  Still, says Luis Gabriel Cano, the paper's white-haired, grandfatherly president, "We cannot surrender the country to those people."  Within five hours of the blast, the paper's computers were working.  Grimy pressmen picked glass slivers from the ink rollers of a press unit that was soon put into service.  Striding through the broken glass, Mr. Cano, the brother of the murdered editor, was adamant: El Espectador's crusade would not be silent.  "The newspaper will come out tomorrow.  It will be four or five pages, but it will come out," Mr. Cano said without breaking his stride.  A 16-page edition was published with the headline: "We will go forward."  THE POLITICIAN  Sen. Marulanda, who represents Antioquia, the home state of the Medellin drug cartel, Colombia's most powerful, nervously eyes the entrance to the cafeteria of a Bogota hotel while he sips a papaya juice.  Three weeks ago, his party's candidate for president, fellow senator Luis Carlos Galan, was murdered in the presence of 20 bodyguards.  Mr. Marulanda was a close friend of Mr. Galan's.  A few days later, the party's headquarters were blown up.  Now, in hastily rented hotel rooms and in the apartments of friends, he and his advisers are trying to decide how to run a campaign for next year's elections in which it isn't safe for Mr. Marulanda to show his face.  "We are trying to put together a clandestine political struggle," he says.  The drug war, which has gone on in earnest for the past five years, is generally said to have begun with the 1984 murder of another member of Mr. Galan's movement, Justice Minister Lara Bonilla.  Since then, the war has claimed about 1,300 policemen, 220 judges and judicial aides, an attorney general, a governor and one other presidential candidate.  Mr. Marulanda himself says he once had to leave the country for six months because of the danger, and that another time he escaped by minutes four gunmen who had arrived at his house to kill him.  For Mr. Marulanda, one of 11 children, the war on cocaine is also an intensely personal one.  A brother was convicted of trafficking and served three years in a U.S. prison.  That drove the family to "the brink of desperation" and strengthened his resolve to oppose the cartel, he says.  "There comes the moment you are ready for anything except to quit the struggle," he says.  "There must be a winner."  THE COLUMNIST  While standing recently in the crowded newsroom of the country's leading newspaper, El Tiempo, one of Colombia's most influential columnists got some friendly advice from a colleague.  Leave the country for a few days.  Your last column, the one written after the death of Sen. Galan, was too strong.  In that column, Enrique Santos Calderon called for the government to take every measure necessary against the drug mafia.  It was written "in a rage," says Mr. Santos.  Mr. Galan had been a colleague and a friend.  Mr. Santos, a thin man who brims with nervous energy, won't leave, but he does take plenty of precautions.  He drives a bulletproof car, changes routes daily, works irregular hours, and must sometimes take strategically timed vacations to avoid assassination.  He counsels his wife, who is expecting a baby, not to give away even the most innocent household plans on the telephone.  He rarely goes out to dinner.  "No more rumbas," he says with a laugh.  A degree of fatalism is inevitable, he says.  The only real safety would be to quit writing and leave the country, something he has no plans of doing.  Still, terror has left a mark on his writing, he allows.  In particular, Mr. Santos says, he is careful in the use of adjectives.  Every word is carefully measured.  "I have learned not to provoke but I haven't abandoned the story," he says.  THE MAGISTRATES  Three weeks ago, Carlos Valencia, a criminal-court appeals judge, left his chambers with three bodyguards after upholding a warrant for the arrest of Mr. Escobar, the cocaine baron, and Jose Rodriguez Gacha, another drug dealer known as "the Mexican."  Both men were wanted for their alleged role in the killing of Mr. Cano, the newspaper editor.  Fifteen minutes after signing the warrant, Dr. Valencia was machine-gunned in his car in a downtown Bogota street by assassins presumed to be in the pay of the two drug lords.  "The day they killed Dr. Valencia, he was in the best spirits he'd been in a long time," remembers an assistant to the late judge.  "He felt as if he had lifted a weight off his shoulders.  He felt as if he'd gotten the better of the situation."  Now, one of the late judge's colleagues looks up warily from a stack of briefs.  "We knew he was threatened," says the judge, who asked not to be identified out of fear for his own safety.  "But we didn't know the situation was that serious.  Dr. Valencia never told us."  This judge has himself received three telephoned death threats.  "As soon as we rule, they know," he says.  Armed policemen in uniform as well as submachine-gun-toting Colombian secret servicemen in plain clothes roam the halls of the building where Dr. Valencia worked.  Young girls' laughter from the playground of a nearby school filters in through the windows.  But there is nothing but fear in the modest chambers where Dr. Valencia's colleagues continue to preside.  "There are professions that carry a risk," says one of the magistrates, a small-boned man in a cheap polyester suit who works nervously at the knot of his tie.  "I try not to carry the memory of what happened to Dr. Valencia to the practice of law."  The judge's assistant remembers opening up the mail of another judge who had also participated with Dr. Valencia in the drug lords' case and finding a death threat.  "You can't recuse yourself, take a vacation or resign," the letter said.  "You must vacate the order."  Down the hall another judge, one who doesn't have any drug-linked cases, has just received a black-trimmed condolence card regretting his own death.  "We must uphold the law," he says gazing out the window.  "If not, where would Colombia be?"  Parked outside the building, a Toyota Landcruiser with black-tinted, bulletproof windows waits to take the judges home.  When the Thompsons of Dallas took Southland private in 1987 to escape a raider, they made a killing, taking an estimated $200 million out of the company.  But it's starting to look as if they left junk-bond investors holding the bag.  Nearly two years after its $4.9 billion leveraged buy-out, the company's big chain of 7-Eleven stores should by now have been in pretty good shape, according to the Thompsons' earlier rosy forecasts.  Instead, Southland is showing signs of increasing strain.  To stay afloat, it has had to keep borrowing money and selling assets, spurring talk among some investment bankers that it might have to restructure its big debts.  The Southland saga shows that leverage can hurt even so-called ideal LBO candidates.  Convenience stores were thought to have dependable businesses that could support big debts.  But Southland's cash flow "hasn't proven so stable," says Frank Colombo, who runs Dillon Read's junk-bond research.  In 1989's first half, sales actually fell at Southland's 7-Elevens, after subtracting inflation, and profit margins shrank.  The 7-Elevens are said to have fared poorly even in July and August, peak summer months.  And Southland's operations in 1989 won't produce enough cash flow even to pay its $448 million cash interest bill, let alone a $258 million bank payment due in December.  Long-term debt stands at about $3.7 billion.  The Thompsons now are trying to buy time by selling Southland's crown jewels, mainly its 50% stake in Citgo, a refinery.  Meanwhile, to tide it over, the company has a $450 million revolving credit from banks.  Southland says it's in good standing with its banks.  But in recent weeks, panicky holders of Southland's $1.5 billion of high-yield junk bonds have slashed prices of some Southland issues by one-fifth, to 56 cents to 75 cents on the dollar.  All Southland's bonds now yield more than 24%, while some debt of Safeway, considered a solid credit, yields only 11.5%.  Some Southland bonds might have further to fall, says Mariel Clemensen, who runs Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette's junkbond research.  If Southland keeps selling businesses to service debt, she says, there won't be enough assets left to protect all bondholders.  Already, Southland has sold almost 1,000 of its 8,000 stores.  Southland's problem is typical of more and more LBOs: too much debt.  Says Dillon Read analyst Evan Mann, "The Thompsons wanted to keep the family company, so they overpaid."  To evade Canadian raider Sam Belzberg, the Thompsons took Southland private in 1987 at high, pre-crash prices.  After the crash, underwriters Goldman Sachs and Salomon had trouble selling Southland bonds.  But the Thompsons, bigwigs in Dallas, convinced investors that growing profit margins and asset sales would bail Southland out of its debts.  That hasn't happened, partly because oil companies are invading the convenience-store business.  "We don't see any lessening of competitive conditions," says Markeeta McNatt, Southland's investor relations officer.  But she says Southland is doing better than other independent chains and is "in a good strategic position."  The Thompsons won't be immune if Southland falters.  But they're much better off than the company's bondholders.  In the buy-out of Southland, the Thompsons got $350 million in cash and securities for their original 9% Southland stake.  The Thompsons put back $200 million of equity into the LBO, but later sold $50 million of that stake.  With the Thompsons at the helm, Southland started out in the 1920s selling bread and milk at its ice stores.  In today's more skeptical market, investors say the Thompsons' deal wouldn't get done.  Circle K, the No. 2 convenience-store chain, is currently having trouble raising money for a planned buy-out.  Only a year after its LBO, Southland refinanced a big chunk of debt, but the exchange offer proved to be only a Band-Aid.  Now, bears think the company might need major surgery.  To cut bank debt, Southland last May put on the block some assets it wanted to keep, including its Citgo stake, which has given it an edge over other independent chains.  But even after Citgo is sold, analysts say Southland won't be out of the woods.  The 50% stake in Citgo, jointly owned with Venezuela, has been valued as high as $700 million.  But some say Citgo won't fetch top prices; Southland is said to have recently turned down an offer closer to $500 million.  Southland won't confirm that.  Unless Southland sells more assets after Citgo, Dillon Read estimates it will face cash shortfalls of $89 million in 1990, $271 million in 1991 and $485 million in 1992.  Southland thinks those numbers are a bit high.  Some people say Southland is getting a raw deal from investors.  They say the company will be shipshape after selling its Citgo stake, perhaps by year end.  Southland's food processing and distribution units also are up for sale, though one investment banker says they might be a tough sell at high prices.  Proceeds from these asset sales would make a big dent in Southland's $1.6 billion of bank debt.  Often, when companies announce asset sales, their bonds trade higher, if only briefly.  Some speculators think Southland's junior bonds and preferred shares are worth a gamble.  The preferred was at 7 3/8 yesterday, down from a 12-month high of 12 3/8.  But with junk investors jittery these days, it's hard to trade in and out of the market.  Earlier this year, bonds of debt-laden Interco cratered when investors tried to get out.  Compounding Southland's problems, the Thompsons haven't been great merchandisers, analysts say.  Southland's advertising costs are at an all-time high, yet sales and profit margins aren't growing.  Until recently, Southland was pushing low-margin products such as beer and cigarettes, though it now is promoting hot dogs and sandwiches, which have fatter profit margins.  Southland also has a $475 million office complex in Dallas to worry about.  Cityplace Center, with only one tenant besides Southland, is said to cost about $50 million a year to run.  "It's a white elephant," says one investment banker.  ---  Don't judge advice by its price.  Investors often wonder if the expensive investment newsletters give better advice than the cheap ones.  The answer is no, judging by some recent findings of Mark Hulbert, whose Hulbert Financial Digest is an official scorer of sorts for the market-letter industry.  Mr. Hulbert divided the newsletters he has tracked for nine years into two groups: the 50% with the better records during that time, and the 50% with the poorer records.  Average subscription price of the more successful group was $194.  Average price for the laggards: a costlier $212.  -- John R. Dorfman  Everex Systems Inc. said booming sales of its high-end personal computers drove earnings up 127% on a sales increase of 23% in the fiscal fourth quarter ended July 31.  The Fremont, Calif., computer and computer-peripheral maker said its net income was $6.7 million in the quarter, or 28 cents a share, up from $2.9 million, or 13 cents a share, a year earlier.  Sales rose to $97.4 million from $78.9 million.  The company said net for the year was $21.3 million, or 91 cents a share, up 103% from $10.5 million, or 45 cents a share, in 1988.  Sales rose to $377.3 million from $266.7 million.  Everex attributed the sharp profit rise to increased sales of its own brand of computers, particularly its high-end desktop computers based on Intel Corp.'s 80386 and 80386SX microprocessor chips.  THE RULING PARTY HEADED toward an election setback in South Africa.  Hundreds of thousands of disenfranchised blacks, excluded from voting in the segregated parliamentary balloting, staged anti-election strikes as partial returns showed the governing National Party sustaining its worst setback in 41 years of power.  Projections indicated gains by leftist and far-right opposition parties.  Indians and people of mixed race joined the anti-government strikes, which closed many factories and schools.  It was considered the biggest outburst of anti-apartheid unrest in years.  Police dispersed protest rallies in about 20 townships.  Authorities said more than 50 people were arrested, and there were reports of injuries.  ---  Bush's anti-drug plan sparked a late-year budget scramble in Congress, where the administration risks a new round of military cuts unless it comes up with a more credible plan to finance its proposals.  The president, meanwhile, defended his $7.9 billion initiative and said critics of the plan were just "carping."  Colombia extradited a reputed drug financier to the U.S., a U.S. official said.  Eduardo Martinez Romero is accused of laundering money for cocaine cartels.  In addition, Colombia offered a $250,000 reward for information leading to the arrest of two alleged cocaine cartel bosses.  ---  The Bush administration plans "working level" discussions with Chinese officials in Washington next week to discuss issues related to Beijing's bid to join the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade.  U.S. officials stressed that the meeting wouldn't violate Bush's ban on high-level contacts with China's authorities.  ---  Three chemical makers said they are limiting the uses of a popular class of fungicides on produce because of concern over potential cancer risks.  The action follows the release of EPA data showing that exposure to EBDC exceeds the risks posed by the chemical Alar.  ---  The Navy concluded that the April 19 explosion aboard the USS Iowa was "probably caused" by gunner's mate Clayton Hartwig, who was among 47 sailors killed, the Associated Press reported.  Investigators, who had been examining the possibility of murder or suicide, reportedly found foreign material near the gun-turret blast.  ---  At least 30 East Germans dashed across the Hungarian border into Austria apparently after growing tired of awaiting permission for an exodus to the West, the Red Cross said.  In Bonn, West German officials acknowledged little progress in talks over the possible departure from Hungary of about 5,500 East German refugees.  ---  Dutch Premier Lubbers won a third term in an election dominated by environmental issues.  His Christian Democrats kept their 54 seats in the 150-seat Lower House.  But their coalition partners, the Liberals, lost five of their 27 seats, lessening their chance of being invited to form a new coalition.  ---  NATO intends to propose limits on military maneuvers by Western and Soviet armed forces in Europe, the first time the alliance has suggested non-nuclear military constraints, officials in Brussels said.  The proposal is to be presented during the third round of talks on cutting East-West conventional forces, which open today in Vienna.  ---  A federal judge in Charlotte, N.C., ruled that television evangelist Jim Bakker is competent to stand trial.  The judge ordered resumption of the case after a government psychiatrist testified that Bakker wasn't "going crazy" when he broke down last week.  The 49-year-old Bakker is accused of fleecing followers of his PTL ministry.  ---  The Justice Department opened a criminal inquiry into allegations that law enforcement officers committed civil rights violations while quelling a weekend riot at Virginia Beach, Va.  The FBI had received complaints from civilians at the scene of rioting, which involved about 100,000 youths from predominantly black East Coast colleges.  ---  South Korean riot police clashed with students and workers in five cities during demonstrations demanding the resignation of President Roh Tae Woo and the withdrawal of U.S. troops from the country.  Witnesses reported some arrests and injuries, but officials didn't provide any figures.  ---  Rescue teams in Brazil began evacuating survivors from a domestic jetliner that crash-landed Sunday in the Amazon jungle, an air force official in Rio de Janeiro said.  Nine of the 54 people aboard the Varig airlines Boeing 737 aircraft were killed.  ---  A Finnish oil tanker collided with a Soviet fishing trawler near the Swedish island of Gotland in the Baltic Sea, killing all 15 crew members.  Officials said the Finnish vessel veered into the boat while trying to avoid a crash with another Soviet ship.  ---  Died: Georges Simenon, 86, Belgian writer, Monday, in Lausanne, Switzerland . . .  Lester C. Hopton, 87, ex-president of Ingersoll-Rand, Monday, in Boca Raton, Fla.  credited with saving 184 lives after their DC-10 crash-landed at the Sioux City, Iowa, airport -- said the most they could hope for in the final seconds of the flight was to land the crippled jet with a minimum of death and destruction.  In an interview about the July 19 crash, the crew members said they never knew what the aircraft would do next after its rear engine blew up in flight, knocking out power to the critical flight-control systems.  "It was somewhat out of our hands how it would go" on the landing, Captain Alfred Haynes recalled.  Crew members said that without any controls to steer or slow the jet or compensate for changing winds, they struggled to land it with as shallow a descent angle as possible to lessen the impact.  The aircraft almost landed safely, but just as it touched down, the right wing dipped and the aircraft cartwheeled across the runway, bursting into flames.  "It would have been too much to ask" to land the jet perfectly, Flight Engineer Dudley Dvorak said; 111 people on board were killed.  The crew is credited with handling an emergency for which there are no set procedures.  Though their actions may shed light on how to react if such a severe emergency arises again, the crew members say they were inventing procedures as they went along in response to the actions of the aircraft.  At least twice during the emergency, the crew members said it looked as if they would lose control of the jet.  The first time was in the first minutes of the flight, when the aircraft began a slow roll to the right and appeared about to turn onto its back.  The second time was about five minutes before landing, when the crew had difficulty maintaining altitude.  Capt. Dennis Fitch, a DC-10 training pilot who came into the cockpit to help during the emergency, was able to level the aircraft by manipulating the throttles to vary the thrust in the aircraft's two functioning engines.  Mr. Fitch did this while squatting on his knees in the space between the captain's and co-pilot's seats.  The four cockpit crewmen, all former military pilots, said in their first joint interview since the crash that although they were wrestling for control of the aircraft during the entire 42-minute emergency, they never gave in to doubts that they would be able to land.  "I expected to put the aircraft on the ground. (But) I was expecting the landing would be bad," Capt. Haynes said.  The four crewmen were interviewed from Washington, where they are to receive a citation from President Bush today.  They praised the safety record of the McDonnell Douglas Corp. DC-10 widebody jetliner, which federal officials are studying for possible design changes.  Safety experts are concerned about the clustering of hydraulic lines, which provide power to the flight controls, near the rear engine.  Among other things, safety officials are considering whether the lines need to be better protected to prevent them from being severed when an engine explodes.  The morality play isn't going according to script.  The greedy Eighties are supposed to be an era of free-spending hedonism.  The current prosperity, the liturgy goes, is based on a consumption binge slighting investment for the future.  Soon the party will be over and the piper will have to be paid.  There will be much gnashing of teeth, rending of garments and hocking of BMWs.  This jeremiad has been in fashion for several years now despite the inconvenience of sustained prosperity in general and the current investment boom in particular.  The standard Commerce Department Survey finds that businesses plan to increase capital investment this year by 9.9%, after a 10.3% boost in 1988.  And of course, we still have no signs of capacity bottlenecks while well into the sixth year of a business expansion.  Somehow investment has been enough to keep output growing for a record number of years.  So it might be a good idea to take another look at the statistic behind the notion of an investment dearth.  In the National Income Accounts, net private domestic investment as a percent of GNP comes out lower in the 1980s than in the 1970s.  Therefore, the argument goes, we must cut consumption and leave more savings to flow into investment.  And we must increase taxes to close the deficit so money borrowed by the government can flow into investment.  And particularly, we must stop borrowing from abroad to pay for imports, leaving foreign debts for future generations.  Now of course, productive investment is essential to future growth and prosperity.  But the National Income Accounts were established in a Keynesian era to answer Keynesian questions; "investment" is not what produces in the future, but what uses up savings to prevent a shortage in total demand.  Keynes, remember, said digging holes and filling them would be fine with him.  Predictably, then, the classification of investment is somewhat slapdash.  Octopus Industry's fifty-first Lear Jet is investment, but your son's engineering education is consumption.  A personal auto is consumption, even if it lasts five years, indeed even if it's used in business.  The same auto purchased by Hertz is investment.  The same with personal computers.  Then there is the problem of depreciation.  Net investment is gross investment less depreciation, someone's guess about how fast the existing capital stock is wearing out.  Gross investment actually has been quite strong for the past five years, but bigger depreciation allowances keep net investment relatively low.  Indeed, economist Alan Reynolds points out that while depreciation is deducted to get net investment, it's not deducted from gross national product; this leaves the percent of GNP comparison suspect.  And of course, if policies succeed and GNP grows, the same investment will be a lower percentage.  Also, in the 1980s there has been almost no inflation in the cost of capital goods; in the case of computers, prices have declined.  But consumer goods have inflated each year, so nominal comparisons create a phony appearance of a capital slump and consumption binge.  With all of these problems measuring the quantity of investment, it might be worth thinking a bit about the quality of investment, which in fact is more important to the future.  Economists John Rutledge and Deborah Allen point out that in the 1970s inflation and high tax rates distorted investment, inducing people not to replace aging factories but to hedge against inflation and take advantage of tax shelters by building hotels, condominiums and shopping centers.  That spending was measured as investment, as of course were all wells drilled in search of $50-a-barrel oil.  The 1970s investments turned out not to be today's seed corn, but today's problem loans.  A factory allowed to decay into obsolescence, Mr. Rutledge and Ms. Allen point out, is the rough equivalent of a factory bombed out of existence.  So the United States at the end of the 1970s resembled Japan and Germany at the end of World War II.  In the early Eighties inflation was quashed and taxes were recast to encourage productive investment.  The result resembled a reverse Marshall Plan, with spending to replace depleted capital, a rebounding manufacturing center and high foreign investment.  When it comes to imports, indeed, Americans were not blowing their money on CD doodads and big-screen TVs, but spending on the sorts of things John Calvin would approve of.  A third of the worsening trade balance in the 1980s was due to American purchases of foreign capital equipment.  Another quarter of the deficit was due to purchases of industrial supplies and materials.  If Americans went on a global buying binge in the Eighties, more than half the money was spent enlarging U.S. productive capacity.  What this means is that human nature did not change during the 1980s.  As usual, people took advantage of good times to buy things they wanted or needed.  As usual, people planned for the future by investing as best they could.  And as usual, doom and gloom oracles got the whole situation fummoxed up.  Eighteen months ago, Winzer Park here was known for its drive-through drug business.  Dealers sold to a stream of customers from all over the city who pulled up in their cars, placed their orders and drove away, fast-food restaurant style.  Crack-cocaine vials, hypodermic needles and wine bottles littered the grounds and piled up under the merry-go-round.  Pre-teen children were recruited into selling drugs by the dealers who lurked among the park's trees day and night.  That was then.  This is now:  Proclaiming drugs "pretty stupid," Thad Moore, 13, and some of his friends ride their bikes over to play basketball at Winzer Park.  Their parents no longer forbid them to set foot in the park.  The softball field has been reclaimed from a thicket of weeds and trash.  The graffiti are gone.  The park has a new drinking fountain, the tennis courts new nets.  Drug users no longer shoot up in the restrooms.  No one stashes crack in the drain pipes.  Chalk up a win for the Acres Homes War on Drugs Committee.  The broad-based citizens coalition, working with the Houston Police Department, last year seized the park back from the dope peddlers and users who once reigned there.  The success formula: making the police a bigger part of the community, turning civilians into unofficial police deputies and destroying the places where drug dealers transacted business.  "The community was fed up," says Denise Jenkins, an Acres Homes resident and member of the committee.  "We had had enough."  Since visiting here in July, drug czar William Bennett has cited Winzer Park as a paradigm for fighting drugs, a case study in the kind of community and police cooperation that he's now seeking to foster.  "This is what it's all about," Mr. Bennett says.  "Cops, community -- get the streets back from the bad guys."  While cleaning up Winzer Park is cause for pride, everyone realizes that it hasn't dented the overall drug problem in Houston.  The drug traffic driven away from the 12-acre park simply relocated nearby.  But anti-drug leaders are already trying to duplicate the Acres Homes victory elsewhere in the city.  The campaign grew out of a series of community meetings in late 1987, spearheaded by the police department.  A dozen people -- teachers, retirees, bankers and others -- volunteered to form the Acres Homes War on Drugs Committee.  Erma Scales, a 55-year-old teacher and grandmother, jokes that she agreed to be chairwoman just to end one interminable meeting.  Cooperation between police and Acres Homes residents was a miraculous achievement all its own.  "There was a time when Acres Homes was at war with the police," says Roy Malonson, a committee member.  The mostly poor, mostly black neighborhood had known years of harassment and beatings from cops.  Mrs. Scales says bluntly, "I was afraid of policemen before."  But Acres Homes feared drugs more.  "We got the trust back," says Officer Sharon Pouncy.  It helped, several residents say, that Houston has its first black police chief and that the department had opened a storefront office in the neighborhood.  It has helped most, they say, that police officers and residents came together in monthly meetings and special seminars.  In more than a dozen workshops so far, Houston police officers have told Acres Homes citizens about various illegal drugs -- what they look like, what they're called, how they're taken, what symptoms they cause in children and adults.  Police officers taught residents to take notice of suspicious activities and unfamiliar cars and faces.  Armed with that training, Acres Homes residents became the department's eyes and ears.  Residents found it easier to call officers at the nearby storefront office, and the police acted even on anonymous calls.  "We have even had senior citizens send in a bound notebook full of buyers' license plate numbers," says Mrs. Scales.  At the same time, the committee tackled some of the dense, wooded areas the drug dealers knew intimately.  What looks like a nature trail through the woods of Winzer Park was actually "the path drug dealers use to get away," Mrs. Jenkins says.  After turning out on several Saturday mornings "with their saws and weedeaters," Officer Pouncy says, neighbors cleared away brush and debris.  She and some of the other off-duty police officers helped.  In April 1988, the War on Drugs Committee decided it wanted "to send a very strong message," says the Rev. Ameal Jones of Mt. Ararat Baptist Church in Acres Homes.  The committee organized a parade from his church to Winzer Park, where hundreds joined in a rally.  "They were never quiet about it," Mr. Jones says.  The parade and rally pulled more Acres Homes residents into the anti-drug war, giving the police even more political motivation to step up their presence there.  The drive-through drug business moved, and the clean-up went into full swing.  Locals are learning that driving away the dealers has economic and other benefits, as well.  The business community is trying to re-establish a base that would provide jobs and shore up the sagging Acres Homes economy.  There's a newly formed Acres Homes Citizens Chamber of Commerce.  "We've got to give kids a choice of legal businesses," Mr. Malonson says.  His construction and remodeling concern, Malonson Co., is building a facility in Acres Homes that will provide space for start-up businesses in the area.  Cultural goings-on have new life, too.  Churches and schools have beefed up their youth activities, especially anti-drug programs.  There's now a communitywide "Just Say No" choir and a newly formed Acres Homes Dance Company.  Houston's black community leaders complain that minor victories like Winzer Park aren't enough.  Urban League aide H. Louis Author calls for more police officers, especially black police, in uniform and under cover.  He and many Acres Homes residents seek a drug counseling center.  And community leaders argue that not enough has been done to address the underlying conditions that caused the Acres Homes drug crisis -- its illiteracy, unemployment and poverty.  Says Mr. Jones: "Life is raw here."  ---  Paul M. Barrett in Washington contributed to this article.  Even though he is black, and thus not entitled to vote in today's parliamentary elections, Curnick Ndlovu had been pounding the campaign trail as much any white politician.  He spoke to big audiences in Johannesburg, Cape Town and Durban, and to small ones at many places in between.  He even took his campaign to Washington and to the capitals of Europe.  His message was always the same: to South Africa's black majority, the elections are a side-show.  The voteless, he said, will voice their opinions by defying the country's apartheid, or segregation, laws and state of emergency restrictions in the weeks leading up to the elections.  It is the defiance campaign, not the election campaign, that counts, he told an anti-election rally at Johannesburg's city hall on Aug. 21.  Ten days later, Mr. Ndlovu, the national chairman of the anti-apartheid United Democratic Front, was arrested under the goverment's emergency regulations amid a nationwide clampdown on the defiance activities.  His campaigning was over, but the white politicians continued apace, shielded by a vow from the police that anti-apartheid activists, like Mr. Ndlovu, wouldn't be allowed to disrupt "the democratic process of elections."  And so white voters, as well as Indians and coloreds, as people of mixed-race are called, who have their own separate chambers of parliament, will indeed exercise their democratic right to vote today.  But as they do, South Africa's central irony, and greatest dilemma, is magnified: The government can't uphold democracy without subverting it at the same time.  To ensure a democratic election for the minority, it outlaws the democratic protests of the majority.  According to the South African Human Rights Commission, an anti-apartheid watchdog organization, nearly 2,000 people have been arrested since the beginning of August for participating in defiance campaigns and anti-election protests.  At least 14 meetings were banned and two were restricted in terms of what could be said.  At least 46 meetings and protest gatherings were broken up by security forces; 28 involved the use of force, such as tear gas, water cannons, rubber bullets and whips.  Seventy-four journalists were arrested, either for protesting emergency press restrictions or for violating those restrictions by refusing to turn their backs on police actions.  Several churches were surrounded, and effectively closed, by police to prevent anti-apartheid gatherings.  All of this has put the country's 28 million blacks at the center of the election campaign, even though they are sidelined on election day.  The Mass Democratic Movement, a coalition of anti-apartheid groups organizing the defiance activities, has been mentioned so frequently by the white candidates that MDM, as it is commonly called, has become a household name.  The ruling National Party and the far-right Conservative Party claim that MDM is a front for the banned African National Congress and South African Communist Party, and that its defiance activities, like swimming on whites-only beaches and riding on whites-only buses, are designed to provoke confrontations with the police.  While condemning the violence, the liberal Democratic Party says MDM reflects the frustrations of the black majority.  "Protest is inevitable when normal political activity isn't possible, and in particular when it is forbidden, as is the case with the MDM," says Wynand Malan, a leader of the Democratic Party.  Thus, while acting President F.W. de Klerk closed the National Party's campaign Monday night, saying "discrimination must be eliminated; there is no other alternative," members of the country's largest black trade union federation marched nearby to kick off a two-day general strike.  'We believe that {the strike} is the real election," said Cyril Ramaphosa, the head of the National Union of Mineworkers, who was leading the demonstration.  "That is how our people are casting their vote."  In what it describes as a major introduction, Nestle S.A.'s Stouffer Foods Corp. is rolling out a new line of low-cholesterol, low-fat, and low-sodium entrees called Right Course.  Stouffer said Right Course's packages will tell consumers the exact amount of cholesterol, fat and sodium in a given entree and also provide the American Heart Association's recommendations for total average daily intake.  Earlier this year, ConAgra Inc. introduced a similar line called Healthy Choice.  The move appears to represent an attempt by Stouffer to regain its momentum in the frozen-foods market, where its Lean Cuisine brand has been struggling.  "Lean Cusine has lost its dominance in the frozen-food market," said John McMillin, an analyst at Prudential-Bache.  "Its market share has eroded over the past three years due to inroads by the Budget Gourmet and Weight Watchers."  He adds: "Now they don't want to let the niche that ConAgra is capitalizing on pass them by."  "Through the chart we are using and putting on the front, we are providing nutritional education along with the product itself," explained James Biggar, chief executive of Nestle Enterprises Inc., another unit.  "That has been missing.  People are going after fads like low cholesterol but haven't been able to quantify what they ought to be eating."  Mr. Biggar said the Right Course's introduction is being supported by a "substantial" advertising campaign, developed by Tathum-Laird & Kudner in Chicago.  Environmentalists are hoping General Electric Co. will clear the air by changing its mind about releasing ozone-depleting chlorofluorocarbons, or CFCs, into the atmosphere.  Pressures from environmental groups have already spawned a race to recycle CFCs.  General Motors Corp., for example, announced recently that its 10,000 dealers will install equipment to capture and purify CFC coolants from car air conditioners under repair, and other auto makers are taking similar steps.  But GE, saying it lacks a technology, has decided to release the coolant from 300,000 defective refrigerator compressors its dealers are repairing under a major recall program.  GE isn't alone, of course, in venting CFCs, but its recent decision has environmental groups venting their anger, all the more so as some suppliers claim they can easily provide GE with the necessary recycling equipment.  "If GM can do it, why can't GE?" says William Walsh, an attorney for Public Interest Research Group, which is campaigning against CFC emissions.  "If it can design satellites and jet engines, it can design a CFC recycling system."  Mr. Walsh says the group has written to GE's chairman, Jack Welch, and is trying to form protest groups of "concerned" owners whose refrigerators GE will repair.  For decades, repairmen have routinely released into the atmosphere the CFC coolant -- usually Du Pont Co.'s widely used Freon brand -- from automobile air conditioners and refrigerator compressors.  But demands for an end to the practice are rising.  At issue is the growing belief that CFCs deplete the atmosphere's ozone layer and thus contribute to increased levels of potentially harmful ultraviolet radiation.  An estimated 750 million pounds of CFCs -- synthetic compounds of chlorine, fluorine, carbon and, sometimes, hydrogen -- are used in the U.S. annually.  Of that total, refrigerants account for 40%, insulators 28%, cleaning agents 20% and miscellaneous specialty products 12%.  According to a survey by New York-based Environmental Defense Fund, about a dozen small companies are selling equipment and services to recycle CFCs.  But a GE spokesman says it hasn't found any of the technologies practical or economical.  He says the machines being offered are too bulky and expensive for small repair shops to buy.  "We are working ourselves on some {recycling} systems which we aren't ready to talk about."  The spokesman doesn't estimate when GE's technology will be ready, but he says that meanwhile GE will offset the released refrigerant by "somehow" cutting its future use of CFC coolant by that amount.  The decision puzzles some companies that claim to already have what GE seeks.  "We have the technology that will meet their specific needs, and we can supply it in a matter of months," asserts Roger Dumais, sales manager of Thermaflo Inc., Springfield, Mass.  He says the company has developed a prototype machine, a portable box-like unit, that can extract the coolant through a compressor's "access ports" or "piercing valves."  Mr. Dumais says the price of the units hasn't been decided, but it will be less than the roughly $2,200 that GM dealers will pay for their machines.  Mr. Dumais says GE looked at and rejected his company's technology, saying it was developing its own.  Recycling CFCs poses some technological challenges, but nothing that can't be overcome easily, engineers in the recycling industry say.  One problem is that Freon, which exists both in liquid and gaseous states, depending upon pressure, has about one-tenth the viscosity of water and thus doesn't create a film, or cushion, to protect a pump's moving parts.  "First time we used a pump to recover Freon, the pump rapidly disintegrated," says Richard Walker, vice president of Davco Manufacturing Co., Easton, Pa.  He claims Davco has solved the problems using "metallurgical and fluid tricks" that he declines to discuss, saying the patent is still pending.  Ron Materniak, a Du Pont market planner, doubts that available machines can recycle refrigerator coolant back to original standards.  Most can reduce the contaminants, he says, but if the refrigerant isn't sufficiently clean, it could burn out a motor.  "The refrigerator is less forgiving than the automobile," he says.  "GE obviously didn't feel comfortable with what's out there."  Recycling engineers agree that it's trickier to purify CFCs from refrigerator compressors than from car air conditioners, where the major contaminants are moisture and air; refrigerator-compressor motors add such impurities as acid and oil.  But the technology exists to remove all of these contaminants through filtration and condensation, says Mr. Dumais of Thermaflo.  "What you need is some finesse."  The machines that will be installed at GM dealerships are boxy units, about 3 1/2 feet high, that can extract as much as 30 pounds of Freon from car air conditioners; an average auto has about 2.5 pounds of the coolant.  A pump initially developed for the aerospace program reclaims the Freon, and the air and moisture are removed by passing the refrigerant through a series of valves and absorbent beads, all in the same unit.  Robert Bishop, who heads the SPX Corp. division that supplies the GM units, says the company also has developed similar machines for use on refrigerator compressors.  These prototype machines were shown to GE Appliance division people a few months ago, he says.  "They are aware of our recycling machines.  I don't know why we didn't hear from them."  Arthur Andersen & Co. and Price Waterhouse said they are extending indefinitely the period for discussion of a possible merger of the two big accounting firms.  While the two companies wouldn't spell out specific reasons for the delay, accounting specialists said the firms have many problems to solve, any of which could easily snag or upset the merger.  "It won't be easy putting Andersen and Price together," said James Emerson, publisher of Emerson's Professional Services Review in Bellevue, Wash.  "Andersen has more assets in a form of a valuable training center in St. Charles, Ill., than Price.  Andersen has more centralized management than Price.  And 40% of Andersen's annual revenue come from consulting while only 18% of Price's derive from consulting.  In some cases, it's like putting apples and oranges together."  If the two firms do merge, it would create the largest world-wide accounting organization with about $5 billion in annual revenue.  Andersen's annual world-wide revenue is $2.83 billion while Price's is $2.27 billion.  A combination of the firms would eclipse Peat Marwick with $4.3 billion in annual world-wide revenue and Ernst & Young with $4 billion.  Early in July, Andersen and Price said they would discuss whether a merger is possible over a 60-day period -- a deadline that just ended.  In a news release, Andersen and Price said the initial period of discussion in their merger talks has been "beneficial."  Joseph E. Connor, chairman of Price Waterhouse World Firm, the world-wide organization of Price, and Lawrence A. Weinbach, chief executive of Andersen, said that partners of both firms are on task forces analyzing global business issues and are making recommendations related to the proposed merger.  The discussions will continue until "all pertinent issues have been thoroughly explored and definitive conclusions reached," Andersen and Price said.  Accounting specialists said the two firms are being especially careful that affiliates in all countries approve merger terms.  Several years ago, Price wasn't able to complete a merger with Deloitte, Haskins & Sells because of opposition from Price's British partners.  One of Europe's most powerful and idiosyncratic businessmen, Francis Bouygues, resigned as chairman of his huge construction and television group, turning over operational control to his youngest son, Martin.  The move marks a long-awaited dynastic change at Bouygues S.A., founded by the elder Mr. Bouygues (pronounced bweeg) in 1952 with 12,000 borrowed French francs.  He built his company into the world's biggest construction group outside Japan -- the fourth largest including Japan.  In 1987, he bought a controlling 25% stake in France's biggest television station, TF1, from the French government.  Bouygues officials insisted that, aside from the change at the top, none of the group's structures or goals would alter.  "After having chosen and trained my men, created conditions favorable to their development, it now is time to permit those who are younger to pursue the job," Mr. Bouygues told a board meeting.  "I will devote myself to reflection on the group's structure, with a view toward helping and favoring necessary evolution."  Mr. Bouygues, 66 years old, already had stepped aside as TF1 chairman.  He paved the way for yesterday's resignation a year ago, when his son, 36, was appointed Bouygues's vice chairman.  The resignation nevertheless sparked fresh rumors of ill health in the elder Mr. Bouygues, who in 1976 lost a lung to cancer.  It also rekindled worries about his son's ability to fill his father's shoes.  Although his father and associates laud his abilities, the younger Mr. Bouygues never finished college.  Before his appointment last year, he rose from being a construction worker and low-level manager to run the group's home-building and water-distribution subsidiaries.  As they have for months, Bouygues officials denied the rumors and tried to quiet the worries.  "Mr.  Bouygues is in full control physically and mentally," said Finance Director Olivier Poupart-Lafarge.  He said Mr. Bouygues just returned in top condition from a vacation in Brittany.  "In fact, {his good health} is what led to the choice of this date: This way, he can preside over the passing of control."  Bouygues officials projected that the group will perform better than expected this year.  The elder Mr. Bouygues told directors that sales would hit 56 billion francs ($8.39 billion), compared with 53.5 billion francs projected earlier in the year and 50.1 billion francs recorded in 1988.  They said profit also would be strong, though specific figures weren't available.  Mr. Poupart-Lafarge and other Bouygues insiders called the resignation a "courageous" one, noting that most family-controlled companies are cursed with founders who refuse to hand over the reins until they are too old for an effective transition.  They said the younger Mr. Bouygues was unanimously elected by a board that includes five Bouygues bankers and 10 of the powerful "barons" who run the concern's far-flung divisions and who were rumored to be gunning for the young heir.  The elder Mr. Bouygues "has been less and less involved in everything for the past year or two," said one Bouygues official.  "Martin has already started to run things, and he is doing well enough that his father can step back."  The change also comes at a time when worries about a hostile takeover are fading.  After a sudden buying spree in Bouygues shares a year ago, the Bouygues family boosted its stake in the company and brought in friendly investors such as Japan's Nippon Life Insurance Co. and Italian media magnate Silvio Berlusconi.  Today, sources say, Mr. Bouygues and allies control at least 55% of all shares.  Still, the succession will mark a change.  The younger Mr. Bouygues is best known for his diplomacy and admiration for his father; the elder Mr. Bouygues is best known for his toughness.  When some of the work proved faulty on his first huge project, Paris's Parc des Princes stadium in 1969, the elder Mr. Bouygues arrived at the site, barking orders through a walkie-talkie until the work got back on track.  He went on to build Saudi Arabia's huge Riyadh University and the tower at the Paris business suburb of La Defense, where last summer's economic summit was held.  A mustache-hater, he is said once to have made an employee shave before he got a raise.  And legend has it that he used to roam through offices at night, overturning desks that weren't clean.  The Treasury plans to pay down about $3.8 billion on the federal debt with the sale Monday of about $14.4 billion in short-term bills.  Maturing bills outstanding total $18.19 billion.  The offering will be divided evenly between 13-week and 26-week bills, which will be dated Sept. 14 and mature on Dec. 14, 1989, and March 15, 1990, respectively.  Tenders for the bills, available in minimum $10,000 denominations, must be received by 1 p.m. EDT Monday at the Treasury or at Federal Reserve banks or branches.  Apogee Enterprises Inc. said it expects to report per-share earnings for the second quarter, ended Saturday, were 28 cents to 30 cents, because of a one-time charge and margin pressure from an expansion program.  The maker of glass and building materials had net income in the year-ago period of $3.8 million, or 28 cents a share.  Apogee said it expects to report the latest period's earnings were flat or only slightly improved despite a 40% to 45% growth in sales from the year-ago period's $105.5 million.  The latest period's results will include an after-tax charge of $900,000, or seven cents a share, from the sale of a unit.  While "core operations continue to perform quite well" and are "generating strong gains in both sales and operating income," they will reflect the impact of newly acquired and start-up operations.  Apogee said it continues to expect "record sales and earnings" for the fiscal year ending in February.  For the fiscal year ended Feb. 25, the company had record net income of $13.4 million, or $1 a share, on sales of $433.7 million.  In national over-the-counter trading, Apogee stock closed at $17.50, down 37.5 cents.  The International Development Association, an affiliate of the World Bank, is preparing to provide up to $100 million to help the poorest Third World nations buy back their outstanding loans from commercial bank creditors at a discount.  Ernest Stern, the World Bank's senior vice president for financial affairs, said that this new operation may benefit as many as 30 low-income, developing nations in Africa, Latin America and Asia.  This group of countries includes many sub-Saharan African nations, countries such as Bolivia and Haiti in the Western Hemisphere, and a group of low-income Asian countries including Bangladesh, Sri Lanka and Nepal.  Most of the external debts of the IDA-beneficiary countries are owed to official creditors, including governments of western industrial nations, but Mr. Stern estimated that their debts outstanding to private creditors -- notably commercial banks -- total more than $2 billion.  The $100 million for the program would come from the World Bank's net income in the year ended last June 30.  The money would be provided as "grants," rather than loans, on a case-by-case basis.  World Bank executive directors, who represent 151 member nations of the international agency, approved the plan in late June.  It is expected to get final, formal approval of finance ministers of industrial nations and developing countries by the time of the joint annual meeting of the World Bank and the International Monetary Fund in Washington late this month.  MCA Inc., Universal City, Calif., said it began a public offering in the international capital markets of $200 million of 5 1/2% convertible subordinated debentures due 1999, priced at par.  The debentures are convertible into common stock of the entertainment concern at $76.625 a share.  They aren't redeemable until Oct. 12, 1994, except under certain circumstances, and thereafter are redeemable at par.  Proceeds from the offering will be used for general corporate purposes, which may include refinancing existing debt.  Japanese tradition says Chieko Hamano should be home taking care of her two preschool children.  Instead, the spunky 30-year-old works full time as a software engineer for NEC Corp., which she joined eight years ago after getting a college chemistry degree.  "When I got married, they asked if I wanted to continue" she recalls.  "I said yes.  When I got pregnant they asked if I would come back, and again I said yes.  I don't have the personality to stay at home."  Neither does Hiroko Shimada, a 45-year-old mother of three who, despite her husband's misgivings, continues to work as an accountant for retail chain Seiyu Ltd.  And neither does Atsuko Takahashi, a 34-year-old account executive at a data-services concern, who keeps ignoring her mother's entreaties to find a husband.  These three women are in the vanguard of a quiet revolution that is changing the way Japanese live and work.  After decades of toiling relentlessly to get Japan to the top of the world, some Japanese are questioning the values that got them there, including an all-consuming work ethic and the notions of the proper roles of men and women.  They are rethinking political ethics that wink at payoffs and sexual peccadilloes, and they are fretting about their society's increasingly uneven distribution of wealth.  In particular, growing numbers of women here are reassessing traditional mores that have limited their opportunities and blocked their advancement in the workplace.  And, as many in the West have discovered over the past two decades, such reassessments of the role of women lead inevitably to new demands at home, at work, and in politics.  In Japan this trend could gradually dilute the work ethic that dominates the lives of Japanese men.  In the longer run it may also produce subtler side effects, such as a reversal of Japan's declining rate of divorce.  "Everything is changing," says Wakako Hironaka, a writer on women's issues who was elected to the upper house of the parliament three years ago.  "Women are just beginning to realize their hidden power."  The world took notice of the new power of Japanese women this summer, when an opposition party coalition led by a woman included several housewives on its slate and smashed the conservative ruling party in parliamentary elections.  But that stunning vote, the first defeat dealt the conservatives in 34 years, was only the political manifestation of a broader trend in Japanese society.  Traditionally, a Japanese woman would complete her education and go to work for a few years as an "office lady," serving tea, cleaning ashtrays and making photocopies.  By age 25, she was expected by both her boss and society to marry and leave work forever.  Then, she was supposed to wait patiently at home for her workaholic husband while he drank with colleagues and flirted with hostesses, draw a bath for him when he finally did arrive, and in the meantime make sure their children studied hard for the all-important school-entrance examinations.  No more.  As elsewhere in the industrialized world, more and more women here are pursuing careers outside the home.  They are driven, in part, by a convergence of economic and demographic trends: Rapidly rising land prices have stuck many young families with burdensome mortgages, while a continuing labor shortage has forced companies, especially in retailing, banking and other services, to be more receptive to hiring females.  This slow but steady trend is especially noticable among married women: In 1987, 51% of them worked, compared with 45% in 1977.  Working women, moreover, no longer are just pouring tea.  Prodded by a 1986 law prohibiting discrimination by sex, more Japanese companies are hiring women for the same career tracks as men.  Now, many Japanese women are climbing the career ladder and competing with men for good jobs.  The number of women in management positions at larger companies doubled to 486,000 in 1987 from 239,000 a decade earlier.  Women are even going into business on their own in surprising numbers.  Five out of six new businesses in Japan are started by women, according to the Japan Association for Female Executives.  But Japanese traditions don't die easily.  Japanese men are just beginning to come to grips with the implications of the career woman, and the more they confront the phenomenon the less they may like it.  For decades, they have been able to toil 12 to 15 hours a day, safe in the knowledge that their wives will clean their houses, raise their children and manage their family finances.  "Most young men want the same things that their fathers wanted: Someone to take care of them," declares Toshio Fukuhara, a 32-year-old investment banker.  Also, many of the women going to work are doing so only part time.  Of the 25,000 employees of Seiyu, the chain where Mrs. Shimada works, some 14,000 are part-timers, and most of those are women.  More important, many Japanese women themselves remain profoundly conservative, unimpressed by Western feminism and content with the well-defined roles that separate them from men.  Takako Inoue, for example, is one of four sisters who all juggle full-time work and families.  She runs her own fancy-dress and tuxedo-rental store.  Despite her independence, she wasn't upset by revelations earlier this year that the then-prime minister had purchased a geisha's services.  Rather than find his conduct demeaning to women, she reproaches the geisha for making the affair public.  "The woman was the bad one," Mrs. Inoue concludes.  "Geisha are in the kind of business where they shouldn't talk about their customers' affairs."  Parents also remain conservative in their hopes for their children.  A 1982 government survey -- the latest available -- shows that 73% of Japanese parents expect their sons to get a university education, but only 28% expect their daughters to do so.  And women in public life are still easily brushed aside or ignored.  Mrs. Hironaka, the member of parliament, says other politicians frequently ignore her position and introduce her as the wife of a distinguished professor.  For all that, women are advancing as never before in Japanese business.  In 1962, when Mitsuko Shimomura went to work at the Asahi Shimbum, Japan's second-largest newspaper, she was treated as a second-class employee.  She had passed the same rigorous tests as her male colleagues, but she had to arrive at work 30 minutes before them to make their tea and clean their ashtrays.  What's more, friends criticized her for not staying at home.  "The whole society looked at me as a strange woman," she recalls.  Today, Ms. Shimomura, who rose to become Japan's first female foreign correspondent, is amazed by the opportunities open to women.  "It's much easier to be born a woman now," she says.  Sadako Tashiro certainly had no expectation of making a career when she joined the Bank of Tokyo fresh out of women's college in 1959.  Society's ground rules "seemed reasonable at the time," she recalls.  What propelled her onto a career track, she recalls, was a lot of luck and an unexpected personal development: "I couldn't find a husband."  Since then, her life has been a string of precedents: First woman to be transferred overseas by the Bank of Tokyo; first woman to be promoted to section chief, or middle manager; first woman named general manager in charge of the bank's international operations department.  These days Ms. Tashiro isn't the sole female at management meetings.  The Bank of Tokyo now boasts 150 women with titles, including 12 section chiefs.  "For women in the future here, it won't be a matter of discrimination," says Ms. Tashiro, who has remained single.  "Their advancement will depend entirely on ability."  That assessment may be optimistic, but it reflects the new reality here: Japan's booming high-technology and service industries can't function without hiring women.  There aren't enough men.  At NEC, one of Japan's largest computer companies, 200 of the 932 engineers joining the company this year were women.  Yamazaki Construction K.K., a Tokyo-based construction company, even has hired 25 women to drive dump trucks, and expects to hire 75 more by the end of the year.  In response, young women students are increasingly shunning traditional majors such as literature in favor of areas with more career potential.  Hisako Saito, 19, has been interested in mathematics and computers since junior high school, but decided to study robotics and systems engineering only after hearing that the labor shortage in these fields is so great that employers don't discriminate against women.  "Even now she couldn't easily become a regular {career-track} employee of some big companies," says her mother, Sachiko Saito.  "But in engineering, she can find interesting work and a good career."  No one can foresee quite where this will all lead, or how it may alter the much-scrutinized Japanese national character.  But already it is clear that the sheer number of career women is leading to more demands for support from both the government and private sectors.  The first thing women want is more day care for their children.  Mrs. Hamano, the vivacious NEC software engineer, is able to work full time because her 71-year-old mother-in-law lives with her.  Her two young children wouldn't be allowed to attend the neighborhood public day-care center: It's so crowded it won't accept kids from homes where there is someone available to care for them.  "There are so many people who want to send their kids but can't," says Mrs. Hamano's mother-in-law.  "Nobody seems to be doing anything about it."  As more women venture into the corporate management, they probably also will leave their mark on attitudes toward work, which until lately have been defined by Japanese men.  Many of the Japanese women taking career-track jobs don't share -- at least yet -- their male counterparts' 100% commitment to their companies and jobs.  "Men run around like mice.  They don't recognize they aren't human beings anymore," scoffs Ms. Shimomura, the writer.  But women face an uphill battle in persuading men to share their vision of a balanced life.  Men at Japanese companies may find themselves forced to hire women, but they don't seem to feel compelled to reconsider the way they do business with other men.  Male employees are still expected to work long hours and spend time after work socializing with colleagues.  Companies may allow professional women more leeway -- but will it be at the expense of their promotion prospects?  Nahoko Hayashida says her bosses at Japan's national television network, NHK, let her leave work a few minutes early to retrieve her son from day care, but the 32-year-old production coordinator believes this concession is extended in return for her tacit agreement not to compete with men for certain top jobs.  Mrs. Hayashida's husband, on the other hand, is a government official who, she says, "is expected to devote 24 hours a day to his job, so he can't pick up the kid at 6 p.m.  It's not his fault.  That's how Japanese society works."  Such workings worry women here.  "In order to make it possible for women to work, men's attitudes have to change," argues Akiko Masuda, a Tokyo public relations executive.  "There will have to be understanding men for women to marry."  If more understanding men don't materialize, newly confident and financially self-sufficient women may start choosing divorce.  Japan's divorce rate is low and declining, but more and more older women are divorcing when their husbands retire, says Kenichi Takemura, a television commentator and social critic.  These wives, he says, have used their spare time to study and improve themselves and widen their horizons, while their overworked husbands became narrow.  "The husbands are astounded, stupefied," he says.  "They don't know why their wives have left them.  The husbands have worked hard and bought them kimonos, they've done everything they can for the family, not knowing that the wives and the children want something more."  CB PAK Inc. declared a special dividend of 10 Canadian dollars (US$8.47), payable Sept. 26 to common stock of record Sept. 22.  CB Pak said the C$206,880,000 total amount to be paid out approximates its accumulated retained earnings as of Aug. 31.  As reported previously, the Montreal glass maker sold its two major assets in May and August.  CB Pak is 80%-owned by Stone-Consolidated Inc., a unit of Stone Container Corp. of Chicago.  In Toronto Stock Exchange trading, CB Pak closed at C$22.125, up C$3.125.  This province's government approved construction of a 500 million Canadian dollar (US$423.4 million) natural-gas pipeline and distribution system that would link the British Columbia mainland and Vancouver Island.  The long-proposed project, which would extend about 330 miles and provide natural gas to residential and commercial customers, including seven pulp mills, still requires a binding financial commitment and final approval on environmental grounds from Canada's federal government.  The Canadian government tentatively agreed last year to commit C$150 million toward the project's cost.  Arthur Willms, executive vice president and chief operating officer of Westcoast Energy Inc., said he expects the federal review to be completed shortly, allowing pipeline construction to begin in three to four weeks.  Pacific Coast Energy Corp., which would operate the new pipeline, is jointly owned by Vancouver-based Westcoast and Alberta Energy Co., of Calgary, Alberta.  Mr. Willms said deliveries of natural gas to Vancouver Island customers, including pulp mills that currently rely on barge-transported heavy fuel oil for their energy needs, is expected to begin by late 1990, pending federal approval.  He said Pacific Coast Energy's share of the project's cost is about C$165 million, including C$75 million it plans to borrow under terms of interest-free loans from the federal and provincial governments.  Joseph Lutz has a weapon against pesky phone solicitors, obscene phone callers, errant fax machines and other electronic intruders: a gizmo that zaps unwanted calls.  The Winter Park, Fla., resident has invented a phone attachment that requires callers to punch in a three-number password to ring through.  The four-by-four-inch device, called Coda Call, intercepts phone calls, emits a tone and gives the caller five seconds to key in the code.  "If they don't know it, the machine hangs up on them.  Only good friends and family can get through," explains Mr. Lutz, who says he has divulged his code to 22 people.  "I use it when I want to get peace and quiet."  This isn't Mr. Lutz's first invention.  In the 1950s, he developed a product, "Rain Guard," designed to keep rain out of rolled-down car windows at drive-in movies. ("You don't see those around anymore," he says.) And he invented a toothpaste tube cap that re-closed automatically.  It was used briefly by Bristol-Myers Co. in the 1950s, he says.  Mr. Lutz believes his latest invention, which he expects to be on shelves by the end of the month, will be a big hit -- especially in Florida, home of aggressive penny stock solicitors, insurance salesmen and vulnerable retirees.  "A lot of old people have gotten ripped off by people calling on the phone," says the 69-year-old inventor, a retired electronics engineer.  Call protection has a price, however: $129, to be exact.  And the device has its drawbacks.  For instance, there's the problem of disseminating the password to friends and relatives.  "That could be difficult," says Jeanine Wilson, a sophomore at the University of Pennsylvania.  But she allows that it would be nice "to get rid of the people who always call asking whether I need my carpets cleaned."  What about friends who forget the password or never got it?  Mr. Lutz himself has had that problem.  He nearly missed seeing two friends from California because his box kept blocking their calls.  "They finally called my son and asked him what was wrong with my phone," he says.  "My son gave them my password."  Even so, Mr. Lutz is busy working on his next project: a call-blocking contraption for fax machines.  Mr. Spock as an NBC News correspondent?  Not quite, but this fall, Leonard Nimoy, who played the pointy-eared alien on "Star Trek," will host "Adventures in Space," a four-hour retrospective on space exploration using NBC News footage and network correspondents.  The series will first air on the seven stations owned and operated by NBC.  But the General Electric Co. subsidiary also has signed an agreement with syndicator LBS Communications Inc. to sell the series to approximately 160 stations, including affiliates of CBS Inc. and Capital Cities/ABC Inc. LBS will also handle overseas sales, while NBC plans to pitch the program to cable-TV companies and release it on videocassette.  "Adventures in Space" is just one of several projects under development at the network's newly formed NBC News Productions.  As the cost of covering the news continues to soar, network news divisions are aggressively exploring ways to stretch their thousands of hours of videotape into saleable products for other markets, including syndication, cable television and videocassettes.  The three networks are betting that ventures like NBC News Productions can generate additional revenue at little extra cost, while helping to promote the news operations.  "This is gravy for the news divisions because they already have all the vintage footage just sitting around," says Betsy Niesyn, managing editor of Home Video Publishing, a weekly newsletter.  "Why not let it work for them?"  Admittedly there are risks, not the least of which is whether there is a big enough consumer appetite for vintage news footage.  Yes, the family may gather around the television set to watch a copy of "Top Gun" for the umpteenth time, but how many times can one watch "1987: The Unforgettable Year," a videocassette released by NBC?  Annual sales of "news" videocassettes have surged to about $10 million from less than $2 million just two years ago, according to Home Video's Ms. Niesyn.  But that's still minuscule compared with the whopping $750 million in annual sales just for children's programming on cassettes.  "It's a business.  Not a large business, but a business nonetheless," says Ken Ross, vice president of video at CBS.  "You have to be clever and come up with reasons for people to watch something that is not current."  CBS knows that lesson all too well.  In 1984, CBS/Fox Video, a joint venture of CBS and 20th Century Fox Inc., thought that a "Best of '60 Minutes' " videocassette series would be a natural hit.  After two volumes bombed, however, the series was dropped.  "We have to figure out a way to market that kind of tape in a better fashion," Mr. Ross says.  But CBS has had successes as well.  A video called "Man on the Moon" with Walter Cronkite and Dan Rather, produced by CBS News and distributed by CBS Video Library, sold about 40,000 cassettes to video shops and individuals.  The sales generate $6.50 per cassette for CBS News.  A series of cassettes on the Vietnam War, anchored by Mr. Cronkite, has already earned $1.5 million for CBS News, according to a CBS News official who asked not to be identified.  Last month, CBS Video Library released "On the Road With Charles Kuralt" -- three one-hour compilations of folksy reports from the affable CBS News correspondent.  ABC News, meanwhile, is jointly producing programs aimed at cable markets.  Two programs it made in collaboration with Weintraub Productions -- "Heroes," about people who performed heroic feats, and "The Eagle and the Bear," about U.S.Soviet relations -- have been sold to the Arts & Entertainment cable channel.  Of the three networks' news divisions, NBC's has perhaps the most to gain from repackaging its products.  Its flagship news broadcast, "NBC Nightly News with Tom Brokaw," ranks last in ratings compiled by A.C. Nielsen Co., and the division's annual operating budget of about $245 million is under constant strain.  "My mission is to broaden our business, promote NBC News and bring in incremental revenues while maintaining the quality of NBC News," says Therese Byrne, NBC News vice president, marketing and business development, and head of NBC News Productions.  One of the most ambitious plans under development at NBC is "NBC News Pulse," a monthly audiocassette that would encapsulate one month's worth of NBC News programs.  NBC has already produced a pilot for the cassettes, which it plans to market as a subscriber service to groups and corporations.  Not all the ideas are so straight-laced.  NBC News is exploring the possibility of forming a subdivision to distribute offbeat tapes, such as a compilation of flubs by President Bush.  NBC also is putting together an annual "World News Atlas" with Rand McNally Co. that would show maps identifying where major news events occurred.  And it is holding discussions with Time-Warner Inc. to jointly produce a history series on videocassette.  "All of this activity gets the word out on NBC News and enhances the image of NBC News," says Ms. Byrne.  "Maybe if people start seeing NBC News popping up, more will tune to Nightly News." 